1*
CHAPTER I.
Some Account of a Very Ancient and Obscure FamilyAn Accident
which Gives Coloring to a Whole LifeA ConventicleA
Crop-Eared
PreacherA Surprise and a CaptureDanger of Being
in Bad Company.
In
the reign of King Charlescourteously styled
the Martyrthere resided in an obscure corner of the
renowned kingdom of England, a certain obscure
country gentleman, claiming descent from a family
that flourished in great splendor under a Saxon
monarch
whose name is forgotten. This ancient family,
like most others of great pretensions to antiquity, had
gone by as many names as certain persons who live in
the fear of the law, but finally settled down on that of
Habingdon, or Habingden, by which they were now
known. They were somewhat poor, but very proud,
and looked down with contempt on the posterity of the
upstart Normans who usurped the domains of their
ancestors. They had resided on the same spot for
more than eight hundred years, during which time,
not one of them had ever performed an act worthy of
being transmitted to posterity, with the single
exception
of one Thurkill Habingdonne who flourished in
the reign of King Johnof unblessed memoryand
who is recorded to have given one-third of a caracut of
land, and a wind-mill, to the priory of Monks Kirby,
to the end, as he expresses it, that his
obit
should
be perpetually there observed, and his name written
in the Martyrologe.
But, as hath been discreetly observed, the most
miserable of mankind, as well as the most
insignificant
,
would feel still more miserable and
insignificant
,
had he not in a secret corner of his heart,
something to feed his vanity or pride. The very
beggar
will prate of better days, deriving a strange
satisfaction
from contrasting his former prosperity with
his present debasement, and those who have nothing
to boast of in the present, or little to anticipate in the
future, revert to the past for consolation. Most
especially
is this the case with those who derive their sole
claim to respect from antiquity of descent, and
modestly
appropriate to themselves all the exploits, good,
bad, and indifferent, of their forefathers, although, if
the truth were fairly told, there is scarcely one of
these residuary legatees of renown, that looks back
into the family history, who would not find it stained
with actions which, did he really feel himself
identified
with his ancestors, would light up his face with
the blush of shame. But the Habingdons have never
figured in the tempest of war, or the dead calm of
peace, and if they could not boast of illustrious
actions
,
were free from the infamy of illustrious crimes.
From the manuscript family chronicle, which
commenced
with the first of their ancestors who learned
to write, and in which were carefully recorded the
marriages
,
births, deaths, and other remarkable events, it
appeared that during this long period of eight hundred
years, the estate had passed in direct descent from
father to son; and that the respective proprietors had,
without exception, been once, at least, in their lives,
foremen of the Grand Jury. It is also especially noted
that in the reign of Henry the First one of the
Habingdons
repaired a window of the parish church at his
own expense; and that another at his death
bequeathed
a mark to aid in the support of a charity school.
The most illustrious of them all, however, was one
who was a justice of the peace, and a churchwarden,
and who on divers occasions acted as deputy to the
high sheriff of the county, as will distinctly appear,
from the history of the ancient borough of Slimbridge,
now extinct, in five quarto volumes. No wonder the
Habingdons were proud of their descent, and eschewed
upstart wealth and mushroom titles.
Though the original patrimony of the family had,
according to the manuscript record, comprised land
enough for William the Conqueror to enrich two or
three of his beggarly barons, and maintain a
stupendous
herd of swine, it now consisted of little more
than three hundred acres, which the generous Norman
had suffered the ancient proprietor to retain as a
reward
for not grumbling at being despoiled of the rest.
It was the peculiar hereditary boast of the family, that
they had thus, for so long a period of time, invariably
held up their heads and maintained their position
among the gentry of the county. Whether from
some providential dispensation, or that the breed was
nearly worn out, is difficult to decide; but it is a
remarkable
fact sustained by the manuscript record, that
not one of the proprietors of the estate, after so great a
portion was appropriated by right of conquest, ever
had more than two sons. The eldest, in order to keep
up the family dignity, was always the sole heir,
though by some peculiarity of tenure, the property
was not entailed, and of course a gentleman, while
the younger, if there chanced to be one, was
invariably
an idler, and being too poor to marry, lounged
about the house and neighborhood; hunted, drank,
and Philandered with bar-maids and country lasses,
finally died a bachelor, and was buried by the side of
his forefathers. The daughters, if not married in good
time, usually entered a nunnery, so long as these
refuges for desperate maidens flourished in England.
If there ever was a family that had preserved a
blameless
existence throughout so long a period, during
which the world had been so often tempest-tossed by
political and religious revolutions, it was that of the
Habingdons, not one of whom, up to the time in
which our story commences, had ever been
sus-per-col
,
or obliged to flee his country for felony, treason, or
patriotism.
The present head of this ancient, though not very
illustrious race, was Everard Habingdon, who might
lawfully aspire to the dignity of an Esquire, which he
justly observed was much more ancient than those
mushroom titles which had sprung up amid the
corruptions
of the feudal system. He was a harmless
person; rather reserved, if not actually shy;
somewhat
of a scholar; a little of an astrologer; still more
of an antiquary, and as loyal as a colonial official, as
might be expected from the aristocratic pretensions of
his family. But there was a still better reason. He
had written a book in defense of the
Jure Divino
, and
against toleration, in which he maintained that the
desire of liberty was the sole cause of the fall of
Adam; that the divine right of kings extended equally
to doing wrong; and that princes might with less
hazard give full liberty to men's vices and crimes than
to their consciences. In short, he was one of those
blind, wise men, who imagine that religion and
governments
will remain the same, while everything
around them is changing.
After thus publicly committing himself, there was
no room for backsliding; and though, next to the laws
of Edward the Confessor, he cherished a profound
respect
for
Magna Charta
, which venerable old
parchment
had been not a little signed by James the First,
as well as his successor, yet did the old gentleman
continue
to the end of his days a pattern of loyalty, a
perfect exemplification of the doctrines of passive
obedience
and non-resistance. It cannot, however, be
denied that his principles were once grievously assailed
on a certain occasion, during one of those Royal
Progresses, not uncommon in the reign of Elizabeth
and James, when the sovereign was accustomed to
honor certain special favorites with visits that nearly
ruined them, his cattle, teams, and laborers were all
put in requisition in behalf of the royal vagrant, who
was exempted from the ignominy of making
compensation
by virtue of the prerogative. But with all these
foibles of the age, he was in the main an honest,
good-tempered man, full of the milk of human
kindness
towards all mankind, except Crop-ears, Papists,
Republicans, and Frenchmen.
The posterity of Squire Everard Habingdon was an
only son, now just arrived at manhood, who was
called
Harold, after his grandfather, of whom honorable
mention would be here made, had not his life passed
like a ship over the sea, or a bird through the air,
without leaving a trace behind. They were the last
of their race, the father and son. Every other branch
of the old family tree had withered, dropt off, rotted,
and mingled with its parent dust.
The Squire had in the downhill of life committed
suicide on the family dignity, after the manner of many
discreet old bachelors, and took to wife a buxom,
blooming
country damsel, who had approved herself eminently
useful in keeping his house in order, as well as
attentive
in time of sickness. And here we must beg
permission
to remark on the egregious vanity of some
would-be wise men, who imagine there is such a thing
as the enjoyment of perfect freedom in this world, and
who therefore studiously avoid entering into the bonds
of matrimony, in the hope of escaping that species of
government which, though not noticed by Aristotle, or
his commentators, is supposed to be of primitive
origin. The great law of attraction pervades all
nature
,
and the constituent parts of the universe might
as well rebel against it, as man attempt to resist its
power. He may for a time, perhaps, escape that
species
of witchcraft which is the common attribute of
women, who have, for that reason, in all ages been
singled out as the peculiar victims of superstition and
ignorance; but his time must come at last, and some
blooming handmaid, or plump, middle-aged
house-keeper
,
will sooner or later avenge her sex by
exercising
despotic sway over the refractory sinner, who
pretended
to hold them in defiance.
Squire Everard Habingdon is a case in point. Just
as he arrived at that age, beyond which it is said a
man never improves, the great law of attraction began
to operate with irresistible force, and in despite of
eight hundred years of uninterrupted, unimpeachable
purity of blood, did he marry a damsel without a
pedigree
,
and who, it is greatly suspected, had not a drop
of Saxon blood in her veins. By this fortunate slip
new life and spirit was infused into the old, lazy
current
,
which had for so many ages slumbered in the
bodies of the Habingdons, and thrown great doubt on
the theory of Dr. Harvey. There is nothing like
crossing the breed; and if the present race of kings,
throughout all Christendom, would only follow the
example of Squire Habingdon, there is every reason to
believe their posterity would be both physically and
morally greatly improved.
Be this as it may, Harold, the sole issue of this
union of opposites, was a striking exception to all his
ancestors on record, and foreboded a revolution in the
house of Habingdon. He was of a hardy, courageous,
energetic, and determined spirit; but these qualities,
as is not very unusual, veiled themselves under the
appearance, and indeed reality, of a cool, quiet,
demeanor
,
approaching humility. Yet the current of his
feelings, though it scarcely murmured or rippled, was
deep and strong. He had passed some time at Oxford,
the most loyal and orthodox of universities; but
having tweaked the nose of a scholar who insulted
him, and who was son to a nobleman, the patron of
sixteen livings and four fellowships, and refusing to
apologize, he was expelled as contumacious, and
returned
home. The Squire, in accordance with his
doctrine of passive obedience and non-resistance,
would have had him attempt to reinstate himself by
complying with the requisitions of his college; but
Harold, though hitherto the most docile and obedient
of sons, demurred on this one occasion, and his
obstinacy
proved invincible. From this time he occupied
himself either in desultory reading, in rambling in
lonely solitude, banqueting, or rather starving on
his own thoughts, that rose and died away without
leading to action, and bearing on his shoulders the
most grievous of all burdens except remorsethe
leaden weight of unoccupied time. Thus he lived,
unacquainted with himself and unknown to others;
nourishing that quiet, latent enthusiasm which formed
the basis of his character, until called upon to mingle
in the strife of men, and take part in that terrible
conflict
now approaching a crisis, between the prerogative
of the king and the rights of the people of England.
The little estate of Habingdon lay in a remote part
of England, where Puritanism had made no
inconsiderable
progress. Though persecuted by the dominant
church according to invariable custom, until the new
world set an example of toleration to the old, that
indomitable
spirit, so essential to the existence and
progress
of a new sect, which, like a strange bird in a
poultry-yard, is sure to unite all the established
denizens
against it on a first appearance, enabled them not
only to resist the tide of persecution, but make, at
length, inroads on their persecutors. The milder spirit
of the age had abolished the rack, the stake, and the
fagot in England, yet the ruling church still
flourished
the cat-o'-nine tails of star-chamber fines, spiritual
censures, imprisonment, stripes, and pillory. It did
not actually inflict martyrdom, but contented itself
with slitting noses and cutting off ears. Still, like
certain hardy plants, that only grow more sturdily
for being crushed under foot, the severe doctrines of
the Puritans continued to advance as irresistibly as
the tide of the ocean, and only rose the higher for the
barrier that opposed them.
The elder Habingdon scorned these Crop-ears, as he
called them, with his heels, and so did the younger,
who had imbibed a deep-rooted prejudice, amounting
to antipathy, against these obstinate schimatics, at
Oxford, the very hotbed of loyalty and orthodoxy,
where it is said pedantry is often mistaken for
learning
,
and bigotry for religion. The retired situation of
this part of the country proved, however, favorable to
the growth of the new sect, and meetings, known by
the opprobrious epithet of conventicles, were
occasionally
held in the neighborhood. It so happened that as
Harold was one morning strolling away from home at
random, and without any settled purpose, except,
perhaps
that of killing time in a retirement that afforded
little amusement and less excitement, he unexpectedly
came upon one of those unlawful assemblages. He
was roused from his reverie, at first, by the distant
moanings of a monotonous hymn, that broke on the
silence of a calm summer day with a simple melody
that harmonized with the scenery around, which
exhibited
only the unstudied graces of nature in her
birth-day attire; and, attracted by the sound, quietly
approached the wood whence it proceeded, where he
found a number of plain country people of both sexes
and divers ages reverently listening to a preacher, so
different in appearance from all he had ever seen or
heard, that his attention was at once attracted, and he
unconsciously became an auditor, notwithstanding his
contempt and dislike of his associates.
He appeared without any of the insignia of a
Protestant
clergyman. Instead of a gown and band, he
was dressed in coarse materials fashioned after the
garments worn by the country people at this period,
and both his language and manners announced that
he had not been drilled into the etiquette of the
established
church. His face was pale and stern, bearing a
striking expression of intellectual as well as moral vigor.
He wore a black velvet cap, which covered his ears
but left his brow exposed, and addressed his little
audience
in a voice equally melodious and powerful.
He spoke of the corruptions of the times; the
profligacy
of the higher ranks, and the laxity of morals
among the people who had been led away by their
example
.
He declaimed bitterly against the innovations
of the established church, and the persecution of those
who were seeking to restore the purity and simplicity
of the apostolic times. To illustrate this last, he
reverted
to his own labors and sufferings. He bared his
arms and showed the marks of manacles on his wrists;
he pointed to the stripes he had endured, the scars of
which remained indelible on his shoulders; and finally
pulling off his cap, the audience, which listened and
gazed in reverent silence, perceived that he was
destitute
of ears.
These, he exclaimed, with almost supernatural
vehemency, these are the testimonials of the
sincerity
of my faith, and the truth of my doctrines;
these are the rewards I have received for following the
dictates of my heart and my understanding. These
badges of infamy, which in better times marked for
contempt and abhorrence the lowest, most atrocious
offenders against the peace of society and the rights
of their fellow-creatures, are borne by one who, though
standing as a criminal before the throne of grace, and
humbly hoping for pardon, is innocent of any crime
against his brother man, for the welfare of whose
immortal
soul he is ready and willing to lay down his
life, and triumph in the sacrifice. For myself I care
not, for I knew and was prepared for all, and more
than I have suffered. Butand here he pointed
towards a sober-looking matron, by whose side sat a
young woman plainly attiredBut look you there
those whom I love and cherish above all earthly
treasures have shared my sufferings and disgrace.
They have been dragged from the peaceful fireside of
our humble home, and carried away like the
daughters
of Israel, to herd with criminals, and be insulted
by turnkeys and jailors; they have been reviled,
outraged
,
yea, smitten by brutes in the shape of men, and
II was compelled to look on, unable to afford them
help or consolation, except by appealing to Heaven,
and offering up my prayers.
But think not, my brethren and sisters,
continued
he with increasing fervor, think not that I complain
of my sufferings in the cause of truth and piety. It
is one of the inflexible laws of the Most High that all
good here as well as hereafter must be purchased by
sacrifices; and as a pure and holy faith is the greatest
of all sublunary blessings, so must it be attained by
the greatest of all human inflictions. Let none that
hear me be afraid; let none despair of better times,
because they are not already come. Remember that
the black cloud charged with the bolts of heaven is
the harbinger of a brighter sunshine, and that after
wandering through the deep shadows of the cold and
chilly wood, we suddenly enter the region of light
and warmth. Believe meI say, be sure that the
period is close at hand, when the oppressor shall be
laid low, and the beneficent Messiah reign in place of
the tyrant.
At this moment, when the listening group was
wrapt in the silence of breathless sympathy, the
preacher was interrupted by a loud voice, exclaiming:
Who talks of the tyrant? He must mean our
most gracious sovereign King Charles. Down with
the Crop-ear, seize him and his gaping crew. I'll
teach him to rail at the king and the church. He
shall be hanged for heresy and quartered for treason.
A posse of peace officers, as by courtesy they were
called, at the head of which was Master Justice
Shorthose
,
the author of the foregoing speech, now rushed
forward into the midst of the affrighted group, which
was taken by surprise. A few of the most alert made
their escape into the wood, but by far the greater
number were captured, and among the rest our friend
Harold, who had been so wrought upon by the
crop-eared
preacher that he was completely taken by
surprise
.
But if this had not been the case, he was of
a mettle that never stomached running away. The
Justice, who knew him well, was one of those pliant
tools of power, who have been so often described that
it is scarcely worth our while to sketch his character.
It is sufficient to say that he was ignorant, servile and
tyrannical; and that he had a most stupendous idea
of the dignity of his office, considering himself the
immediate
representative of his most sacred majesty
King Charles the First. He recognized Harold among
the stricken pigeons, and exclaimed
'Slife, Master Harold Habingdon, are you among
the Crop-ears? Are you, too, a convert to the
whipping-post
,
the pillory, and the jail? Pray how long is it
since you aspired to the martyrdom of losing your ears?
Does your worthy father know of your conversion?
To this insulting address, Harold at first scorned
any reply; but recollecting the delicacy of his
position
,
and the severe laws against conventicles, he at
length condescended to explain his appearance on this
occasion in the confident expectation of being released.
But he reckoned without his host. Master Shorthose
was a magistrate who knew but one law, to wit, the
will of his superiors, and held himself bound to carry it
into effect without discrimination, though in so doing
he outraged every principle of justice. He listened
with dignified gravity, and responded as follows:
And so, Master Harold, you came here
accidentally
,
and listened from sheer curiosity. Don't you
know that curiosity is a great crime in these perilous
times, and that a man listens at the risk of losing his
ears? 'Slife, sir, you have incurred a prmunire.
A prmunire, Master Justice? How can that
be? There is no occasion for warning me to appear,
when I am here in my own proper person.
Well, then, you have incurred something quite as
bad, and that is all the same. You are caught at a
conventicle, listening to treason and blasphemy, and
that is, as it were, becoming an accomplice in the eye
of the law, being as how it was your duty as a loyal
subject to have stopped your ears and run away. I
shall carry you to jail with the rest of the elect, but
hope, for old acquaintance sake, you will escape
without
being stuck in the pillory, or losing your ears, like
yonder preaching rascal.
Let me tell you, Master Justice, quoth Harold,
let me tell you, sir magistrate
'Slife, whom do you call sir magistrate? I am no
knight, that you should thus dub me; and what do
you mean by addressing me with, `let me tell you,' as
it were in defiance? Let me tell
you
, sir, that I
represent
his most sacred majesty King Charles of
blessed
memoryno, not of blessed memory, but he will be
in good timeand that you insult him in my person,
which being, as it were, the shadow of the substance
of royalty, is equally sacred.
My good sir, began Harold
Good sir! 'Slife, do you confound me with the
vulgar commonalty, by addressing me as you would a
clodhopper? It is as much as telling me I'm no
better
than I should be.
Well, if you won't hear
Well! is that the way you speak to the king's
representative
?
Could you not add, your honor, or
your worship, or something smacking of mine office
and authority?
In two words, then, answered Harold, half vexed
and half diverted at the tenacity with which the
Justice
asserted his dignity; in two words, since you
demur to my style of addressing you, I shall merely
say, that if it so please your worship, I will
accompany
and make common cause with these good people.
Common causegood people! Very well, sir,
this will bring you within the statute, which says
Hemhem. But come, Master Roundhead, march.
I am no Roundhead, and you have no right to call
me so, quoth Harold, somewhat nettled.
'Slife, sir, I have a right to call you what I please
in the king's name. Come, Master Habingdon, if that
pleases you better. You shall accompany me to town
with these good people, as you call them. You shall
be lodged in jail with these good people, and it shall
not be my fault if you don't pay handsomely for
being caught in such good company. Come, this is
the best way; marry, why? because it is the only one.
Come alongI wouldn't be in the skin of your ears for
all the fees I have received since the accession of his
sacred
majesty King Charles the First of blessedhem!
Saying thus, master Justice Shorthose placed
himself
at the head of the posse, and marched his convoy,
consisting of some eighteen or twenty persons of both
sexes, to the neighboring town, where he triumphantly
lodged them in prison, there to await the justice of
their country.
2
CHAPTER II.
Israel Baneswright, the Crop-Eared Preacher and his Family
Zeal and Bigotry often mistaken for each otherHow Great
Changes are often brought about in the Opinions of MenGrand
Perspective View of Justice ShorthoseMisfortunes never come
single, as Harold experiencesTrial and Sentence of the
Crop-Ear
A
Disagreeable Instrusion, and a Prophecy fulfilledA
Separation
,
and Harold's Feelings thereupon.
As
these were times when jails were apt to be
crowded, Harold was deposited in the same room with
the preacher, who, at the instance of the Justice,
announced
himself as Israel Baneswright, of Boston, in
Lincolnshire, at which his worship rubbed his hands,
and exclaimed:
O ho! I've heard of you before. You are famous
among the elect for abusing his sacred Majesty
through the nose, and dubbing the bishops wolves in
sheep's clothing. Instead of calling the Pope
anti-Christ
,
as every good Christian should do, you bestow
that title on our great defender of the faith, Archbishop
Laud, who I honor next the king himself. You are
the man for faith without works, but, i'faith, I'll work
you. I see you've lost your ears, but, by good luck,
your nose is still amenable to the law, and as all your
treason and blasphemy escapes through that organ, it
is but just it should suffer the penalty.
Say your say, and do your worst, Master Justice,
replied Israel Baneswright, I am prepared to suffer
in the good cause, sustained as I am by a power
superior
to the archbishop or the king.
Hear him! cried the Justice, in wrath; Hear
him'Slife, I'll teach the Crop-ear who is the
strongest
before I have done with him. Clap him in irons,
and see that he does not escape by a miracle.
Angels have sometimes ministered to the relief of
the saints in time of sore jeopardy, replied Israel,
reverently
,
and one thing I know, that whatever I am
doomed to suffer by the divine will, that will shall
enable
me to bear.
Hear him again, cried the Justice, appealing to
his officials. The blasphemer has the presumption
to question the power of the head of the church, and
place his conscience above the authority of the king.
Gag the Crop-ear, that he may spout no more treason
in the face of the representative of majesty and
justice
.
The officials obeyed with orthodox alacrity, and
Master Shorthose departed with his followers, locking
the door, and leaving the two delinquents alone.
Without thinking of, or perhaps not caring for the
consequences
,
Harold forthwith removed the gag, and the
first use Israel made of the recovery of speech, was to
thank him for his kindness. Gradually they fell into
discourse, and Harold perceiving that Israel took it for
granted he was one of his followers, immediately
undeceived
him, by relating the manner in which he
had become involved in the same predicament with
himself.
You came to scorn us then, said Israel, with a
look and tone of mingled disappointment and
displeasure
.
No, rejoined the other, not in scorn; I came
by accident, and remained from curiosity.
Israel paused a few moments, as if communing
with the inward man, and seemed somewhat in doubt
and perplexity. But proselytism is the invariable
concomitant of zeal. In all this world of seeming
inconsistencies
,
there is not such a jumble as that mass
of motives which prompts the actions of men and
shapes their course of life, which often seems directed
by the mere waywardness of the will. Hence many
things appear extraordinary and beyond belief, though
in reality there is nothing improbable in this world,
but actions without motives.
Israel Baneswright was the son of a clergyman of
the established church, who, besides fattening at a
stall in the Cathedral of Durham, held a plurality of
livings in various parts of the country, so distant from
each other that it was physically impossible for him
to perform the duties of shepherd of the flock to all of
them. He was both loyal and orthodox in the
highest
degree, as in duty bound, and having the
advowsion
of one of his best livings for this his only son,
had educated him accordingly in the strictest tenets
of the Pharisees, as the Crop-ears irreverently called
them. After going through the necessary preparation
he was sent to the university, where he studied
diligently, at times, though his conduct was
occasionally
not a little irregular. He was exceedingly
self-willed, and often took the bit between his teeth,
when neither tutor nor proctor could restrain him.
Among his fellow students was Oliver Cromwell,
whose youth little indicated his future character and
destiny, he being at that time more famous for his
pranks than his prayers. Similarity of tastes and
habits produced a college intimacy between the future
Protector and the future field preacher, cemented by
various frolicks that subjected them to various degrees
of punishment. It is recorded that they once
performed
together in a play, got up in honor of King James
the First, on a visit to the university, called The
Marriage of the Arts, which, according to an old
chronicler, was too grave for the king, and too
scholastic
for the auditory, (or, as some have said, that the
actors had taken too much wine before they began.)
His Majesty being heartily tired, after divers yawns
offered to withdraw. At length being persuaded by
some that were near to him, to have patience till it
was concluded, least the young men should be
disheartened
,
he sat down much against his will.
Whereupon these verses were made by a certain
scholar:
At Christ Church marriage played before the king,
Least that those mates should want an offering,
The king himself did offerwhat, I pray?
He offered twice or thrice to go away.
The profane career of Israel was, however, suddenly
arrested. About this time, Puritanism began to show
itself in this stronghold of orthodoxy, and more than one
student became infected with the heresy. Among these
was Israel, who, through the native ardor of his
character
,
suddenly passed from one extreme to the other.
He at once adopted the Puritan creed, dress, deportment
and every other peculiarity of these extraordinary
people
,
who seemed expressly formed for bearing the bright
torch of Christianity, civilization, and liberty, into the
wild recesses of a new world. He caused his hair to
be cropped, accommodated his dress to the severe
simplicity
,
and his deportment to the staid, sober
self-denial
of the strict models of the sect, and talked openly
of the downfall of anti-Christ's kingdom, the creation
of a new heaven and a new earth, new churches, and
a new commonwealth together.
Expulsion naturally followed such bold defiance of
the statutes of the university; and the worthy
Pluralist
,
his father, indignant at this enormous backsliding,
on his return home, proffered him the alternative of
the thirty-nine articles, or disinheritance. Parental
affection and parental authority, kindly exerted, and
pursued with perseverance, might, perhaps, have
restored
Israel to his mother church. But, unhappily,
it but too often happens, that in the enforcement of
what they believe to be the truth, men lose sight of
those unchangeable and eternal truths which
constitute
the basis of our most sacred duties. Men may
differ on speculative points, but it is believed that no
one in this latter age would think it either Christian
or humane to banish a son for differing in opinion with
his father.
Israel was obstinate, his father inexorable; and
thus one of the holiest of all human ties was severed
forever. They parted never to meet again, and Israel
became a houseless wanderer on the face of the earth.
Impelled by zealperhaps aided by necessity, he
turned field preacher, trusting to the pious gratitude
of his followers for food and raiment. He became
accustomed in time to rely on the immediate
intervention
of Providence for the relief of his wants; and
finally, in the temerity of his faith, married one of his
female disciples, at the moment that he was without a
home, and destitute of every hope save that which
animated his enthusiastic spirit.
That he was a firm believer in the faith he preached,
and that all his deeds and doctrines were the result of
conviction, cannot be reasonably doubted, for this was
demonstrated by the sufferings he endured for their
sake. It is not in human nature to sustain what has
been so often inflicted for difference of opinion on
points of faith, without being braced by that inward
conviction which seems to spring from the secret
whisperings
of the divinity himself, and is the only test of
truth to which mankind can directly appeal.
Hypocrites
never become martyrs. This grand tribunal of
conscience is, without doubt, sometimes, nay often,
perhaps always, subject more or less to the influence
of self-love, the great moving principle, which is most
directly assailed by persecution. What costs us most,
is most dear to us; and that for which we sacrifice all,
is everything.
The faith of Israel Baneswright had grown up
against wind and tide, and the force by which it was
assailed only increased its power of resistance. It
passed the bounds of zeal, and had grown into a
rigid, inflexible bigotry, amounting to
uncompromising
intolerance. Persecution makes bigots, and bigots
make persecution. Though his humanity might have
revolted from inflicting on others the sufferings he
himself encountered for a difference of opinion, still he
shrank with pious abhorrence from the idea of
permitting
to others that toleration which he demanded for
himself and his followers. Stimulated at once, by the
ardor of conviction, the hope of being instrumental in
the conversion of a sinner, and of adding to his flock
one of somewhat higher rank than most of those who
as yet composed it, he at once with all that enthusiasm
which alone achieves miracles, commenced an attack
on the High-Church principles of his fellow prisoner.
The design of this tale is not to enter into
polemical
discussions, which too often end in biting
sarcasms
or bitter denunciations, equally unbecoming
the subject and the occasion. Suffice it to say, that
at the end of a long controversy, Harold remained
unchanged
,
and Israel spent his eloquence in vain. As
usual in such cases, that feeling of fellowship which
arises from community in misfortune, subsided into a
coolness approaching dislike. Harold looked on his
companion as a bigoted exclusionist, and Israel, on
the other hand, considered him one of his persecutors.
Yet was Harold not a man who suffered his
feelings
to be embittered so far as to make him forget the
common offices of humanity, which were never more
necessary than in behalf of these unhappy
conventiclers
.
The jailer was a dependent on Justice
Shorthose
,
and sought to gain his favor by adding insult to
the hardships he daily inflicted; and the petty
underlings
followed their leader. Like all persons of
little
and ignoble minds, they were over-zealous in
emulating
their betters; and it is notorious that of all
tyrants there is none so intolerable as the slave.
These miserable tools who, after all, give the sharpest
sting to that whip of scorpions wielded by
persecution
,
were, or pretended to be, devotedly attached to
church and king, under whose broad mantle they
sheltered their petty malignity.
Harold soon perceived that the anxieties of his
companion
were less for himself than his wife and
daughter
,
of whose destiny he could learn nothing since
their separation. He never failed to inquire of the
jailer and turnkeys as opportunity offered, but was
answered, for the most part, by bitter taunts, or
significant
hints of what would happen on the return of
his worship the justice, who was absent hunting the
2*
Crop-ears. He could gain no information, but such as
served to increase his solicitude. There was in his
bosom a feeling still more powerful than that of
enthusiasm
.
He was devotedly attached to his wife and
daughter, who had shared his disgraces and sufferings,
and who merited his affection by their tenderness,
patience and devotion. He pined for their society,
and all his prayers were for them.
Nor was Harold without his troubles. On being
lodged in prison, he debated within himself whether to
apprise his aged father, who was laboring under the
weight of years, as well as of a long protracted
infirmity
which was dragging him by inches down to the
grave. The good man had lost his buxom helpmate,
years before our history commences. The decayed old
trunk had outlived the verdant vine that twined around
it, and now stood bare and desolate, nodding to its
fall. Though aware that his sudden disappearance
would excite the most painful apprehensions, at home,
Harold also knew that such was the bigoted devotion
of his father to church and state, that he would never
forgive his son for attending a conventicle. After long
reflection, however, he decided to send to his father,
partly to relieve his worst apprehensions, partly in the
hope his interference might procure his release.
For some days he could procure no messenger, it
being contrary to directions of Justice Shorthose for
any one to carry a letter or message from a Crop-ear.
Nearly a fortnight elapsed, and his anxiety to hear
from home had become in the highest degree painful,
when one day, on repeating his solicitations to be
allowed to send a message to his father, the jailer
informed him with a grin, the messenger would have
a long way to go, for his father on hearing he had
become a Crop-ear, had sunk under his afflictions
of mind and body, and been laid in his grave, a
martyr to the backslidings of his only son. Regardless
of the shock which this information occasioned, he
proceeded to inform him with a look of peculiar
satisfaction
,
that Master Justice Shorthose, having
communicated
his apostacy to the proper authorities, a
heavy fine had been laid on the estate by the High
Commission Court, and a pursuivant, under special
supervision of his worship, was now in possession of
the house, till the fine was paid. Such were the
consequences
resulting from accident, and the indulgence
of a mere whim of curiosity. Well may man humble
himself in the dust when he every day sees himself
the sport of trifles in themselves less than nothing.
Harold Habingdon, though abstractedly a stern
devotee of passive obedience and non-resistance, was
one of those men that cannot be crushed, and never
fall of themselves. Whatever might be his feelings,
he gave them no utterance; and when Israel attempted
to console him, he could scarcely perceive that he
required consolation. He remained unruffled as before.
But his outward seeming belied the spirit within. He
felt the death of his father, which left him, as it were,
alone in the wilderness of mankind; and the wrongs
inflicted on himself became more galling, from the
reflection that they had shortened the days of his only
parent. It was now, for the first time in his life, that
he began to question in his inmost mind, the truth of
that creed which sanctioned such injustice, as well as
the legitimacy of the authority by which it was inflicted.
He had previously met with some of those famous
declarations of Parliament which so ably asserted the
rights of the people; and though they came directly
in conflict with the principles he had imbibed from his
earliest youth, still they had imperceptibly undermined
his prejudices without his being as yet conscious of
their operation. But having never heretofore suffered
from the practical consequences of these arbitrary
principles, their intrinsic deformity was not brought
home to him, and he had continued to bow implicitly
to the slavish doctrine of passive obedience and
non-resistance
.
Now, however, he began to feel the galling
of the chain, and what his reason had refused to
sanction
,
was realized by actual suffering.
Previous to his capture and imprisonment, he would
have shrunk from the idea of any limitation to the
authority of the king, but that of his own will, and
promptly taken arms in its defence, if necessary.
But now all the long cherished series of hereditary
impressions descending from generation to generation,
gathering new strength by the way, and centering in
his person, together with the precepts as well as
example
of his father, and all those with whom he
associated
,
were gradually swept away. The conviction
was at length brought home to his door by sad
experience
,
that as man is a being of imperfect virtue and
wayward will, that will should be circumscribed by
impassible barriers. He had not as yet become quite
a Republican; but the course of his reasoning as well
as feelings, was calculated to lead to that result in the
end.
His High-Church principles, too, were sensibly
shaken by the same personal experience of the
consequences
arising from their practical application; since
he could not but perceive that the hardships they
inflicted
on himself and others, were the joint issue of a
domineering church, and a despotic king, mutually
aiding each other in oppressing the people. He
became
at length aware of what all history demonstrates,
that the worst species of tyranny is that which
arrogates
to itself the sanction of Holy Writ, and seeks to
sway the reason of mankind by the infliction of
corporeal
suffering, or the withholding of civil rights.
Of all despotisms that of ecclesiastical bigotry
supported
by civil and military power, is the most rigid and
unrelenting.
While this mental metamorphosis was
imperceptibly
going on, events bearing closely on the future
destinies
of Harold had taken place. Master Justice
Shorthose had during this period been looking through
a perspective at the end of which stood tho old manor
house of Habingdon. The powers of this class of
officers
had been greatly extended for the purpose of more
effectually executing the severe laws against the
Puritans
,
and they had become for the most part the petty
despots of the fireside, entering houses, seizing
persons
,
and inflicting punishments on the lower orders
with as little regard to their rights, as the Star
Chamber
and High Commission Courts paid to those of a
more dignified class.
The Justice had already attracted the favorable
notice of these renowned tribunals by his zeal and
activity
,
and received some of the crumbs that fell from
the great men's table. Thus his fervor was
quickened
by the hope of gain, as well as power, the love of
which is, perhaps, more insatiable in the petty official
than the higher functionary. From the period of the
infliction of the heavy fine on Harold, Justice
Shorthose
had thought he perceived a fair prospect of
obtaining
possession of Habingdon, and in order to pave
the way to the gratification of his wishes, now changed
his deportment entirely towards his prisoner. He
took frequent occasion to express his deep regret at
having so precipitately seized and conveyed him to
prison, and at the failure of all his efforts to procure
his release. He insinuated the inflexible rigor of the
higher powers towards persons of his degree when in a
similar predicament, and the absolute necessity of
paying his fine as a preliminary to his release from
prison. He offered from pure regard to the memory
of his deceased father, for whom he had always
cherished the sincerest regard, to advance the
necessary
sum, in case Harold found it difficult to raise it,
on the spur of the occasion; and finally, with the
appearance
of great candor, advised him not to make
himself more obnoxious to those who had the power
as well as the will to crush him to the earth, should
he prove refractory.
With a view to soften the cool rigidity of Harold
towards
him, he was somewhat offensively officious in
pressing upon the young man various little
indulgences
;
and perceiving the strong interest he now
began
to take in the misfortunes of Israel Baneswright
and his family, permitted his wife and daughter to
pass the day in the room allotted to himself and the
preacher. This arrangement of course brought Harold
into the society of Mistress Baneswright and her
daughter; and as usual, similarity of situation, aided
by community in misfortune, produced a more than
ordinary cordiality. Harold had never before paid
any special attention to the appearance of the latter,
and was not now particularly struck with her
appearance
.
Her face had little remarkable in its features, and
her figure, clothed in garments neither fashionable or
costly, presented in its sober simplicity an outline that
though not ungraceful, was without any special
attraction
.
Her complexion was very pale, and its
expression
sad and touching. It was impossible to look
at her, without an inward conviction that she had been
inured to suffering. Her eyes were black, and though
glazed with sorrow, still at times lightened up with
sparkling flashes; and her hair, though disposed after
the ungraceful manner of her sect, was glossy as well
as exuberant. Perhaps the most touching of her
attributes was a voice of mournful melancholy, sweet
as the sighing breeze; and when, after a few days'
association she spoke to Harold of the long series of
hardships her family had endured, it was with a sad,
touching pathos, exquisitely affecting. She was
pious, but never declaimed; devout without
ostentation
;
and resigned without insensibility.
For the first few days, she spoke but little, and
that little addressed to her parents. But soon
perceiving
the deep interest Harold took in their
misfortunes
,
and at the same time sympathising with his
own, they gradually fell into an easy intercourse, like
that of brother and sister. They usually conversed
on the subject of their situation, which naturally led
to a communion of feeling, as their fortunes seemed to
have thus become strangely associated. In the course
of these conversations, Susan Baneswright perceived
with a sigh which she believed, and perhaps she was
right, originated entirely in spiritual considerations,
that Harold, though imprisoned as an accomplice, was
not one of her faith. Accordingly, by a tacit
understanding
,
they mutually avoided the rock on which
so many good feelings have been wrecked, and refrained
from all attempts to convert each other.
But with one whose zeal, like that of Israel
Baneswright
,
had been quickened instead of quelled by
persecution, it was next to impossible to be thus
domesticated day by day, without occasional allusions
to the cause of his sufferings. Without directly
addressing himself to Harold, he would speak of the
persecutions himself and family had suffered, for
following
the dictates of their conscience, and guiding
others into the path of righteousness. In the course
of his conversations he would sometimes enter into
details of miserable petty oppression, and wanton
outrages
inflicted under color of law, that awakened all
the sympathies of his heart in behalf of these helpless
women, and excited the deepest indignation against
those who, under pretence of vindicating the gospel of
peace, outraged every principle of Christian
benevolence
.
By frequently listening to these revolting
relations, and at the same time associating with these
victims of ecelesiastical tyranny, his previous
impressions
became greatly strengthened, and he at length
arrived at the conclusion that a persecuting church
was an instrument of man, not of his Maker.
As the time passed away, Harold began to find it
gradually becoming less irksome and oppressive. He
no longer pined for his lonely home, for he had now a
gentle, pleasing companion by day, and a subject for
nightly contemplation, when, as often happened, his
memory would recall the placid yet affecting
countenance
of Susan, earnestly gazing on him with a look of
saintly sorrow, as if lamenting that though joined
together by accident and misfortune, they were
separated
by their creeds. His latter days had been so
lonely and contemplative, and his thoughts so full of
abstractions, that hitherto those affections that form a
part of the very nature of man, had only been
awakened
in imagination. It is scarcely to be wondered at,
if being thus daily associated with a young woman,
who although not beautiful, was by nature fair, as
well as attractive, and whose situation called forth his
deepest sympathy; who by her sufferings had excited
his pity, and by her patient endurance called forth his
admirationhe should gradually be awakened to a
feeling more profound and lasting. He at last became
conscious of his situation, and would probably have
disclosed himself to Susan, but that being confined to
the same small apartment, and perpetually in the
presence
of her parents, he could do nothing more than
resort to that universal language which seems equally
understood by all civilized, as well as savage beings
by childhood, youth, and old age.
Meanwhile, Justice Shorthose had been sedulously
at work to induce Harold to permit him to advance
the money to pay his fine, on the security of a
mortgage
on the estate of Habingdon. But he found the
young man every day becoming apparently more
indifferent about the affair, and on one occasion being
more earnestly pressed for a decision, Harold declared
with bitter solemnity, that he would rather rot in jail
than voluntarily submit to such illegal exactions, by
doing which he should virtually acknowledge their
justice. Master Shorthose who had only remitted his
zeal for a purpose he now perceived was unattainable,
hereupon resolved to bring matters to extremity.
According
he caused Harold and the Baneswrights to
be brought before him for judgment, trial being out of
the question, as he judiciously observed, he himself
having witnessed their delinquency. This is called
Lynch Law.
It was a scene at which humanity might weep, and
justice shut her eyes, had she not already been blind.
Harold and Israel stood stiff and lofty, while the wife
and daughter, with folded arms and downcast eyes,
awaited the result with pious resignation. The
Justice
sat in all the stateliness of awkward dignity,
surrounded by his subordinate officers, grinning in
mockery, and having directed his clerk to read the law
against conventicles, gravely observed that being
himself
a witness to the offence no other proof was
required
.
Here he was interrupted by Israel, who
declared
no proof was necessary, as he acknowledged,
nay, gloried in his vocation, which he was fully
assured were imposed upon him by Divine ordination.
Silence! cried the JusticeI must at least go
through the forms prescribed by statute, and
sanctioned
by His Grace the Archbishop of Canterbury,
who is not only Primate of England, but Primate of
all
England. I don't want your confession unless
accompanied by atonement and amendment. 'Slife,
Master Crop-ear, do you mean to insult the King's
representative, by pretending to confess what he saw
with his own eyes? Do you mean to insinuate that
I am blind and deaf too, that I did not see and hear
you? Your confession is an additional offence, and
shall be remembered in your punishment. But to the
point. Here, clerk, give me the book. So, now, most
reverend apostle, you say you are a preacher of the
gospel. Will you promise to read this to your
congregation
that
is to say if you have any next Sunday,
if I let you go?
Israel took the volume, opened it, and finding it to
be The Book of Sports, as it was called, so
obnoxious
to the rigid Puritans, hurled it from him with
indignation, at the same time exclaiming
Read itread that accursed work of
abominations
the
book of Satan, which converts the holy
Sabbath into a holiday for sinners! I'd rather read
one of those profane stage plays, some of which, and
these among the most abominable, are written by men
who call themselves ministers of the gospel. Let it
be read at Bartholomew Fair, for verily I will not
pollute
my lips with such scum of iniquity.
Silence! again roared the Justice, or, though it
be not in the statute, I will, by virtue of that
discretion
which appertains to me as being the
representative
of both church and king, order that foul tongue of
yours to be cut off, that it may utter no more
blasphemy
.
Silence, I say, and listen to your sentence, as
becomes a contumacious sinner.
I will not be silent, answered Israel, it is my
calling to speak, and I will speak while I have breath
to declare the word of truth, and protest against the
devices of the ungodly. Lift not your beseeching
eyes to me, my poor shorn lambs, said he, glancing at
his wife and daughter, for I am called to fight the
good fight, and have girded my loins for the combat.
Be not afraid; a little while longer we may be hunted
like wild beasts of prey; a little while longer we may
be insulted, buffetted, striped, imprisoned, and exposed
to worldly shame. But hold up your heads, my
darlings
,
and look to Heaven for that justice which yet
for a time, a very brief time, I trust, is banished from
this land which boasts of its freedom, while it seeks
to enslave the mind. He who is justice itself will
not forever permit injustice to triumph, for that would
carry with it the utter degradation of His creatures.
Yea, cried he, as his feelings gradually waxed
into enthusiasmYea, verily the time is coming; it
is close at hand; it is already come. England is
about to smoke with bloodthe blood not of bulls,
and goats, and sheep, but of men. For every wrong
shall be a victim; for every pang inflicted on the flock
of the Shepherd, He shall smite the aggressor with fire
and sword. For every drop of blood that hath been
drawn by stripes and mutilations, rivers shall flow
over the devoted land. For every earthly good we
must pay the purchase. But when the welfare of the
immortal soul is at stakewhen not alone the
salvation
of the present, but of countless generations yet to
come, is in imminent jeopardy; when our greatest
goodthat which is as high above all sublunary
blessings
as heaven is above earthis to be attained, the
price, like the benefit, is inestimable. Their must be
martyrs to seal with their blood the sincerity of their
faith. Every sacred drop that flows from their veins
into the ground, nourishes some goodly seed of piety
into a stately tree that casts its shadow afar. Blood
is the great libation of man, the seal of his bond of
faith.
In times like these one martyr will not suffice.
When nations sin, nations must atone. There must
be hecatombs, thousands, yea tens of thousands of
victims, not as heretofore wasting on the burning pile,
or quivering on the rack, but offering up their lives on
the field of battle where alone the great contest is to
be decided, and crimes of rulers expiated by the blood
of their people. As for me, I am but a worm, and
they may tread on me if they will. If I am not
worthy of martyrdom, stripes may suffice. I am
ready, Master Justice. Be quick. The past has been
yours, the future is in stronger hands than those of
the archbishop and the king.
This was poured forth with a vehemence and
rapidity
,
that for the time not only silenced the Justice, but
caused him to quail before the despised Crop-ear. He
soon, however, rallied his dignity, and as is natural to
little and malignant minds, revenged himself for his
temporary awe by exercising that discretionary power
the law allowed him, in the infliction of a severer
punishment on the person who had subjected him to
the mortification of being cowed by a Crop-ear, in the
presence of his officials.
What!he at length exclaimedyou are a
prophet as well as a priest? 'Slife, I suppose you will
set up for a king soon. Can your reverence, in the
spirit of prophecy, predict what is going to happen to
yourself, as you have what is going to befall the
nation
?
Constable, take him to the Great Hall of the
Prison; give him thirty-nine lashes well laid on; slit
his nose, as his ears are
non est;
and then let him
depart
in peace on his mission of grace.
It may be as well to remark here, in explanation of
the choice of the prison hall, instead of the market
place, or some equally public situation, for the
punishment
of Israel Baneswright, that of late the Justice
had been greeted with very significant tokens of public
dissatisfaction, on occasions of similar exhibitions of
Christian benevolence. Or, perhaps, he might have
become a convert to the opinion that appeals to the
imagination are much more effectual than to the
senses, and private executions far more effectual in
preventing crimes than public examples.
But what shall I do with the women, your
worship
?
asked the constable, grinning.
O! I had forgot the flock in providing for the
shepherd. Let me seehemayeyesthey shall
have the pleasure of looking on while the ceremony is
performing, and be punished by sympathy. Justice
should be tempered with mercy. As for you, Master
Harold, you will remain in jail till your fine is paid,
or the prophecy of the inspired preacher fulfilled.
Away with them.
The wife and daughter of the unfortunate field
preacher remained throughout the whole of this
wicked
mockery of justice in the dead silence of
resignation
,
or despair. They had undergone a long series of
suffering; and if providence does not always temper
the wind to the shorn lamb, it often makes amends by
tempering the shorn lamb to the winds. They neither
wept, nor wrung their hands, nor cried aloud, though
their hearts were bleeding, and their limbs scarcely
able to support them. Yet amid all their sufferings,
and they suffered much, it was apparent that there
was within some potent influence which sustained
them in the hour of sore trial. Pale as the ghostly
shadow conjured up by fear or superstition; helpless
as the dove in the claws of the hawk, they awaited
the execution of the sentence.
Harold was almost maddened by mingled love and
indignation; but the conviction that his interference
would only serve to provoke the Justice to new
inflictions
of petty malice, choked him into silence. He
looked on while the preparations were making, with a
terrible serenity, ever and anon casting a glance at
Susan Baneswright, which, even at this sad extremity,
sunk into her heart, and was long afterwards
remembered
.
Israel awaited the infliction of the sentence
with manly resignation; casting his eyes towards
heaven, and clasping his hands together, he exclaimed:
Lord, Lord! how long wilt thou suffer this?
The preparations were made; the scarred shoulders
of Israel exposed; the executioner brandished his
cat-o'-nine
tails, and eagerly awaited the order to begin,
while the two desolate females placed their hands
before
their eyes, that they might not behold what they
were thus compelled to witness.
At this moment a confused hum of many voices,
followed by loud shouts mingled with angry threats,
and equally angry expostulations, was heard without
the prison. Anon, the sound of heavy blows, and the
tugging of men engaged in hot contention, succeeded
this war of words. In a few minutes the outer door
was assailed with thundering violence, and finally
yielding, gave entrance to a band of rustics armed
with iron crows, scythes, stakes, flails, bill-hooks, and
other rural weapons. Justice Shorthose was at first
struck dumb at this unceremonious intrusion; but
soon recovering his self-importance, demanded in a
tone of authority mitigated by a slight fit of trembling,
what they wanted, and how they dared approach his
presence accoutred in this manner. A stern-looking
man, bearing an appearance of plain respectability,
thus answered
We are come to release these poor harmless
prisoners
,
the victims of laws enacted by bigotry, and
enforced
by tyrants. It depends on your present
conduct
whether we are not likewise come to punish the
miserable instrument of oppression, though our object
is higher game.
'Slife! answered the Justice, a little relieved
from the immediate apprehension of personal violence,
'slife, sir, don't you know you are flying in the face
of the law and insulting the dignity of his sacred
Majesty
,
together with his Grace the Lord Archbishop of
Canterbury, by whose authority these pestilent
Crop-ears
have been apprehended?
The king's most sacred Majesty, said the other,
3
with a grim smile, and his Grace of Canterbury,
are by this time, I opine, flying from the face of an
injured people.
What mean you by that, sirrah? Do you dare to
spout treason against the king, in the presence of his
representative. I'll commit you, sirrahyou shall be
carted, whipped, ridden through the streets on a rail,
pilloried at the market place, lose your ears, and
be hanged, drawn and quartered into the bargain.
A low, menacing murmur, accompanied by a
suppressed
laugh, was the response to this outbreak of
the Justice, who was not a little daunted at the ill
success of his harangue, as well as the look of cool
defiance
with which it was met by the person to whom
it was addressed. He valued himself not only for his
eloquence, but his singular acuteness in detecting a
culprit by his physiognomy, and often boasted he
could tell a rogue from sheer instinct. The
confession
of the face, he maintained, was more conclusive
than that of the tongue. On this occasion, however,
he was altogether at fault. The intruders, with the
exception of their spokesman, were plain country
people
,
with ruddy cheeks, and faces expressive of nothing
but honest simplicity.
The person who appeared to be the leader of the
band paid no further attention to the Justice, but
quietly directed his followers to release all the
prisoners
without exception, as it was impossible to
distinguish
the innocent from the guilty. Accordingly
the keys were demanded of the jailer, who called all
present to witness that he acted under durance. A
detachment being sent on this errand, Justice
Shorthose
employed the interim in a last effort in behalf of
his majesty and the archbishop.
'Slife, Master CropI saythat is to say
what was I saying? I say Master
What-d'ye-call'em
,
do you know what you are about? You are
breaking the laws in twenty different placesthe law
spiritual, the law temporal, the law civil, and the law
military. You are violating Magna Charta which
saithhemI saywhat was I saying?
It matters little what you say, quoth the other,
as the party detached for that purpose came in with
the prisoners, we are but of the commonalty, yet
were always good, peaceable subjects, who respected
the law while it afforded us protection against
authority
unjustly assumed, and exercised without mercy.
The despotism of the law may be as oppressive as that
of the will; and had not mankind sometimes resorted
to those rights which belong to our nature, and cannot
be alienated, the whole world would long since have
been inhabited only by slaves.
'Fore heaven, this is a new doctrine, grumbled
the Justice, it sounds very much like treason,
sprinkled with a little heresy, I think.
Treason? Know, Master Shorthose, when a
whole people rise against oppression there are neither
rebels nor traitors.
The indignation of the Justice at the bold
annunciation
of these doctrines overcame his fears. He
denounced the intruders by every epithet of
opprobrium
he could muster on the spur of the moment, and
his catalogue was pretty extensive; summoned the
posse comitatus
in vain; and adjured his most sacred
Majesty to witness his total incapacity to resist these
lawless intruders. Little attention was paid to his
harangue, and the prisoners, among whom, of course,
were Israel and his family, quietly departed under the
escort of their deliverers. Harold, too, was offered his
liberty, but declined it coldly, not being able
thoroughly
to overcome his reverence for the law, though
smarting under its infliction. As Israel left the hall,
he emphatically said to him, assuredly we shall
meet again. His wife bade him a warm, but
chastened
farewell, but the daughter was silent. A single
look passed between Susan and Harold, as they
parted
,
whether ever to meet again depended on the
chapter
of accidents, in which is contained a large portion
of the history of man.
CHAPTER III.
A Short Foray into the Domain of HistoryHarold in great
Jeopardy
Interposition
of Providence in the Disguise of Old Gilbert
TavernerJustice Shorthose and his Officials AbscondA Secret
concerning Susan BaneswrightHarold in great Perplexity, from
which He is at length Relieved by the Interposition of Dan Cupid
He Becomes not only a Roundhead, but a Republican, and
Abjures
Passive Obedience and Non-Resistance for ever.
It
is not our intention to enter into a history of the
times, any further than as the course of public events
exercised an influence over the fortunes of those who
figure in this narrative. If we may be permitted to
speak in our own behalf, we would, with all due
deference
to the public taste, insinuate an opinion,
that the jumbling together historical facts and
fictitious
occurrences in one inextricable tissue, cannot but
operate to the great prejudice of truth, by confounding
those readers, at least, who are not sufficiently
qualified
to separate the actual from the imaginary
occurrences
.
And this is still more likely to embarrass the
reader, when the author is sufficiently familiar with
past events to preserve the semblance of history by
avoiding all anachronisms; by selecting for his actors
persons who really figured at the time; exhibiting a
few of their leading characteristics, and being so
correct
in many particulars that when he deviates into
fiction the reader is scarcely aware that he has got on
the ice, and is no longer walking on solid ground. It
is unhappily too true, that history is, for the most
part, but a reflection of the feelings and prejudices
of the writer, and therefore cannot be explicitly relied
upon as a faithful picture of past times or
occurrences
.
In its earliest stage it is a fable; in its progress
a romancefounded on fact; in its maturity it may,
perhaps, be relied on as a chronicle of events: but of
the real causes, and most especially of the secret
motives
which actuated the prime agents who gave them
life and motion, the world can gather little from
history
but contradictions leading to doubts which
cannot
be solved. Still it is proper there should be some
standard of belief as to the past, and historical works
afford the best we have. It would, therefore, seem it
were better that they should not be mixed up and
confounded
with fiction, or that when the writer is about
to give the rein to his fancy, he should candidly
apprise
the reader, in order that he may be properly
prepared. The chaste muse of history should not be
dressed up in meretricious ornaments, but come forth
in all the simplicity of truth, without spot or blemish.
The most mischievous falsehoods are adulterated
truths. But we are delaying the courteous and
impatient
reader, who will doubtless excuse our making a
slight inroad upon history, although it be against our
conscience. It is a great feather in the cap of an
author, if, when doing what he thinks wrong, he can
prove clearly that he knows better.
In order to explain the sudden liberation of Israel
Baneswright and his followers, it is necessary to
revert
to the crisis by which it was brought about.
The events are doubtless familiar to all, and therefore
a few words will suffice. The despotic pretensions of
James the First, though only those to which the
English
nation had quietly submitted under the reigns of
his immediate predecessors, were attempted to be
enforced
on a people who had undergone great changes
in the meantime. The despotism of Henry the Eighth
was as complete as that of William the Conqueror.
By becoming head of the church he had united the
civil and ecclesiastical powers of the state, in the
exercise
of which he met with no opposition from a
succession of the most servile parliaments that ever
disgraced England; and by the suppression of
religious
houses he had obtained a fund for purchasing a
venal nobility, which, in the long wars of York and
Lancaster, had lost all traces of principle or
patriotism
.
His successor was a child in leading strings,
who was followed by a woman, called Bloody
Mary by her embittered opponents, but who, we
suspect
,
was not half so bad as she has been represented,
and whose reign was a struggle between religious
factions
.
Elizabeth courted the people and bullied their
representatives. She effected popular measures, but
in general her acts were those of an absolute
sovereign
,
and she treated parliament with little more
ceremony than her father, Henry the Eighth, who,
when that body ventured to hesitate about suppressing
the lesser monasteries, sent for the members, and told
them he would have the bill to pass, or take off
some of their heads.
But the reformation of religion was accompanied,
or rather preceded, by a revolution in the human
mind, which had been silently, slowly, and surely
advancing in knowledge and intelligence. Great
revolutions, destined to exert a lasting influence over
the condition of mankind, are the invisible agents of
Providence, operating unheeded and unsuspected until
ripe for execution. When all is prepared, the dead
calm which usually precedes the convulsion gives
place in an instant to the whirling tempest. The long
buried genius of change emerges to light full grown,
and the moment of its recognition is that of its
triumph
.
Henry the Eighth was merely the instrument.
The Reformation would have eventually conquered
without his aid. But the puny mortal who only
floats with the current, is often mistaken for the
omnipotent arm that directs the stream.
Reformations in the church are sure to be preceded,
accompanied, or followed, by an extension of the
franchises
of civil liberty, because they both proceed from
the expansion of the human mind to which all creeds
must more or less accommodate themselves, if not in
substance, at least in outward forms of administration.
Hence, when in the reign of James the first the
Protestant religion became confirmed in its ascendancy
in England, those political principles of freedom which
always grow up and strengthen in the struggle.
between contending parties, began to exhibit their
sensible operation. The despotic claims of James were
discussed, questioned, and at length opposed; those of
his successor resisted by Parliament, which at length
becoming assured by repeated examples, that no faith
could be placed in the concessions of the king, and that
the only possible mode of retaining those rights he
had only conceded through necessity or fear was to
divest him of the means of reclaiming them,
determined
to resort to the last appeal if necessary. The
question whether the command of the Militia should
be at the disposal of the Parliament or the King
brought matters to the issue. Neither dared to yield;
for the command of the militia in the absence of a great
standing army which has since superceded it in
England
,
would in all probability finally decide the contest.
The only alternative was acquiescence or war.
The King erected his standard at Nottingham, and
Parliament passed an ordinance for raising an army,
accompanied by a vote of supply. England was in
arms against herself. The elements of civil and
religious
dissention were in utter confusion. Arms
superseded
laws, and the civil authorities could no longer
preserve the peace of communities. This was most
especially the case in the remote districts which were
the scene of events just related, where dissenters
abounded; and no sooner did the news arrive that
civil strife had actually commenced, than a party of
3*
those who had frequently attended the exhortations of
Israel Baneswright, gathered together, proceeded to
the jail, and released him, as set forth in the preceding
chapter. Thus it is that extremes beget each other,
and that the abuse of authority is the parent of
anarchy. Having thus briefly, we hope, prepared the
way for what has passed, and what is to come, we
shall resume the thread of our story.
After the departure of the Crop-ear and his
followers
,
Justice Shorthose solaced his rage and
mortification
,
by divers insulting hints and innuendoes directed
against Harold, now the residuary legatee of his wrath,
and who he was pleased to consider a party in the
outrage against his most sacred Majesty in the person
of his doughty representative. As yet ignorant of the
commencement of hostilitiesfor news did not then
travel by telegraphhe resolved to make Harold the
scape-goat for all the rest, and ordering him to be
safely locked in his old quarters, left the prison full of
sound and fury.
Harold passed the remainder of that day and the
ensuing night without food, except for the mind, and
that was somewhat bitter. Accustomed to the daily
society of Israel and his family, his present loneliness
lay heavily on his spirits; and his probable eternal
separation from Susan added greatly to its weight.
He anticipated new acts of oppression from the
discomfited
Justice, and prepared himself for still greater
exertions of fortitude and patience. From the period
of the departure of Justice Shorthose, not the sound of
a human voice, or passing footstep, had he heard.
The prison was as silent as the mansions of the dead,
and the striking of the great clock in the hall was the
only sound that met his ear. He passed a
sleepless
night, and rose in the morning with a feeling of
depression he had never experienced before.
The customary hour of breakfast passed without
its appearance; the dinner hour came, but no dinner;
and he laid himself down at night under an
apprehension
that made his blood run cold, having tasted
neither food nor water throughout the day. In the
meantime the dead, dreary silence continued, and he
felt like one abandoned by the world. During the
lapse of his second weary, wakeful night, he at times
fancied he heard the distant shouts of human voices
in the town, but they soon died away, and even the
barking of the dogs ceased, as the black clouds
encircled
the moon and hid its silvery light.
The next day, and the next, passed in the same
manner, with the same dead silence, and the same
abstinence. He now began to experience the usual
effects of protracted hunger and thirst. When he
attempted to walk his limbs faltered, his head grew
dizzy, his sight vague, and objects indistinct. By
degrees his brain waxed weak and visionary, for lack
of that which is equally necessary to body and mind.
A crowd of indistinct images arose, which, though
they prevented his dwelling intensely on the reality of
his situation, aggravated his sufferings by the
addition
of imaginary auxiliaries. His repose was nothing
but half-waking, half-sleeping dreams, of chrystal
springs and plenteous feasts, so that he might be said
only to awake to the tortures of Tantalus.
While his strength enabled him, he watched
constantly
at the only window of his room, which looked
into the interior, where was a small yard, enclosed
with a high, massive wall, beyond which lay the open
fields. But not a soul was stirring there. Sometimes
he knocked at the door with all his strength, and
called
for aid. But no one heard, and no one answered.
He seemed destined to perish by famine, alone in the
midst of his fellow creatures. Every day added to
his weakness, and at the same time his restlessness;
for though ordinary hunger seeks oblivion in sleep,
there comes a time when the starving wretch is
deprived
of that solace; when the brain becomes
affected
,
and the powers of nature being exhausted, death,
not sleep, is the only refuge.
On the morning of the sixth day, after a sleepless
night, during a great part of which all consciousness
of present suffering was lost in the medley of horrors
that floated in the chaos of his unsettled brain, as he
lay on his miserable pallet in that state of almost
unconsciousness
which happily accompanies a mind and
body exhausted by extreme suffering, he was recalled
to a sense of his situation, by fancying he heard the
footsteps of some person along the narrow passage
outside of his door. The instinct of nature, rather
than any distinct perception of his position, roused
Harold to a last effort. He called out in a feeble
voice, and essayed to rise from his bed; but no
answer
was returned, and the footsteps died away in the
distance. Again he relapsed into his former state,
and sank down on the bed from which he had partly
risen. After an interval of a few minutes, he
distinguished
the sound of returning footsteps, and, as
he imagined, the jingling of keys. Hope now
re-animated
his waning strength, and he had managed to
raise himself so as to lean against the wall, when he
heard the turning of a key and the grating of hinges,
as the door opened. He was too weak for joy; but
the sudden revulsion of his feelings overpowered him;
a film came over his eyes, and he sank down in a
state of almost complete insensibility.
He fancied he heard some one calling him by name
in a voice hallowed by long past remembrances, and
though he strove to answer, his words died away in
inarticulate murmurs. By degrees the film passed
away from before his eyes, and he thought he
perceived
a figure bending over him, whose face seemed
familiar. The process of returning recollection was
very slow; for nature was almost exhausted, and
hung to life by a single hair. But the voice of one
lamenting over his sad condition, that voice of
kindness
and sympathy which can almost call us back
from the grave, was at length recognized as that of a
grey-headed domestic, whose life, together with that
of a long line of forefathers, had been passed under
the roof of Habingdon. Harold addressed him in a
feeble whisper, and the old man, comprehending his
situation, procured refreshments, which were
cautiously
administered, until in due time he was
conveyed
to his home.
Many days elapsed before Harold recovered
sufficiently
to leave his bed, and totter to the window,
there to inhale the sweet morning air, and enjoy the
beauties of what almost seemed a new world spread
out before him. Every object appeared invested with
a new and inexpressible charm, and the music of the
birds was as the voice of long lost friends welcoming
him home again. In the course of his convalescence
he learned the mystery of his unaccountable desertion
in prison, which at times he had ascribed to the
malice
of Justice Shorthose. But with all his manifold
offences the Justice was innocent of any intention of
starving his prisoner. He did not scruple at inflicting
stripes, and his conscience would go to the length of
slitting noses, or cutting off ears; but to do him
justice
starvation was beyond the sphere of his depravity,
which, in fact, proceeded less from nature than the
union of sectarian zeal with a vehement desire to
make himself agreeable to the higher powers that set
him the example.
The truth is, that on quitting the prison, after the
forcible abduction of his prisoners, he had been so
hooted and pelted by the townsmen, who had many
old scores to settle with him, and were withal incited
to violence by the example of King and Parliament,
that he was fain to seek shelter in the house of a
relative
,
whence he made his escape in the middle of the
night. To make an end of this important personage,
who will appear no more in our history, we will
shortly state for the gratification of the curious
reader
,
that he remained the most loyal of subjects until
after the battle of Naseby, when he turned
Round-head
,
cropped his hair, prayed, not in secret, and
exhorted
vociferously. Thus he continued till the
restoration
,
when, happily shielded by his insignificance
from the consequences of his backslidings, he came in
with the full tide of loyalty, and was rewarded by his
grateful sovereign after the manner of that merry
monarch.
The Justice having absconded, the jailor, and other
officials who had become equally distasteful to the
townsmen, followed his example, and departed
without
taking leave. Thus the prison was left solely to
the occupancy of Harold, who remained unnoticed,
either because no one suspected his being there, or
that he was completely forgotten in the ferment of
that civil commotion which might now be said to
monopolize
every thought and feeling. That he did not
actually perish from hunger, was owing to a mere
accident
,
or as Israel Baneswright always affirmed, a
special interposition of Providence. However this
may be, thus it was.
The old house of Habingdon on being taken
possession
of by the pursuivant, was cleared of all the
servants
except one Gilbert Taverner, the old household
factotum, who was permitted to remain partly for the
purpose of being useful, partly to save appearances.
The others found a home or employment elsewhere,
and did not trouble themselves about the affairs of
Harold. As to old Gilbert, he shrank with the
natural
timidity of servitude from meddling with what
did not come within the sphere of his household
duties, and most especially from all intercourse with
Master Justice Shorthose, who was as much the terror
of good, as evil doers. He was a perfect man
machine
,
and had been for at least half a century moving
exactly in the same circle, doing the same things, at
the same hour, and in the same order of succession,
without thinking of any other earthly matter. He
revolved like a planet within the inflexible sphere of
attraction, and it is said never forgot to strap his
master's
razor but once in his youth, when he was sorely
smitten with the milkmaid. Gilbert was totally
ignorant
of the abdication of the Justice, the town being
six miles from Habingdon, a distance he never
travelled
even in imagination.
Thus matters stood while Harold was suffering the
most painful infliction to which man perhaps can be
doomed, when a stranger made his appearance in the
town, inquiring for Master Harold Habingdon, and
proceeded towards the residence of that young man,
according to the directions given. The first person he
met on arriving there was Gilbert, to whom he
presented
a letter from Israel Baneswright, for his
master
.
Gilbert referred him to the prison, but was
answered by the messenger, that the prison was
empty, and the Justice as well as his officials run
away. The old man was somewhat startled from his
orbit at this information, and it was sometime before
he could comprehend the exigencies of this new
predicament
.
At length rallying his dormant faculties,
he bethought himself of consulting the messenger
who sagely advised him to proceed forthwith to town
and inquire what had become of the young gentleman.
By this time Gilbert had so far recovered himself, as
to detect in the costume, close cropt hair, and nasal
twang, a veritable Roundhead in the person of his
visitor. As a faithful servant, he felt himself bound
to follow in the footsteps of his deceased master, and
was accordingly a devoted disciple of the doctrine of
passive obedience and non-resistance. He waxed
exceedingly
wroth and bitter on thus recognizing one of
the king's enemies; absolutely refused to receive the
letter, marched into the house, and slammed the door
in the face of the messenger, who could just
distinguish
the word Crop-ear, uttered with bitter emphasis.
Hereupon he threw the letter into an open window,
and departed, chanting a godly hymn in stout defiance.
When Gilbert Taverner became cool again, his
mind reverted to young Master Harold who had
succeeded
his father in the affections of the old man.
He straightway entered into a deep and rather
confused
cogitation concerning the course proper to be
pursued on this occasion, the result of which, though
it went greatly against the grain, was a determination
to follow the advice of the Crop-ear, and proceed to
the town for the purpose of ascertaining the fate of
Harold. But still he shrunk from this daring exploit,
and ever and anon relapsed into doubt or despair.
I am a perfect stranger in these remote parts,
thought he, and who will clean the knives, or set
the table, while I am away at such a distance?for
be it known that Gilbert, though his old master was
dead, and his young master no one knew where,
continued
to go through the regular course of his duties,
from the mere force of habit.
Thus he remained as it were at a stand amid
conflicting
eddies. He whistled, and fidgetted about in
great perplexity what course to pursue; but at length
habit got the better of all competitors, and he
insensibly
found himself occupied as usual in the daily
routine
of household duties. Having gone through
these with satisfaction to himself, he was at leisure to
attend to the affairs of his young master, and after a
deal of hesitation accompanied by abundance of wry
faces, at length resolved to adopt the suggestion of the
Crop-eared messenger. Accordingly, having secured
the silver spoonsa family heirloomlocked the door,
and put the key in his pocket, he procceded to town
for the purpose of ascertaining the fate of Harold. The
result of his mission has already been detailed.
The letter from Israel Baneswright was filled with
fervent exhortations to join heart and hand in
maintaining
civil and religious liberty, which were now to
stand or fall together. It was written with all that
fiery eloquence of enthusiasm which, when excited
in a righteous cause is irresistible, and when in that
of error, potent for mischief. But not a word was said
about his wife and daughter, nor did the date of the
letter give any indication of the place of his
sojourning
.
The mind of Harold had, during his
convalescence
,
dwelt intently on his present situation and
future prospects. The uprising of the people in the
neighborhood had frightened away the pursuivant
who held possession of Habingdon, and the death of
his father had left him master of himself as well as
his property. He was, on one hand, swayed by the
powerful influence of hereditary feelings or prejudices,
call them what you will, as well as by the habits of
his life, the bias of education, and the force of
example
;
on the other by having not only seen, but
suffered under the abuse of power in his own person;
doubts, almost amounting to conviction of the
legitimacy
of that authority which could be perverted to
the purposes of oppression; and what was perhaps
still more influential in turning the scale, a quiet,
deep-rooted affection for Susan Baneswright, his
fellow
sufferer under oppression.
But Harold possessed a weighty and capacious
mind; a temper though warm and energetic, qualified
by the power of restraint and conviction. He was
accustomed to deliberate long and coolly on subjects
of great concern; and it was only when thoroughly
convinced, that he acted with a prompt enthusiasm
little suspected of forming the basis of his character.
He drew the bow and took aim deliberately, but the
arrow once sped, could never be recalled.
While still in doubt as to his future course, he was
surprised by a visit from Israel Baneswright, who
seemed to have been wrought up to a state of
excitement
amounting to wild fanaticism. He scarcely
allowed
time for the usual salutations, when he entered
on the only subject that occupied his heart.
Why art thou here, O man of little patriotism,
and still less faith? Is this a time for a son of
England
to skulk within the walls of his father's house,
while others are abroad in the field, shedding their
blood in defence of those rights of which if secured he
will equally partake, and which if lost must render
him an abject slave to the will of a fellow worm? Is
this a time to stand an idle spectator, while the
great question is about being decided, whether or
not the mind and body shall be equally crushed
under the heel of power, and the reason of man be
no longer applied to the concerns of either earth or
Heaven?
Sluggard, why standest thou here all the day
idle? Dost thou not know that thy mother is
struggling
in the arms of the ravisher, and calling on her
children to rescue her? All is at stake and thou art
doing nothing. Awake! arise!Gird on the sword;
or if thou canst not wield a sword, go forth like David
with a sling and a stoneor go forth with thy naked
arm, for the Great Jehovah is on thy side, and the
courageous, determined spirit is more potent than the
sharp-edged steel, in the hands of the Philistines.
To this fiery exhortation Harold calmly replied,
My friend, I have been long considering the
subject
,
and
Considering! cried Israel impatientlyIs this
a time for consideration, when a single battle, yea, a
single arm may decide the future fate of thee and
thine, and of every man that breathes in this
oppressed
landof millions living and countless millions yet
unborn? Dost thou stand here selfishly weighing thy
petty interests, and personal ease, against the freedom
and happiness, the bodies and souls of long generations
yet to come? Dost thou not know that the Bill of
Rights, the great charter, not of the nobles but the
people, hath already been sealed with bloodthat the
blood of the righteous as well as that of the wicked
must flow in torrents ere it can wash away the sins
of the people and their rulers? A despotic king and
a persecuting church are now engaged in a desperate
struggle with an oppressed people; and when force is
resorted unto to bring about the ends of Providence,
force must decide the contest. Courage and
patriotism
on the part of mortals is necessary to prove them
worthy the assistance of an almighty arm; for be
assured
that miracles were never yet wrought in behalf
of those who were too base and degraded to help
themselves. Cowards can never be free, and man
must be inspired with the contempt of death, ere he
can hope to wrest the prize of liberty from the grasp
of the tyrant. Why art thou not in the stirrup and
the field?
Listen to me calmly, I beseech thee Master
Baneswright, replied Harold not unmoved, on
occasions
when we are about taking a decisive stepto
risk allnothing should be decided rashly. I was
going to tell you that I have for some time been
debating
with myself as to the course I should take
whether to remain neutral
Neutral!again interrupted IsraelNeutral!
Dost thou, a worm of the dust, expect to look on in
peace while all around thee is in convulsions? Dost
thou hope to crawl into the ground, and there remain
quiet while the world is rocking with earthquakes?
The whirlpool is all about thee, and dost thou think to
float round and round in endless circles, without being
at length drawn into the vortex? Believe it nothope
it not. Thou must take sides, or be buffetted by both
sides; and if neither conscience nor patriotism,
neither
reverence for thy Maker, nor love to thy fellow
man can sway thy leaden purposes, look to thyself,
since self is thine only monitor, and be assured that
so long as this strife shall last, if thou dost not declare
for either Parliament or King, thou wilt fare like the
bat in the fable, and be despised and disclaimed by
both parties.
I was about to tell you, said Harold, that I
had made up my mind not to remain neutral.
Well, cried the other impatiently.
That I had all but determined to take up arms in
behalf of the Parliament. But
Hear me, cried Israel, who could no longer rein
in the fiery steed on which he was mounted. Hear
me, young man, let me ask you one question, and be
thy answer without disguise. Dost thou not love my
daughter Susan?
I do, said Harold eagerly, with all my soul,
though I have never told her so.
Not with thy lips, perhaps; but there is another
language equally explicit. Suffice it that I noticed
the glances that passed between thee and my daughter
in prison, and more especially at parting. As a
parent it became me to question her on the subject,
and as a dutiful daughter, whose heart hath been
always open to her father, she acknowledged that
couldest thou be persuaded to walk in the way of
righteousness
,
if it pleased Heaven, she would willingly live
and die thy helpmatenay, interrupt me notbut
hear what I say, Harold Habingdon. If thou provest
craven to the just and holy cause now at issue in the
land; and above all, if thou shouldest seek fellowship
with its enemies, in the sight of Heaven I solemnly
declare, thou shalt never see my daughter more. No
son of Belial shall be a son of mine. FarewellI
shall know of thy decision. If right, thou shalt hear
from me, and peradventure we may smite the
Philistines
together. If wrong, we never meet again except
in mortal fight, for if necessary I too will become a
man of blood, in so far that I will strengthen men of
blood with my exhortations.
Saying this, Israel suddenly departed without
awaiting
any reply, leaving Harold agitated by a whirlwind
of conflicting feelings. But this did not last long, and
the tempest soon subsided into the calm of
determination
.
He resolved to join the Parliamentary forces, as
soon as the necessary preparations could be made.
Though his reason in a great measure coincided with
this decision, it cannot be denied that it was Susan
Baneswright, and not the exhortations of her father,
that decided the course of his future life. The
confession
of that gentle girl from this time guided his
sword, and animated his spirit through all the sad
vicissitudes of civil strife. The die was at length
thrown by love, who, casting himself into the wavering
scale, outweighed all other considerations, and the
cause of loyalty kicked the beam. Hitherto he had
been only the cotemporary of past ages; henceforward
he became associated with the present and the future.
CHAPTER IV.
Harold Joins the Parliamentary Forcesthe Fortunes of WarHe
Makes Acquaintance with a Man of whom there is but One Opinion,
and of Another of whom there are ManyScene on the Field of
Battle, and Exit of Israel BaneswrightChange from the Field of
Blood to the Fields of Rural LifeClebs in Search of a Wife
Finds by Chance what He Missed in Seeking.
During
the somewhat tedious recovery of Harold,
and his subsequent irresolution, both parties had been
engaged in active hostilities, unaccompanied by any
decisive result. The battle of Edgehill had been
fought with doubtful success, and the intervals of
action were occupied by negociations in which, it is
believed neither party was sincere. Mutual
propositions
for peace were made and declined under various
pretences, and it had become evident to those who
looked beneath the surface, that the contest could only
be decided by the sword. Accordingly, both parties
braced themselves for the final issue.
The Earl of Essex was at the head of the
Parliamentary
forces, and had already excited the jealousy
of the leaders of the House of Commons, by his
inactivity
,
as well as want of vigilance. Thus far the
result
of the struggle seemed extremely doubtful. The
4
King had been successful in Cornwall, and other parts
of the kingdom: misunderstandings subsisted among
the Parliamentary generals, who of course did not
cordially co-operate: and it was daily becoming more
evident, that Essex, as well as several other noblemen
who had taken arms against the King, were not
exactly
on the side of the people. Though ready to oppose
the despotic claims of Charles, so far as they interfered
with their own exclusive privileges, they were by no
means prepared to strip him quite bare of his
prerogative
;
and without doubt, by this time began to
perceive
,
or at least suspect, that if finally successful, the
popular leaders would not stop at a redress of
grievances
.
In short, they began to fear for themselves and
their order. A people struggling for freedom can
never place any just reliance in those who monopolize
in a great degree the benefits of the abuse of power;
nor should they ever choose them for leaders. The
chief of a revolution which has for its object the
attainment of equal rights, rather than a mere change
of dynasty, should be a child of the revolution, sharing
the sympathies, partaking in the grievances of the
people, and claiming a legitimate right to command,
not from superiority of rank, but of talents, vigor and
patriotism.
Harold had left home on horseback, placing his
domestic affairs in charge of honest Gilbert, who
continued
to set out the dinner table every day at the
same hour, and in the same manner as if his master
was present, until at length, perceiving with great
surprise
,
that no one attended, he relinquished the practice
in despair. It is said, with what truth we know not,
that he afterwards occupied the dinner hour in
wandering
about the house as if looking for somebody that
was missing. The reader may perhaps question the
prudence of Harold in leaving his affairs in the hands
of old Gilbert. But it was in fact Hobson's choice; he
had neither kindred, acquaintance, or friend around
him; and in the confusion of the times, perhaps justly
concluded that upon the whole he might as well trust
to Providence and Gilbert.
The journey of Harold was devoid of incident or
accident
,
and he joined the Parliamentary forces, at that
time encamped on Turnham Green, under the Earl of
Essex. The royal army was close at hand, the King
having taken advantage of a negociation for peace then
in progress to make a rapid march upon the city of
London, in the course of which he surprised two
regiments
of the hostile troops, which were cut off almost
to a man. Being admitted a private in a troop of horse
attached to the Train Bands, he at once entered on
active service. A battle was hourly expected, and
Skippon, the sturdy leader of the Train Bands, composed
of London apprentices, in anticipation of this event, took
occasion to address them in the following pithy and
characteristic words: Come, my brave boys, let us
pray heartily, and fight heartily. I will run the same
fortunes and hazards with you. Remember the cause
is for God, for the defence of your wives and children.
Come my boys, let us pray heartily, and fight heartily.
Such was the spirit which animated a large portion
of the Parliamentary army, and it is not to be
wondered
at that they ultimately conquered. Religious
enthusiasm had been arrayed against the sentiment
of loyalty; and devotion to the King was met by the
far more powerful influence of devotion to a higher
power. The love of liberty was combined with the
enthusiasm of religion, and the two united proved
irresistible.
That a great majority of the Puritans of that age
were sincere in their professions, notwithstanding the
charge of hypocrisy so often urged against them by
the Loyalists, and reiterated by succeeding English
historians, we think can scarcely be doubted.
Cromwell
may have been a hypocrite, though this appears
extremely doubtful; but his followers were
unquestionably
sincere, as they proved on various occasions by
freely sacrificing themselves on the field of battle. If
any additional proof be required, let us cast our eyes
towards the band of Pilgrims, who sacrificed their
country, home, kindred, friends, and all those
associations
of early days that cling closest to the heart of
man, to seek the far distant wilds of a new world; to
cope with danger, death and famine; to struggle with
the wintry winds; to war with the fury of wild beasts
and the wiles of savage men; to labor in the fields,
and worship in churches with arms in their hands, and
meet the trying exigencies of a keen, inhospitable
climate
,
divested of all the common comforts of life. To
doubt the sincerity of these were to question the faith
of the primitive martyrs, who offered up their lives on
the wheel or at the stake, and sped their last breath
in songs of triumph.
But to resume our narrative. To the
disappointment
and disgust of his army, Essex, it is said by
the advise of some of the noblemen who served under
him, strenuously opposed by that of a majority of the
others, instead of offering battle to the King while
facing
him for several hours, suddenly wheeled about, and
retreated to London, without being pursued. His
subsequent
conduct was such as to increase the suspicions
already entertained by his partisans, and inspire the
enemy with new hopes of final success.
Without entering into a detail of the events which
succeeded, and in which Harold was not immediately
concerned, we shall content ourselves with noticing the
skirmish of Chalgrove Field, in which the conduct of
Essex was again equivocal and unsatisfactory. An
excursion of Prince Rupert from Oxford, the
headquarters
of the King, had alarmed the neighboring
counties, and the Parliamentary forces were eagerly
following him, as he retreated laden with booty.
Among the foremost on this occasion was the patriot
Hampden, who though an officer of foot, joined a
body of cavalry of which Harold was one. They
overtook
the Prince at Chalgrove Field, and in their
eagerness
,
advancing too rapidly, were environed by the
enemy and cut to pieces. Almost at the first discharge,
Hampden had been shot in the shoulder with a brace
of bullets, and one of the prisoners to the Royalists
reported that he had seen him early in the action,
slowly quitting the field, his head hanging down, and
his arms resting on the neck of his horse.
Harold, too, had been rather severely wounded, and
on leaving the field, it so chanced that in his progress
towards the main body of the patriot army, he
overtook
Hampden, who appeared on the point of dropping
from his horse. Though in little better plight, he
endeavored
to assist him to the utmost of his power; but
the strength of both failed them rapidly, and seeing a
comfortable-looking farm house at a little distance,
somewhat retired from the road, he proposed to attempt
to gain it before they became entirely exhausted.
Accordingly
thither they proceeded, and were kindly
received
by the master of the house, who was devoted to
the same cause, though too aged to take an active part
in the struggle.
Prince Rupert, who generally lost by impetuosity
what he gained by valor, having succeeded in
reaching
Oxford with his booty, while Essex was looking
on, the Parliamentary army remained master of the
field. The situation of Hampden and Harold
prevented
their removal, and the latter found himself
companion
in suffering with this illustrious patriot, during
the brief remaining period of his existence. Though
suffering exquisite pain he maintained a perfect
abstinence
from all complaint, and apparently forgetting
himself thought only of his country. Being engaged
in the same cause, and fellows in suffering, they
occasionally
communed with each other on the state of
public affairs. At these times Harold listened with
respectful deference to the voice of wisdom and
patriotism
proceeding as it were from the grave, for it became
every moment more evident that his hours were
numbered
,
and were but few. The day preceding his death,
when the weakness of nature had overborne the
capacity
for suffering, the great patriot of England, after
long silence and deep reflection, addressed Harold, as
follows:
The die is cast, and my earthly career is over. I
could have wished to bear my part in the great contest
now at issue, and to have seen the final result,
whether
successful or not; for I did not ask myself when
I took arms against my sovereign but the single
question
,
whether or not our cause was just. It was
enough for me that England was oppressed, and that
all men have a natural right to resist oppression
however
sanctioned by precedent, or hallowed by time.
Antiquity is no warrant for abuses; on the contrary
the longer a nation has suffered them, the greater
reason
they should be relieved as soon as possible.
After pausing a few minutes to recover breath, he
proceeded
But I am called away, as it were, at the dawn of
morning, perhaps in mercy that I may not see the
darkness of the night that may succeed. For I will
not conceal from you, my young companion in
calamity
,
that my hopes diminish, in proportion as the
prospect of a successful issue in the strife of arms
increases
.
I do not fear the people, but their leaders;
for the people are ever right, except when deceived by
those they trust, and always successful, except when
betrayed. But there are among us wolves in sheep's
clothing, who I suspect will betray the flock to the
midnight robber. As might be expectedfor such is
ever the mixture of liberal and selfish motives, in all
the great, as well as little affairs in which man is the
instrumentthe noblest motives are often mingled
with the meanest. Patriotism, which is the highest
of earthly influences, is profaned by an association
with selfishness, the meanest of them all.
Already I perceive increasing symptoms of
alienation
among some of our chief leaders, and those, too,
whose rank and wealth give them the most extensive
influence; struggles among others of meaner rank,
for the spoils even before they are won; and a general
want of that concert of action, if not of opinion, which
from first to last, in all past time, has been the bane
of all parties without an acknowledged head, to whom
long established laws, and immemorial custom, have
prepared men to be obedient. The King is weak, if
not unprincipled, and in the hands of still weaker and
more wicked councillors. There is no longer any
confidence
to be placed in his word, which is the only
bond of those who claim to be above the law. He will
lose his cause, for he knows not how to fight or
negociate
;
to make war or peace. We shall, in all human
probability, gain the power to do what I and some
others had in view, when forced to seek redress by the
sword; but I greatly fear it may be so abused by
contending
factions, attaining a temporary ascendancy,
that the people wearied and disgusted by repeated
disappointments, and sick of the struggles of leaders,
whose incapacity will be only equalled by their
ambition
,
will at length be wrought upon to return like the
dog to his vomit, and restore without reservation the
same power to the same despot by whom it was
abused.
If such should be the casewhich Heaven avert!
it will speedily be followed ere long by another
revolution
,
the offspring of the first; and England will be
again doomed to pay a second price for a blessing she
heedlessly threw away. Thus, my young friend, we
who shed our blood will not shed it in vain. It will
not, like the rivers of the desert, sink into the earth
without yielding either flowers or fruits; its product
will eventually be the enjoyment of a rational liberty,
which could not have been obtained without martyrs.
With this conviction I die, and with it I die content,
leaving my motives, acts, and opinions, to the
judgment
of posterity.
These sentiments were uttered at intervals, as his
exhausted strength permitted, and when finished, the
dying patriot sank exhausted on his pillow, where he
lay some hours without another word. Thus he
quietly
passed away, apparently without pain, and without
fear. The Royalists exulted in his death, which had
rid them of their most formidable enemy; while the
opposite party mourned it as the loss of their best friend.
Like Washington, he has united the suffrage of the
4*
world in his favor. Posterity has but a single voice in
speaking of Hampden, who at one time seemed to
concentrate
in himself the spirit of the nation, and
even the historian of the Revolution, himself a
courtier
,
as well as a loyalist, who seldom ascribes other
than sinister, or selfish motives for the conduct of
friend or foe, has been compelled to yield to his talents
and patriotism the highest meed, that of unwilling
praise.
The recovery of Harold was slow and gradual; and
it was not until the opening of the next campaign that
he entered on active service, when he found great
changes had taken place in the Parliamentary army.
The self-denying ordinance, as it was called, had
excluded
a class of officers, whose zeal, if not fidelity,
had been suspected; but an exception was made in
favor of Oliver Cromwell, who was then at the head of
the army in fact. He had rapidly risen to distinction,
by a series of successful exploits; and it was the
fortune
of Harold, who had been promoted to the
command
of a troop of horse, to be frequently brought into
contact with one of the most extraordinary men of
that or any other age. Observing the quick decision,
as well as fearless courage of Harold, on various
occasions
of great exigency, Oliver attached him to his
person before the end of the campaign, during the
course of which Harold studied his character intensely,
only to become more profoundly puzzled by its apparent
inconsistencies.
The real character of Cromwell is still a mystery
partly from its own deep profundity, partly from the
bitter prejudices that are awakened in forming a
judgment. Whether a hypocrite, or an enthusiast; a
patriot, or a mere creature of selfish ambition, is a
question that will probably never be decided.
Assuredly
,
however his sincerity or his patriotism may
be questioned, none can doubt his qualifications as a
soldier, or his abilities as a statesman; and the most
loyal Englishman when he denounces him as a rebel
and a traitor, should bear in mind, the successful vigor
with which he asserted the honor of England, and
caused the most potent monarchs of his time to crouch
at his feet. England owes him more than a host of
her legitimate monarchs combined can justly claim,
and if he accepted the sovereignty he wielded it nobly.
Though leader of a band of stern enthusiasts, who in
their abhorrence of the Book of Sports, had perhaps
fallen into the opposite extreme of sour austerity; and
though he himself set the example in zeal, as well as
sobriety, yet were there frequent occasions in which
he deviated into downright buffoonery. Though in
public he was grave and reserved, in his family, and
among his friends, his conversation was familiar and
diverting. He indulged in practical jokes; he loved
the society of men of wit, and his domestic chaplain,
Jeremy White, was a great humorist. A grave old
chronicler says, Oliver Cromwell, the Protector, loved
a good voice and instrumental music well; and when
Mr. James Quin, a student of C. C. Oxford, a good
singer, was introduced to him, he heard him sing with
great delight, liquored him with sack, and in
conclusion
said, `Mr. Quin, you have done well, what shall
I do for you?' To which, Mr. Quin made answer,
with great compliments, (of which he had command
with great grace,) `That your Highness would be
pleased to restore me to my student's place,' which
the Protector did accordingly, and he held it to his
dying day.
Oliver's jokes were sometimes rather rough, it must
be acknowledged. He would occasionally, when he
suspected any intrigue was going on in the army,
invite
his inferior officers to an entertainment, and in
the midst of their jolity, order in a company of
footguards
,
with beat of drum, to whisk the dishes away,
after the manner of Doctor Pedro Positive de
Snatchaway
.
While this was in progress, Oliver pelted them
with cushions, or put live coals into their boots and
pockets; and when thus thrown off their guard by
this sportful conviviality, would wheedle them out of
all such secrets as he desired to know. When it
suited
his purpose, he spoke in a style so full of studied
perplexity, that no one could comprehend his meaning;
but when he wished to be understood, he delivered
himself with a force and vigor and clearness, that
caused it to be said of him that His every word was
a thought. But the real character of kings and
rulers, who are succeeded by those of opposite
principles
,
is seldom, if ever, fairly delineated, since
historians
are either themselves infected with party
prejudices
,
or become the organs of those that are. Thus
it has fared with Oliver Cromwell. The loyal
English
,
while they cannot help pluming themselves on
the successful vigor of his foreign policy, which laid
the foundation of their country's greatness, still
consider
him a hypocrite and usurper; while the
republicans
can never forgive him for having picked up a
sceptre that lay in his way, and appropriated to
himself
an authority that had no owner.
Under this renowned leader, Harold entered on a
career of arduous service, the particulars of which will
be passed over, as more properly belonging to history.
Advanced to the command of a regiment of horse, at
the head of which he greatly distinguished himself at
the decisive battle of Naseby, it was once more his
fortune
to be desperately wounded, near the close of the
action. He received a musket ball in the thigh, which
caused so great a loss of blood, that in a few minutes
he fell from his horse insensible, where he lay
unheeded
,
while his regiment rushed on in hot pursuit of the
flying Royalists, leaving the scene of conflict among
the living, peopled only by the dying and the dead.
Recovering his recollection after a brief interval,
and raising himself on his elbow with great
difficulty
,
he looked around with dim and glazed eyes,
rendered half blind by weakness and exhaustion.
Both armies had passed away, one in retreat, the
other in pursuit. Nothing remained but the wounded
and dying; nothing was heard but groans of anguish
and despair. Some lay stretched on the ground with
their pale faces turned to heaven; some writhing in
agony, and tearing the earth; and here and there
might be seen an expiring victim half propped up by
a dead body. Enemies and friends now joined in one
melancholy concert of moans, and those who from
fellow
subjects had become mortal foes, now once more
rested together in peace in the long armistice of death.
Thoughts like these occurred not to him, for his
own condition in a great measure occupied his mind,
and cooled his sympathy for others. He had managed
in a degree to stop the bleeding of his wound by the
application of a handkerchief; but a faintness like that
of approaching dissolution hung upon him, and as
evening was now at hand, he felt assured that if he
passed the night on the field, he would never see the
dawn of morning. From the consideration of his own
forlorn state, he was moved by a feeble voice
exclaiming
Is there any one here that knows Ambrose
Harefleet
?
Yes, answered another voice equally feeble.
Who art thou? asked the first.
Thy brother, Miles.
The Crop-earthe traitor to his kingand the
curse of his fathercried the other, his voice
strengthening
with indignation.
And thou, said Miles HarefleetThe
companion
of the sons of Belial, the persecutor of the faithful,
and the oppressor of thy fellow subjects. But alas!
this is no time to dispute the justice of our cause. The
appeal has been made to the sword and there is but
one higher tribunal. Canst thou not crawl hither, for
I cannot come to thee to exchange forgiveness and die
together.
The one brother managed, with many moans, to
crawl to the other, and they fell into each other's arms
weeping.
I forgive thee, Miles, for drawing the sword against
thy king.
And I forgive thee, Ambrose, for drawing thine
against the people. But enough of this bickering.
Though we have of late lived in discord, let us die
in peace. Let us remember we are brothers; one
mother bore, one bosom nourished, one country
sustained
,
and one God will judge us both. To-day we
have met in mortal fight, to-night we shall lay down
in peace together. Alas! my dear wife and children,
and my dear countrywhat will become of ye all?
Brother! brother! give me your hand, I am going.
The two brothers embraced, and lay for a while
locked in each other's arms, without any other evidence
of life than occasionally a low moan, bespeaking the
agonies of nature in her last struggle. In a short
time it ceased, and the silence of death succeeded.
This sad example of the deplorable consequences of
civil strife, which sets brother against brother, father
against son, and severs all the ties of nature and
society, sank deep into the heart of Harold, who often
recalled it to mind, and as often asked himself whether
even liberty was not sometimes too dearly purchased.
But such reflections were speedily banished by a sense
of his own situation. Night was now close at hand;
he could still feel the blood trickling from his wound,
and was conscious of increasing weakness. With a last
despairing effort he raised himself sufficiently to
recline
against the body of one whom he supposed dead,
but who feeling the pressure of his weight uttered a
low moan, at the same time making a feeble effort to
escape the burden. Harold turned his head towards
him, and at once recognized the pale face of Israel
Baneswright, bearing the ghastly expression of
approaching
death. He addressed him by name, but he
answered only by a groan. At length he gradually
regained his consciousness, and in a voice that seemed
to come from one whose spirit was already on tip-toe
for another world, asked who was there.
Your friend Harold Habingdon, answered the
other, and the name seemed to awaken the last spark
of life.
Thou art come too late to help me, said Israel.
Alas? I am as helpless as yourself.
Art thou too wounded?
Yes, sorely.
And in what cause? That of a tyrant king, or a
suffering people?
I serve under Oliver Cromwell.
Enoughwe will then die together; and I for my
part would die rejoicingly, did I but know that the
Philistines have been conquered and on the field where
I perish.
Thy wish is granted. The Royal army has been
defeated utterly, and chased from the field. I doubt if
it will rally again.
The news seemed to awaken Israel to new life and
energy. He raised himself partly from the ground, and
exclaimed with an enthusiasm that seemed only more
energetic from his weakness
Praise be to the Lord of Hosts! The malignant
adversary is smitten, hip and thigh; the usurping
Prelacy are sinking under the weight of a persecuted
people; the kingdom of anti-Christ is falling, and those
who have been crushed under its foot shall crush it
under their foot in turn. The great armies of Gog
and Magog are fleeing before the might of the godly.
Let us pray with Joshua, that the sun may stand still
in Gideon, and the moon in the valley of Aijalon, that
there be time to smite the Philistines, even without
mercy, as they have dealt towards the children of
righteousness.
Exhausted by the effort, he sank again to the ground
and spoke no more. Harold eagerly inquired after
Susan; but he answered not. His spirit had departed,
and the last breath of one whose temper was originally
mild and forgiving, was expended in maledictions on
his fellow creatures. Such are the effects of religious
persecution, equally the offspring and the parent of
bigotry.
By this time straggling parties of the victorious
army were beginning to return; and commencing their
first duty to their wounded fellow-soldiers, discovered
the body of Harold still among the living, but almost
drained of the fountain of life. He was borne to a tent,
where his wound was examined and pronounced not in
itself mortal, though the great loss of blood he had
sustained rendered his recovery doubtful. His youth,
a good constitution, and a patient firmness, at length
by slow degrees overcame his extreme debility, and in
due time he was able to walk abroad. Conscious,
however
,
that the lingering debility which not only
weighed
his body but his spirit to the earth, would for some
time incapacitate him for active service, he asked and
obtained leave of absence and returned home, where
he found everything precisely in the same place he had
left it, and Gilbert just about setting out the dinner
table, as usual. The good old man was so surprised
at seeing him, that he dropt a bundle of spoons he
carried
in his hand, which so discomfited him that he
forgot
to welcome his young master, till he had carefully
picked them up again.
Harold returned to Habingdon an altered man.
During the period of his service his religious and
political opinions had settled down on the platform of
the most rigid of the sect of the Puritans. He had
fought and bled for them, and they had become more
precious for the price. The habit of fighting against
his king, had quite effaced all reverence for his
authority
;
and the example of those with whom he had
daily associated in danger and death, gradually made
him a thorough convert, not only to their opinions, but
their manners and habits. He had become a
Roundhead
and republican. His deportment was
characterized
by a sour austerity, which scorned all appearance
of gaiety, and seldom relaxed into a smile. A secret
feeling of superiority over those he chose to call the
wicked, at war with Christian humility, had gradually
insinuated itself into his heart, and generated that
spiritual pride so utterly unworthy the spirit of
Christianity
and its author. So far as respected his
principles
and conduct, he was a man of the strictest
integrity
;
but he had ceased to be amiable, and though
gifted with qualities that might gain respect, could
scarcely hope to be loved by those around him.
It was long ere he thoroughly recovered; and during
the period of his convalescence the Royal cause was
ruined, and the King in the hands of his enemies.
His party ceased to make head in the field, and it was
not long before the errors and weaknesses, which would
have been more venial had they not been those of a
sovereign, were atoned by a death inflicted by The
Judges of Kings, who taught him by sad experience,
that monarchs are not alone accountable to heaven for
their actions, but that there is a High Tribunal on
earth to which they may be brought for judgment.
Hitherto kings had paid the forfeit of their crimes
against the people, by becoming the victims of
conspiracy
,
assassination, and war; but now for the first
time did a sovereign fall by the axe of the executioner,
according to the forms, at least, of law and justice.
It was a memorable example, and, say what we will,
a sublime spectacle, to see a monarch atoning for his
offences against his people, like one of the people. The
punishment may have been illegal, but who shall say it
was not just.
Harold had left the service, sometime previous to
the death of the King, in consequence of his regiment
being disbanded, and remained at home, a quiet though
deeply interested observer of those succeeding
struggles
and intrigues, by which unprincipled, ambitious
men at length justly forfeited that freedom it had cost
so much blood to acquire. They had united in
achieving
victory, but quarreled about the division of the
spoils; or to do them justice, perhaps it may have
been that a difference of opinion as to the adoption of
a new system of government was one great cause of
those divisions which were now approaching a crisis.
But Harold had another subject which approached
nearer his heart. He had not forgotten Susan
Baneswright
;
and his deep-rooted affection for that orphan
girl was only more quickened by the recollection that
she was now without a father or protector. He sought
her, and instituted inquiries in all directions that
afforded
the least hope of success, but could gain no
clue to guide him in his further search, and finally sat
down in despair of ever seeing her again. This
disappointment
of the dearest of his earthly hopes only
increased the gloomy severity of his devotion, for
religion
and love are in some degree antidotes to each
other, and the disappointments of the heart often seek
consolation in devotion.
While in this state of mind, circumstances not
material
to our story called him to a distant part of the
country not far from the borders of Wales. It was
midsummer, the weather soft and balmy, and the
landscape everywhere displayed that rich redundancy
of green pasture for which old England is so renowned.
One evening towards sunset, as he rode along, buried
in contemplations in which the past predominated over
the present and future, he was roused from his reverie
by the sudden darkness which came upon him,
occasionally
illuminated by flashes of lightning, followed
by quick crashes of thunder. At once the present
resumed
its empire, and, as often happens in this world
of sudden changes, the pains of memory were
banished
by the prospect of an approaching shower. The
anticipation of a wet jacket is a sovereign remedy for
sentimental regrets. It has a marvellous cooling
influence
on the fever of the spirits and acts as a
shower-bath
on the heated brain. Powerful as is the influence
of memory and imagination, reality is stronger than
either or both combined; and notwithstanding all that
may have been said or sung of mental sorrows, they
fade away like spectres before the stern realities
of physical suffering. The Patriarch Job bore the
loss of his cattle, his houses, and his children without
a murmur; but when his body was covered with boils,
and he writhed in the agonies of pain, he groaned
aloud, and his patience was conquered.
Be this as it may, Harold pricked on his weary
steed in hope of gaining some friendly shelter in
cottage
,
barn, or outhouse. But the storm proved too
swift in the race, and he was overtaken by a pelting
rain opposite a rustic temple of learning, the small fry
of which had just been dismissed for the day, and
scampered home, anxious to escape a ducking. This
being the only place of shelter in sight, he forthwith
rode up to it, and fastening his horse to a post, opened
the door, through which he bolted without knocking;
your pelting shower being a great enemy to ceremony.
The first object that caught his attention was a
female
,
who seemed somewhat alarmed at his intrusion,
for she trembled violently, and her face was very pale.
A second glance, followed by a fixed gaze of intense
interest, disclosed to Harold the object which had so
long occupied his thoughts, and influenced his actions.
It was Susan Baneswright, who at once recognising
him, after a slight hesitation came forward, addressed
him by name, and offered her hand, with a pensive
smile of chastened welcome. Years had passed away
since they parted, yet in gazing on her he could see
little change in her face or person. The attractive
power of her face depended not on color but
expression
;
and the placid firmness of her mind, as well as
the gentleness of her temper, had preserved her in the
midst of great trials from those violent emotions of
passion which undermine the constitution, and perhaps
more than any other cause, contribute to shorten as
well as embitter the brief period of existence allotted
to men. Her face still wore that sweet expression of
submissive melancholy, which had from the first
irresistibly
called forth his sympathy; while her person,
clothed in the simplest fashion and most homely
texture
,
was yet graceful from its natural proportions, as
well as attractive from the absence of all affectation.
It will be recollected that Harold had never disclosed
his attachment in words, except to her father, who
she had neither seen nor heard from since the
interview
heretofore recorded; and if she had become
conscious
of his feelings, it was doubtless through the
medium of that mysterious sympathy said to
constitute
a sort of magnetic telegraph, but which after all
is perhaps nothing more than the dumb eloquence of
the eyes. The meeting, therefore, was not that of
mutual lovers, but long separated friends. Though
friendly, perhaps cordial, it was accompanied by that
sober, staid formality peculiar to the sect to which
they belonged; and not a word passed that could be
translated into the language of love. We will not say
as much of their looks, or that the eye did not make
ample amends for the delinquency of the tongue.
After mutual greetings, the storm being passed
away as suddenly as it came, Harold leading his horse
by the bridle, accompanied Susan to her abode in a
small hamlet, which though close at hand, was hid by
a green wooded hill that soared above the rustic
chimneys
.
She resided with an elderly widowed dame,
whose husband had died fighting against his king, and
who was of the strictest sect of the Puritans. The
pious widow received Harold somewhat ungraciously;
but being apprised by Susan that he was an old friend
of her father, and of course of the right stamp, she
abated somewhat of her acidity, and accorded him her
blessing. While busily occupied with her household
affairs, the which she accompanied occasionally with a
hymn of more piety than poetry, Harold and Susan
being left to themselves entered into mutual details
of their past history.
Harold related the principal incidents of his life
since they parted, omitting the scene after the battle
of Naseby, as well as the particulars of Israel's visit,
and dwelling slightly on his anxious search for Susan.
The narrative of Susan was one of grief and suffering.
On leaving the prison they had continued to lead a sort
of itinerant life. Israel exhorted the people to rise in
their might and smite the Philistines, until at length
excited beyond all restraint by continually hearing of
the vicissitudes of the conflict, now at its height, he
girded on his sword, and proceeded to join the army
of Cromwell, who he considered the chiefest of the
saints. Here he exhorted and fought with equal
enthusiasm
,
until he met his death on the famous field
of Naseby, while hotly pursuing a flying squadron of
loyalists, and exhorting his companions to scatter the
armies of Gog and Magog like chaff before the winds.
But of this catastrophe Susan knew nothing certain,
though accustomed to consider him as dead. Not long
after the departure of Israel, his wife, worn out by the
hardships and exposures she had encountered as well
from duty and affection to her helpmate as from pious
conviction, gradually declined in her health, and sunk
into the grave, leaving Susan without a protector, save
the good woman in whose house she now resided. Not
to be a burden to her, she had managed to gather
together
a little school, from which she derived a homely
support, which sufficed for all her wants. When her
story was finished, she anxiously inquired of Harold
if he could give her any information concerning the
fate of her father.
Without entering into minute particulars, he
communicated
the death of Israel on the field of Naseby
and the information was received with humble
resignation
,
as only confirming what she had long believed.
After a pause devoted to filial piety and love, she
addressed
Harold with mingled sorrow and resignation.
The will of Heaven be done. I have long
believed
myself without a parent, without a home, and
without a friend, save him who has promised to
protect
those who have no other protector. My dear
mother
breathed her last in my arms; I saw her die, and
her last words were spoken to me. Of my father's
fate, though well assured something serious had
befallen
him, I was ignorant till now, and the certainty,
fearful as it may be, is less painful than uncertainty
without hope. There is one thing yet left me. I have
still duties to perform, and it is a blessed dispensation
that the indigent, in administering to the wants of
others, provide for their own.
The heart of Harold swelled with overwhelming
emotion at this affecting lesson of philosophic piety.
A flood of tenderness rushed to his heart, and he could
no longer restrain his emotions.
Susan, he exclaimedDear Susan, do not say
5
you are alone in the world without a home or a friend,
when one such stands before you to whom you are
dear as the apple of his eye, the breath of his lifeI
might almost say, the welfare of his soul
Forbear, Haroldinterrupted Susanforbear,
Harold Habingdon. Place not thine immortal part
in comparison with thy mortal affections. Thy heart
thou mayest give away; thy soul belongs to God.
Nay, hear me, Susan. From the moment I
exchanged
that last look at the prison door, my thoughts
have dwelt on thee by day and by night, in sickness
and health, in the calm hour of contemplation, and in
the hurry of battle. In the jail when forsaken and
perishing with hunger, hopeless of relief, and often
wandering from myself, so long as my mind retained
its consciousness, I thought of thee. And when I lay
gasping on the field of blood, with nothing but woe
and death around me, still I thought of thee
Forbear, Haroldforbear. This is no time to talk
on such a subject. It becomes me now to mourn
the breaking of former ties, rather than think of new
ones.
Forgive me, Susanwe have met by accident, and
accident may soon part us. Let me tell thee all, and
then answer truly, as thy heart may dictate. When
after retiring from the army, I recovered from my
wound, I sought thee wherever I thought it probable
thou mightest be found, nor did I rest until all hope
of finding thee was gone. We have at length met,
and chance has done for me what my own exertions
could not accomplish. Let us never, I beseech thee,
part again. Like thee, I stand alone in the world. I
am the last of my race, with none to share my
thoughts, or control my actions; and thou, dearest
Susan, thou art a stricken deer, alone in a forest,
without
a protector. I offer you a refuge and a home; I
offer you a heart devoted to your happiness and I
expect
a decisive answer. Speak to me, my beloved
answer me, are we never to part, or never to meet
again?
For the first time since he had known her, the
steady, well-poised mind of Susan seemed shaken to its
base. During this address she became greatly
agitated
by a struggle which relieved itself neither by tears
or words. At length recovering in some degree, she
raised her eyes to his, and perceiving the eager
expectation
with which he awaited a reply meekly said
What can I bring as my dower but poverty and
misfortune. My inheritance, alas! is disappointed
hopes, and sorrowful recollections.
What canst thou bring mecried Harold, the
deep-buried enthusiasm and energy of his character
bursting forth like a torrent long pent upThou
canst bring me the most precious of all earthly
dowers
,
a gentle, pious, virtuous wife, in whom I may
trust with the faith of a martyr. Thou canst bring
me peace, content, joy, and felicity. Thou canst make
my house the abode of happiness, and its master the
most blessed of men. Talk not then of poverty and
misfortuneI have enough to ward off one, and my
watchful care will, with the blessing of Heaven,
shield thee from the other. Answer me, Susan, wilt
thou be minewilt thou entrust thy happiness to me
for this life? One wordand give thy hand as a
token.
I willwhispered the maiden, and gave him her
hand. At that moment love triumphed over the
self-denying ordinances of the sect; he pressed her to
his bosom; he kissed her with all the ardor of long
continued abstinence suddenly bidden to a plenteous
feast, while Susan, doubtless taken by surprise, quietly
submitted to the inexorable canons of nature. The
contract being thus sealed, Harold related to her the
occasion of his journey, and besought Susan to become
his bride on his return, which would be in a few days.
But here her unconquerable sense of duty presented
an insurmountable obstacle. She had engaged herself
as a teacher during a period of which more than a
month remained, and steadily refused to break her
engagement, though he eagerly offered to compound
with the villagers.
No, Harold, said she, I will not violate one
engagement
,
however unimportant, while about to enter
into another so solemn and lastingadding, with the
first happy smile he had ever seen light up her pensive
brow, and which made her look almost beautifulI
fear thou wilt not trust me hereafter as a wife, if I
prove faithless to these little children.
Harold respected her scruples, and after appointing
the day on which he was to return and claim his bride,
bade Susan a farewell, which caused her cheek to wax
almost as red as her lips. As he left the house he
heard the good mistress of the mansion chaunting with
awful nasal twang, the following lines, that seemed
ominous.
Why should vain mortals hope for bliss,
In such a wicked world as this,
Where Satan goes about in wrath,
And sin lurks in each pilgrim's path.
CHAPTER V.
Metaphysical SubtiltiesAnticipation and RealityObstinacy and
PrincipleSome Morsels of Wisdom Crammed down the Reader's
Throat in Spite of His Wry FacesA ProphecyAn Orthodox
Serving ManDisgust of Harold at the Profligacy of the Cavaliers
Meditates a Decisive Movement, and Does a very Foolish Thing
A Complaisant HelpmateEulogium on the New WorldA Voyage
in Search of the Philosopher's Stone, to wit, Happiness.
The
journey of Harold was agreeably solaced by the
recollection of certain passages at arms that had, as
hinted at in the preceding chapter, taken place
between
himself and Susan, as well as by the
anticipation
of their speedy renewal, with additions and
improvements
.
They say still water runs deepest, and
there is another venerable proverb, to a like purpose,
not quite genteel enough for the verbal squeamishness
of the present age, which, with due deference be it
spoken, swallows down whole mouthfuls of
abominations
disguised in the delicate embroidery of exquisitely
harmless words, and while it strains at a gnat,
religiously
swallows a camel. Be this as it may; an old
friend, to whom we are indebted for all the wisdom
expended in this work, assures us it is a fact verified
by his own experience, that the melting of the ice in
the heart of a staid, sober, abstemious gentleman is
invariably succeeded by a terrible overflowing of the
long imprisoned waters, which like an autumnal
freshet, carries all before it, tearing up the ground
into the bargain.
It is not therefore wise, he says, to turn our backs
in sour disdain on the good things spread out before
us by the bounty of Providence; to consider them, not
as benefactions to be partaken of in sober moderation,
but as temptations purposely laid in our way as
practical
lessons of self-denial. Those enjoyments which
neither injure ourselves, interfere with the happiness
of others, or violate the laws and decorums of society,
are in fact in themselves most effectual barriers against
the indulgence of those criminal propensities which at
one and the same time undermine our own happiness
and destroy that of others. Give to mankind innocent
amusements, and they will be far less likely to seek
for guilty pleasures. But it will generally be found
that those who whet their appetites, by rigorously
abstaining
from one enjoyment, are the most voracious
in the gratification of others; and that he who rails
most loudly at the ninety-nine innocent pleasures of
life most commonly selects the hundredth, as an
exception
,
and converts it into a vice, by excessive
indulgence
.
These remarks, continues the prosing old
gentleman, apply to all ages, but most especially to
that gay and joyous season when free from the cares
of manhood, and the infirmities of age, the youthful
spirit seems fairly entitled to nature's vernal holiday.
Those who view with impatient spleen their merry
gambols, or listen with sour disdain to the jocund
laugh, that springs from all absence from care, as well
as freedom from pain, might as well find fault with
the spring for producing nothing but blossoms. But
to resume our tale.
Harold certainly verified the old gentleman's theory,
for he was in a tumult of hopes and anticipations,
unworthy
a person who had so long valued himself on his
contempt for sublunary enjoyments. The ice had
suddenly
melted; his ardent soul which had been ere
while occupied in curbing the steed, now relaxed the
bridle, or rather dropped it entirely, and made itself full
amends for the past by anticipations of the future.
The sturdy Puritan actually took to castle building,
and had his horse been as much in love as himself, it
is extremely questionable whether on his return home,
he would not have been lost in the Fens of
Lincolnshire
.
But owing to the sagacity of the discreet
animal
,
he arrived in safety, but not until after missing
his way occasionally when he came to a cross-road.
Here with the aid of old Gilbert, he set about putting
his household in order for the reception of its new
mistress, during which it was an observation of
Gilbert
,
that his young master neither sung psalms, or
prayed as often as usual, and twice missed a
conventicle
.
Time always limps, when driven too fast. He has
something of the donkey, and if you attempt to prick
him beyond his usual speed, will but out his forefeet,
make a dead stand, and bray most vociferously. It
was thus with Harold, who was out of all patience,
and put Gilbert almost out of his wits, by hurrying
the dinner every day, as if that would hasten the
march of time. Gilbert, said he one day, what
day of the week is it? Gilbert considered the matter
maturely and answered, Friday, sir. 'Slife, I
thought it was Saturday, said Harold, turning away
impatiently, to the infinite astonishment of Gilbert,
who had never heard his young master come so nigh
swearing before.
But time is withal a sure-footed steed, and never
fails to reach the end of his journey at last. The
fated hour arrived, and Harold, dressed in a new suit,
that actually smacked a little of the cavalier, departed
on his mission, from which he in due time returned
with his wife. Without entering into minute details,
which however are a great help to an author in time
of sore distress, when the catastrophe of his story
threatens to pounce upon him, long before his two
volumes are completedwe shall be content with
observing that for the usual period which it is said is
governed by the moonhe enjoyed as much happiness
as is good for mankind. But whether it be that there
is that in the institution of matrimony, which like a
magnifying glass causes the merest trifles to appear
important, or that the parties are drawn into such
intimate communion that they cannot conceal, or be
blind to the faults or foibles of each other, or that
familiarity produces the result which has become
proverbial
,
5*
certain it is, that after the expiration of that
period so hallowed in the annals of wedded life, Harold
and Susan were not quite so happy as they had
anticipated
.
All men, says our wise old friend, and as is affirmed
by scandalous persons, all women have a way of their
own, and like to have their own way. Now there is
an infinite variety of nothings in domestic life, which
though in themselves of no consequence, constitute the
most fruitful source of trifling disagreements and
contradictions
that too often in the end produce coolness,
if not alienation. We have somewhere heard of a
couple of the fondest, best tempered people in the
world, who unfortunately, one day, in the middle of a
long, gloomy, drizzly week in November, during which
the sun suffered a total eclipse, fell into an argument
on the question whether people have ten fingers, or
only eight fingers and two thumbs. They parted
without
settling the question, and the next day it was
renewed
with additional vivacity. The habit grew upon
them, and each party waxed more warm as well as
obstinate. They began to complain bitterly of the
peevishness of each other, and finally agreed to a
separation on the ground of incompatibility of temper.
Were it possible to penetrate the deep mysteries of
wedlock
,
it would probably be found that in a vast many,
perhaps a majority of cases, matrimonial dissentions
arise from a difference of opinion on matters of not the
least consequence and to which the parties are totally
indifferent.
Harold was a man of principle. He did everything
on principle, and often applied his principles to things
that involved no principle whatever. Susan, too, was
governed by principle; she was obstinately good,
though to do her justice, it was only passive obstinacy,
that of non-resistance. No earthly motive could tempt
her to do wrong, or act against her settled conviction.
It would have been better for both, had they confined
their adherence to principle to those acts which involve
the obligations of duty to ourselves and others; but
they went much farther, and when there was neither
right or wrong in the case, strictly adhered to principle.
Yet with all this, Susan possessed a temper of the
sweetest complacency, and never on any occasion
contended with her husband. When, as sometimes
happened, Harold found fault with her, she would only
ply her needle with greater rapidity, and exclaimMy
dear, I don't hearI don't hear.
That perseverance, our old friend continues, nay,
obstinacy
in doing right is a noble characteristic in man
or woman cannot be denied; and yet it requires to be
kept within certain bounds, or it may chance to
degenerate
into obstinacy in doing wrong. Nothing is
more common than to mistake prejudice for principle,
or the suggestions of passion for the dictates of reason.
The desire of having our own way, the mere
indulgence
of the will is often the substitute for a
conviction
of right, and in many, very many cases what is
called acting on principle, is only an excuse for a
determination
to do as we please. Even conscience is
not always an infallible guide, else we had not so
often seen whole nations forgetting the obligations of
humanity, charity and justice, and exterminating each
other for a mere difference of opinion. It is however
the best we have; and though partaking in the
common
weakness of our nature, should be handled with
gloves, least from a sleeping lamb it becomes a raging
tiger.
There are a vast many occasions, most especially in
the daily intercourse of domestic life, in which it is
not worth while to be obstinate, and where opposition
is oftener the result of wilfulness than reason. It is
in yielding to others, in such small affairs, that what
is called good nature consists. This is the honey that
sweetens the cup of human life; the great cement of
our social relations, which consists as much in mutual
forbearance, as in mutual good offices. A married pair
should equally keep clear of the two extremes, of
absolute
independence, and grovelling submission. Most
especially should they avoid all argument, which is
only another name for contention. The wise old
gentleman
from whom we have again quoted, is clearly of
this opinion, and earnestly recommends the example
of a friend of his, who whenever his wife expresses
dissent to any opinion, or proposition, invariably
replies, well, my dear, then there is an end to the
argument,takes up his hat, and quietly goes about
his business.
The same old gentleman begs to caution our readers
against a fundamental error of a certain married couple,
with whom he was on terms of intimacy, whose
domestic harmony was grievously undermined, by a
habit of contending, not which should have his, or her
way, but which should concede it to the other. This
produced very serious conflicts, which generally ended
in the husband exclaiming, Zounds, madam, do you
think to always have your own way? I desire you to
understand that I too have a will of my own. The
old gentleman, however, observes, that this is rather
an uncommon case, and constitutes an exception. He
further remarks, that argument between the rival
domestic powers, is most especially dangerous, where
both parties agree; and affirms he has seen two people
exceedingly discomposed, at finding after a long and
warm discussion, there was in fact no difference of
opinion.
The gentle and impatient reader will pardon us, if
we occasionally indulge in a little wholesome
digression
,
though in opposition to certain critics, who lay it
down as one of the orthodox canons of criticism, that a
story is like a top, which breaks down the moment it
stands still. The author, they affirm, should be
constantly
whipping his top, to prevent this catastrophe,
and the more it hums the better for both himself and
his reader. Like old Virginia, he must never tire, nor
linger on his way, to pluck a flower, or sketch some
lovely scene of nature that wooes him as he passes
along. Sentiment, sir,ordained one of these
infallible
doctorssentiment is impertinent, and morality
out of place in a story. It is as bad as mint sauce to
venison, or stuffing to a canvas-back duck. It is out
of place, sirit interrupts the progress of the story,
which should be all action, passion, adventure, blood,
murder, fire, fury, fretting, fuming, and phrenzy
This is what I call power; it is the steam that gives
motion to the engine, and sets the author and his reader
going at the rate of thirty miles an hour. The most
racy book I ever read was an abridgement of the
Romances
of Mrs. Radcliffe and some others, in which all
the connecting links were left out, and nothing
retained
but the incidents.
We agree perfectly with our thunderbolt of a critic,
but shall not follow his precepts. We don't see why
an author has not as good a right to please himself, as
his readers have to be pleased. The latter buy his
book at their peril, and if it should chance not to please
them, they can take the worth of their money in
abusing him soundly. This is what statesmen call
reciprocity
.
Now we confess, that though in the
downhill
of life, and much nearer the bottom than the top,
we like to roam about a little out of the direct course
of narrative, even if we pluck only weeds in our way,
and have a decided antipathy to authors who cannot
be dull whenever they please. The only legitimate
excuse for publishing a book is, that the writer either
is, or fancies himself, wiser than all the rest of the
world put together. He should, therefore, take the bit
between his teeth at the first start, and follow his own
way, regardless of his riders, the critics. If they
should chance to pelt him with old shoes, or hiss him
as he passes, he has an infallible resource in the
judgment
of posterity. Let him appeal to the great court
of chancery, whose function it is to reprieve an author
after he has been hanged, drawn, and quartered. But
although the preceding speculations may seem a
wanton
digression, the judicious reader will, if we are not
mistaken, detect their bearing on the sequel of our
narrative.
Years passed away, and notwithstanding the little
breezes that ruffled the surface of the stream of life
and shook the verdant leaves, without causing them
to fall, Harold and Susan continued to enjoy
themselves
in comparative peace. The only events of
consequence
that happened during this period, were the
birth of a daughter, which shook the leaves a little
when about to give her a name, and the death of
honest Gilbert Taverner, who had never held up his
venerable head since the luckless day when his
mistress
commanded him to change the disposition of the
salt-cellars at dinner. The first time he did this, his
hand trembled so that he spilled the entire contents
of one, and was so agitated, that though the salt fell
between himself and his mistress, he forgot the
indispensable
ceremony of casting a portion over his left
shoulder. To the conviction that a terrible feud was
at hand between his mistress and himself, was added
another, to wit, that the House of Habingdon was
nodding
to its fall; concerning which he had been assured
by his grandfather, who was accounted almost as old
as Methusalah, there was an ancient prophecy which
ran as follows:
When ye saulte sal daunce aboute ye tabelle,
Then tymes wille comme ryghte execrabelle,
And ye olde house of Habingdonne,
See tymes ytte sal never see agone.
Sancte Rumbold and Sancte Frideswyde,
Keepe ys houe, or wae betyde.
Gilbert had never before heard of either of these
Sanctes; but ever after continued to pray devoutly for
their good offices in behalf of the House of Habingdon,
until in later times, he gradually imbibed such an
orthodox
antipathy to the entire Roman Calendar, and
such a horror of St. Peter especially, that he could
scarcely refrain from railing against his fellow apostles.
He felt assured that a house that had no better
support
than Sancte Rumbold and Sancte Frideswyde,
could not stand forever, and in fact wondered at its
having stood so long. In short he had become a
convert
to his master's opinions, or rather example, and
cherished such a virulent prejudice against the Pope,
whom he always denounced in orthodox phrase,
together
with all the adjuncts, appurtenances, and
ceremonies
of Popery, that he abjured the four cardinal
points, and lost all respect for prudence, temperance,
justice, and fortitude, when told they were cardinal
virtues. The good old manfor he was as honest as
the day, and as harmless as a ghost, soon pined away
under the innovations of his mistress, and his fears for
the House of Habingdon. His brief remaining history
is that of all the human race; he sickened, died, was
buried and forgotten by all but the author of this
tale.
In the meantime, Harold remained at home, a quiet
though by no means an uninterested spectator of
passing
events. He formed no intimacies with his
neighbors
,
who were of different sects, and received few
visitors but travelling preachers of his own persuasion,
whose zeal not unfrequently approached the burning
confines of fanaticism. With this exception, the daily
routine of his life would have become tedious by its
uniformity, had he not found perpetual excitement in
the increasing fervency of his devotions, which gradually
filled up a great portion of his time, and precluded all
amusements or relaxation. He warred against rural
pleasures, and rustic recreations; the merry song of
the milk-maid was hushed in his domain; the sound
of laughter never echoed within his walls; he often
turned distastefully from the smile of the infant
Miriam
,
now beginning to sport and prattle; and was only
reconciled to the music of the merry minstrels of the
morning, by the idea that they were chaunting their
spiritual songs. Though a man of more than ordinary
talents, and of undoubted worth, he was not liked by
his inferiors, or popular among his equals. His wife
was gentle and affectionate, and his daughter obeyed
him implicitly; but the feeling they cherished towards
him was what the Indian meant, when he wished to
describe that of his tribe for white menit was that
of Fear-love. His limited intercourse being, as
before
stated, confined to a single class, instead of
expanding
his mind and liberalizing his principles, only
served to contract the one, and render the other more
rigid and intolerant. He fancied himself humble, but
if so, it was only to his Maker, not towards his
fellow-creatures
.
He became infected with the very worst
species of pridespiritual prideand finally wrapt
himself up in the mantle of self-righteousness, like the
Pharisees of old.
The Dissenters were now in the ascendancy, and
instead of forgetting, only remembered the
persecutions
they had suffered, to retaliate on those who had
inflicted them. The wolves in sheep's clothing, as
they were opprobriously called, had now a full taste of
the cup they had proffered to the lips of others; the
churches changed occupants; and the universities
were treated pretty much as they were at the
Reformation
.
The Parliamentary forces had taken
possession
of Oxford, and their chaplains possessed
themselves
of the pulpits, where, as a cotemporary writer
of the opposite party saysTheir preaching was the
cause of great scorn in some and laughter in others;
because their prayers and sermons were long and
tedious
;
because they made wry mouths, squint eyes,
and screwed faces, quite altering them from what God
and nature had made them; because they had antic
behavior, squeaking voices, and feeling tones, fit
rather
for stage players and country beggars to use, than
such as were to expound the Scriptures.
But what most excited the indignation of the
loyalists
,
was an ordinance of the Parliamentary visitors,
directing that the bellsman of the university should not
go about in the customary manner, at the funeral of
any member of the university; that the fashion of
gowns and caps should be changed; and that all
excess
and vanity in powdering their hair, wearing knots
of ribands on their clothes and in their hats;
walking
in boots, spurs, and boot-hose tops, should be
abandoned. Our readers may smile at those
seemingly
unimportant matters, but the history of religious
dissentions will inform them that lesser causes than
these have set the world in arms, and deluged the
earth with blood. It requires the utmost exertion of
despotic power to change the fashion of a hat, the cut
of the coat, or the mode of wearing the hair.
But though the enemies of royalty had got the
upper
hand, and gained the prize they sought, the most
difficult and delicate crisis had not been passed. The
rights for which the patriots had struggled were indeed
attained, but it seemed they knew not what to do with
them; and the establishment of a new government
proved a more difficult task than that of pulling down
an old one. The labor of removing the rubbish was
greater than that of erecting a new building and in
addition
to this, the workmen employed differed
altogether
in the plan of the edifice. Presbyterians,
Puritans
,
Anabaptists, Brownists, Levelers, and
Independents
were mixed pell-mell together, without any
cement to the heterogenous mass; and Harold began
seriously to apprehend, that if this state of things
continued
much longer, the people, tired of being tossed
about at random on the ever-changing ocean, would
eventually seek the old haven, and voluntarily give
back what they had forcibly wrested away. His fears
were realized even sooner than he anticipated, and he
believed his old commander, Cromwell, invested with
a power greater than that of royalty, though masked
under a different name. It could scarcely be called a
usurpation, since in reality no established authority
existed in England. The royal power was in
abeyance
.
The sceptre lay in Oliver's way, and he found
it. Anarchy can only be cured by despotism; and
when contending factions, each equally incapable of
maintaining that permanent ascendancy which is
indispensable
to the peace and order of communities, are
steering the vessel of state at random, amid shoals and
quicksands, the master-mind must seize the helm, to
secure a safe harbor, and to do this he must be sole
commander.
Harold, as before hinted, had almost imperceptibly
become a sturdy republican, or Seceder, as they were
denominated by the cavaliersand the elevation of
Cromwell, to the supreme power of the state, galled
him sorely. His death after a few years of brilliant
successes, in which he did much for England, but
little
for his own happiness; the accession and
abdication
of his son Richard; the erection of a council of
state; and at length the restoration of Charles the
Second
without conditions, all followed in quick
succession
.
Thus the same men, though still in the meridian
of life, had lived to see those rights which had been
purchased by years of civil commotion and bloodshed,
voluntarily surrendered back, by a people wearied by
a succession of changes, which placed them perpetually
at the mercy of cabals and factions.
It was at this period, that Harold, disgusted with
the abortive issue of that great struggle, in which he
had prayed, fought and bled; and apprehensive of the
return of those persecutions, which in his heart he
could not deny the Puritans had justly merited by
their conduct during their ascendancy, began to
meditate
a decisive movement. When he witnessed the
frivolity of manners, the relaxation of morals, and the
insulting ridicule heaped on the heads of the Puritans,
his heart swelled with mingled sorrow and
indignation
,
and he turned his thoughts to the far off
wilderness
of the West, where, among the savage Pagans, he
hoped to find that toleration which Christian charity
had hitherto withheld. The vision of the medina of a
new world, whither already the victims of persecution
had sought and found a refuge, had often flitted before
his fancy previous to this despicable termination of a
great revolution, made little by the littleness of men.
But it was at this time considered a daring enterprize,
requiring not only courage, hardihood, and self-denial,
but a pious confidence in the support and direction of
Providence. Harold possessed all these requisites, and
having at length with cautious deliberation decided
on his course, proceeded promptly to carry it out. His
first step was to propose it to Susan, who though
accustomed to buffet the ills of life, shrunk from such
hardships, dangers, and privations, as she had heard
detailed by eye witnesses, returned from the land of
the Pilgrims.
I love my country, Susan, said HaroldI have
shed my blood in what I thought, and still think, a
great and good cause, and I am ready to do it again,
whenever there is any hope it will not be shed in vain.
But I have lived to see that freedom which I had hoped
to achieve sacrificed to that very family which has
endeavored
to crush it for generations past. I have lived
to see all sorts of profaneness, lewdness, luxury, and
vice, spreading far and wide, through the example of
the King and his courtiers, by whom all virtue, decency
and sobriety, are ridiculed and laughed to scorn. I see
the Parliament united with the court, and ready to
sacrifice the people for the wages of corruption. My
countrymen are bought and sold like cattle or slaves,
and no man is safe, but by bribery or flattery. It is
true that our lives are as yet spared; but who can
rely on the act of indemnity, or put faith in a King
whose word is made a subject of ridicule by a
profligate
rhymster? What tie can bind a dissolute
monarch
,
and a slavish Parliament, one of whom openly
sets at defiance the commands of his Maker, while the
other is equally regardless of the rights of His creatures.
When I see such men as Vane, Lambert, Hardrigge,
Milton and Ludlow, offered up on the scaffold, or
hunted
into exile, I feel a conviction that my own
insignificance
is my only protection. Let us go, and seek in
the new world what is denied in the old.
Alas, Haroldreplied the meek, submissive wife
looking down on little Miriam, who stood wondering at
the earnest energy of her father, whose discourse she
hardly comprehendedAlas! would you take me
and our daughter from our home, to be buffeted by the
waves of the sea, and encounter the still greater perils
of the land? To bury us in the howling wilderness,
where we and our posterity must sojourn with wild
savages, and savage beasts, perhaps in time to become
savages like them, and lose all reverence for the laws
of man or the will of God? What is the new world,
and what will it ever be but an unpeopled
wilderness
?
Cease, Susanthou speakest like a woman, or
rather
like a child. Know that the moment in which the
inspired navigator, Columbus, caught sight of the new
world, was fraught with consequences more extensive,
important, and lasting, than ever originated in any
single act of any human being that has existed since
the fall of Adam. It was the recovery of a lost child
of the universe, destined, if I foresee aright, to grow
up into a giant, possessing all the activity of youth,
all the energies of ripened manhood, and all the
experience
and sagacity of a green old age. It gave a new
impulse to human action and enterprise; it provided
a refuge from civil oppression and religious
persecution
;
it offered a boundless field for the cramped
energies
of the mind and the fettered activity of the body;
it held out rich rewards to courage and genius; it
promised to enterprise wealth, to industry competence,
food to the hungry, and freedom to the oppressed.
The old world has long been the exclusive property of
the rich and powerful; but here is one that seems
expressly created for the indigent and lowly. America
is the poor man's inheritance. The land we live in
already grows weary of her inhabitants, insomuch
that man, the most precious of all creatures, is here
become more vile and base than the earth he treads
upon. The social and domestic ties are as burnt flax,
and children, friends and neighbors, are become
burthens
instead of blessings, because they stand in each
others way, and the laborers are too great for the
harvest
.
Let us quit, forever, this doomed land; let us
go where men are required to carry into effect the
inscrutable
decrees of Providence, and can assume their
proper place, as joint proprietors of that earth which
was bestowed not on the eldest son, but all the
posterity
of Adam. Let us straightway set forth on our
pilgrimage while we may. The blood of martyrs has
been shed in vain, and what was won by the virtue of
the people has been lost by the degeneracy of their
leaders. But such is the fate of nations; they fight
and conquer; they trust and are betrayed.
It will be perceived, that Harold, with all his
outward
coat of ice, had a warm under-current of ardent
enthusiasm, which flowed from the fountain of nature,
and could not at times be repressed. His enthusiasm,
though in a great measure absorbed in his piety,
occasionally
took another direction, and when thus
awakened
,
flowed impetuously in its new channel. Susan
was overawed, if not convinced, and expressed her
submission
as follows, pointing to Miriam:
This is the daughter of my affection, but thou
art the husband of my earliest love. They claim is
stronger than hers, and therefore, will I go whither
thou goest, and risk this dear pledge to all the perils
that may befall, in obedience to my heart and my duty.
The earth is our mother, and we shall find our
kindred
dust wherever we abide.
Harold ought to have kissed his wife, and thanked
her for the sacrifice thus offered to conjugal duty.
But like very many sturdy advocates of the right of
self-government, out of doors, he did not apply the
doctrine practically within. He had adopted the
Salique law in domestic matters, and confined female
jurisdiction to certain limits, which no republican
female of our days would probably submit to, without
a deal of preliminary discipline. He therefore received
this concession without any special acknowledgment;
for which omission, in our opinion, he forfeited all claim
to the like in future. When any womanmost especially
a wifegives up an opinion, or sacrifices a wish, even
though the one may be wrong, and the other
unreasonable
,
she deserves a kiss at least, if not a suit of new
drawing-room furniture from Paris.
This decisive point being settled, Harold proceeded
without delay to prepare for his pilgrimage to the New
World, which, in our poor opinion, is a great improvement
6
on the old one in many particulars. It was some time
before he could find a purchaser for his estate, to his
liking, for he made a point of not disposing of it to a
cavalier. One promising negotiation was broken off
by a discussion on free will; another by a difference
of opinion in the interpretation of a text; a third
ended in a downright quarrel concerning the respective
merits of Luther and Calvin; while a fourth, involving
the duty of charity to all mankind, was concluded by
Harold turning his antagonist out of doors.
At length he succeeded in finding a chapman
altogether
unexceptionable, who so thoroughly agreed with
him in his opinion, that everybody said he got a
great bargain. Having gone through all the necessary
preliminaries, it now became his painful task to take a
final leave of a home hallowed by the recollections of
so many centuries. It was indeed a spot equally
endeared by past association and quiet rural beauty.
The mansion house was neither spacious nor tasteful;
on the contrary, it was by no means remarkable for
its size, and had little to please the eye, save a quaint
picturesque irregularity, accompanied by an aspect of
most venerable antiquity, without being quite as old
as the family, but sufficiently so to combine all those
conveniencies of arrangement, which, owing to the
progress of the age and the development of mind,
are now denounced as sore inconveniences. It was
of a dark slatey colored stone; the walls
prodigiously
thick; the ceilings prodigiously low; the
windows narrow and deep; and there was a vast
many hiding places for rats, ghosts, refugees, and all
persons that might find it convenient to be missing.
A pigmy river ran in front of the house, which was
seated on a pretty steep bank, terraced down to the
shore, fringed with grass and decked with a long row
of majestic trees that strongly smacked of the antiquity
of the House of Habingdon. The windings of the little
pastoral stream might be seen for miles above and
below, and its murmurs, which, in the stillness of night,
were distinctly heard in the sleeping rooms, might
soothe into repose any but a spirit disquieted by
remorse
,
or condemned to weary wakefulness by care
and gluttony. The country all around was rich,
verdant
and alluring; and though the view was not very
extensive, it was only the more varied as well
interesting
from the distinctness with which every object was
presented to the eye. Nothing marred the beauty of
the prospect, but the tall steeple of a neighboring
parish church, of which, the wolves in sheep's clothing
had again acquired possession, and on which Harold
often turned his back in pious disdain. Strange that
the love of our Maker should produce antipathy to His
creatures! All men differ in form, face, and
disposition
;
yet they do not cut each others' throats, or fall
together by the ears on that account. But the moment
they disagree in opinion, especially on subjects
involving
the obligations of universal charity, they seem, in
their zeal to establish the abstract principle, altogether
to forget its practical application.
As Harold delivered the rusty old keys to the
purchaser
who had come to take possession, his heart
almost failed, and the ghosts of his Saxon ancestors
seemed to rise up in judgment against him. Yonder
under those old yew trees lay the family burying place,
where rested in peaceful oblivion a long train of
succeeding
generations, who had followed each other in
the same old track, and slept not more peaceably than
they had lived together. He remembered none of these
but his parents, and all his recollections were centred
in their graves. He had paid them a last visit, and
when he returned, his wife anxiously inquired what
was the matter with him. Nothing,replied he
I have only been bidding a last farewell to some old
friends. Susan understood him and inquired no
further.
As they passed through the avenue of old trees that
led to the high road, he cast a long, long glance at the
past and an anxious look towards the future. Between
the two his firmness forsook him, and a few solitary
tears coursed down the cheeks of the iron Puritan. But
he recovered himself almost instantly, by a mighty
effort, and looked behind him no more. To Susan, the
parting was marked by somewhat less emotion. She
had not the same recollections and associations. She
could only look back to a few years spent in the abode
she was now leaving for ever, and not so much what
was past she regretted, as what was to come she
feared. But there is in the heart of women an innate
vagrant disposition, arising probably from their
confinement
at home, and the sameness of their occupations.
They luxuriate in new scenes, awakening new ideas,
and we have more than once seen them actually
delighted with danger, simply because it produced an
excitement. Susan thought more of the future and less
of the past than Harold: and as they seated themselves
in the carriage that was to bear them away, gazed,
not on the forsaken home, but on her little girl who
was weeping, she scarcely knew why.
Accompanied by two servants, one of whom was the
nephew of old Gilbert Taverner, and already somewhat
advanced in years; the other a staid, starched, devout
spinster, devotedly attached to Susan, on the score of
her father, by whom she had been convertedthey
proceeded to London, as the most likely place, at that
time, to procure a passage to America, and make their
moneyed arrangements. Here they were detained a
tedious time, waiting for a vessel, the only one then in
preparation for the Virginia voyage, as it was called.
It will be recollected that at this period, the ignorance
of the people of England, especially the more
enlightened
classes, in all matters relating to America,
was, if possible, more profound than at the present day.
Of its geographical divisions, the distance and relative
position of the different sections, they had either a
vague idea, or no idea at all. In the old maps and
books the entire country comprised within the limits
of the British Plantations was called Virginia; and the
vast distances between the different parts, with the
difficulties of communication, was little comprehended.
People applied their experience at home, to the wild
regions of the west, and thoughtlessly imagined that
there was no greater difficulty in making a journey or
voyage from Jamestown to Boston, than from London
to Edinburgh. Be this at it may, people at that time
knew more of their own business, and less of that of
others than they do now. It will not therefore appear
so very surprising that Harold engaged his passage in
a vessel bound to Virginia instead of New England,
imagining there would be little difficulty in reaching
the latter, either by land or sea.
The truth is, he was impatient to leave England,
where his religion, his manners, and principles were
subjects of perpetual mockery. The profligacy of the
King and his court now become open and undisguised;
the general relaxation of morals and decency, partly
the result of this example, partly from a spirit of
opposition
to the severity of the Puritans; the revival of
obnoxious amusements, more especially the theatres,
where the sect to which he belonged was a favorite
subject of ridicule, all combined to render his abode
in London little less than martyrdom. Accordingly he
embarked in a vessel bound for Chesapeake Bay,
carrying with him sufficient funds to purchase a
principality
in the wilderness. Strong as were his motives
for seeking a far distant home, he could not quell a
melancholy feeling, arising from mingled recollections
of the past, and anxious forebodings of the future.
As the vessel glided along the bank of the silver
Thames, the smiling landscape seemed to beckon him
to its green lawns and shady woodlands, and when at
length the land of his nativity, childhood, youth and
manhood, gradually diminished to a speck on the
horizon
,
and finally faded from his view, he felt as if he
had turned his back on the world. Stern and
inflexible
as was his spirit, he would have sunk under the
weight of his feelings, had he not been sustained by a
sentiment capable of resisting all the perils of life, and
defying all the agonies of death.
At this period there were no floating palaces on the
seas, nor was the number of voyages so great, as to
have made, as it were, a beaten track across the broad
Atlantic. The vessels of that age would have made
but a poor figure by the side of a Liverpool packet;
and one of the most singular circumstances attending
the progress of maritime discovery, is the undoubted
fact, that its greatest achievements were performed in
vessels which at this later period would be held
inadequate
to a coasting voyage; and that, too, without
the aid of nautical almanacs, or charts to guide
them. It would require a stout-hearted mariner of
these times to adventure a voyage across the Atlantic,
in one of the caravels of the great Columbus. Yet in
such a one, did the daring and inspired enthusiast
for such he was, with all his cool self-possessionin
such a frail barque, did he launch out into the
untracked
ocean, in which keel had never yet ploughed
a furrow, and straight as an arrow from the Indian
bow, proceed to his destined mark, until he gave a
new world to Castile and Leon, for which he was
repaid by fetters.
The clumsy barque proceeded slowly, buffeting, or
rather being buffeted by the unceremonious waves,
and soon approved herself without speed or bottom;
for it was not long before the pumps were constantly
going. The captain, an avaricious tarpaulin, had
stinted his allowance of provisions to a short voyage,
and as it soon appeared that this would be a long one,
he began, prudently in time, to prepare for what he
saw was coming, by hauling taut his sheets, as
he called it in nautical phraseto witby dealing out
his provisions with a sparing hand. In approaching
the southern latitudes, they sometimes lay becalmed
on the melancholy waste, under a broiling sun, and
wallowing amid the long rolling waves without making
any head-way; at others they were irresistibly driven
by tempests, far out of their course; and as they
approached
the coast, became the sport of currents, that
put them sadly out of their reckoning. In addition to
these annoyances, there were three or four roystering
cavaliers, younger sons, who having exhausted their
money and credit at the ordinaries, had taken the
Virginia voyage in hopes of marrying an Indian
heiress, with a kingdom for her dower.
These were a knot of noisy, merry, reckless rogues, with
more wit than wisdom, and more generosity than
prudence
.
Nothing could make them serious; and when
by degrees they were all put on quarter rations, they
made a jest even of hunger, becoming more merry and
noisy than ever. Added to this, they had a variety of
jests and ludicrous anecdotes of the Crop-ears, which
they took peculiar pleasure in repeating before Harold,
who though he preserved an outward coolness and
indifference
,
had much ado, to quell those sturdy rebels,
flesh and blood, so often victorious over the spirit. He
imagined he forgave them; but it is to be feared that
he only nourished a deeper inward feeling, by
repressing
all outward demonstrations. It is indeed
astonishing
how knocking a man down contributes to
harmonize
the irritated spirit, and how much sooner we
forgive
an insult that we have promptly avenged, than
one we have quietly pocketed. The wise old
gentleman
at our elbow is of opinion that when two persons
are fairly at feud, it is on the whole better, as the
phraze is, to fight it out, at once, than nourish a
bitter spleen, that produces perpetual contention, or
secret ill offices, which though not amounting to
breaches of the peace, occasion wounds far more
painful
and incurable.
But the longest voyage, as well as the longest story,
must have an end. At length they reached the capes
of the Chesapeake, and gliding into comparatively
smooth water, the good ship seemed so greatly relieved,
that she careered gallantly with wind and tide, past
Willoughby Point, and Old Point Comfort, into
Hampton
Roads, whence in due time, she anchored off the
cradle of the new world, where the passengers were
landed in a state of miserable exhaustion. Though
the old cavaliers, who had gathered together on the
appearance of the vessela rare occurrencestiffened
their tails a little at the appearance of a Crop-ear,
their prejudices speedily yielded to the generous
impulses
of hospitality, still inherent in their posterity,
and they forgot their ancient prejudices against his faith,
in sympathy for his sufferings.
CHAPTER VI.
The New WorldHarold under the Necessity of Changing his Original
DestinationPurchases a PlantationSome account of his Nearest
Neighbor, Master Hugh Tyringham and His Right-hand Man,
Gregory Moth, the Oxford Scholar. A Small Dose of Wisdom from
our Old Friend, and an Apology to the ReaderA Young
Crop-Ear
Lady, and a Young Gentleman Cavalier IntroducedThe
Cavalier and the Round-Head don't Agree any Better than the
Young PeopleConsequences of Forbidding Young Folks to Do
What they Have no Mind to.
Harold
was now in a new world, where everything
was changed, except himself, his wife, and his
daughter. The broad river, so different from the
dwarfish stream to which he had been so long
accustomed
;
the dark interminable forest that bounded the
prospect in every direction, hiding the bounteous earth
from the rays of the sun and the eyes of her children,
and silent as the abodes of the dead, except when
awakened by the long quivering howl of the hungry
wolf, or prowling savage; the absence of cultivation,
except in little spots, few and far between; the homely
simplicity of the houses, as well as the furniture;
together with many other marked peculiarities,
presented
a contrast to the world he had just left behind,
not altogether unpleasing, since it awakened new
impressions in his mind. Susan, too, was filled with
wonder, and Miriam, now on the verge of
woman-hood
,
was half-pleased, half-frightened, when the tall
feathered redman patted her head and called her
Pappoose.
His first inquiries speedily convinced him of the
difficulty in finding his way, promptly, to the Land of
the Pilgrims; and he discovered to all intents and
purposes, he was further off than ever, if obstacles
may be said to constitute distance. To proceed thither
by land was out of the question. The intervening
country, with here and there an exception, was little
else than a wilderness, through which none but savages
could find their way, and presented a combination of
dangers as well as difficulties. At this period, too,
opportunities of going by sea were of extremely rare
occurrence. Only once in a great while a coaster
would creep along shore, and feel its way into the
Chesapeake, with a cargo of notions. The sole
commercial
produce of Virginia was tobacco, and the
Pilgrims
were no smokers. It might be a year, or more,
ere one of these adventurous navigators made his
appearance.
Harold therefore remained at the little capital, for
some time in a state of doubt and hesitation as to the
course he should pursue. During this period his
situation
was rather irksome. He was displeased with
the tone of manners that prevailed among the cavaliers,
and more than once fretted by allusions to Crop-ears,
Roundheads, and Levellers. Though surrounded by
dangers, beset by hardships, and often in danger of
perishing by famine, the emigrants to Jamestown
were a gay, thoughtless race, and seemed to have
caught from the neighboring savages that
improvidence
of the future, which is one of their leading
characteristics. They were not much given to long
prayers, or spiritual songs; they were equally loyal
and orthodox, though they claimed the right of
representation
,
as well as of being governed by their own
laws; and were occasionally fined for not attending
church on the Sabbath. With all this they were
hospitable
,
brave and generous, though as before hinted,
they could not forbear a fling at the Roundheads, and
had Harold been considered a permanent denizen, he
would have been placed in the unpleasant predicament
of being obliged to listen to the preaching of one of the
wolves in sheep's clothing, or suffer a fine, perhaps
imprisonment. As yet however he was ignorant of this
pleasant alternative, and having made acquaintance
with some of Oliver's old soldiers, who had come over
at the Restoration, he by degrees grew more reconciled
to his new position, though feeling every day the
inconveniences
of having no home, as well as the anxiety
of not being able to find one elsewhere. The situation
of his wife and daughter was still more unpleasant,
particularly that of the latter. A young unmarried
damsel was a
rara avis
in this portion of the new
world, and Harold was several times offered a hogshead
of tobacco for Miriam, by grave old cavaliers, seeking
a helpmate for their sons.
Under these circumstances, and influenced, perhaps,
by the persuasions of his wife and daughter, who were
exceedingly anxious to have a permanent home, he
at length determined to purchase a plantation, then
for sale, on the south side of the river, and at the
distance
of several miles from the capital. Thither he
carried his family and took up his abode, greatly to
the satisfaction of all, especially of old Mildred, who
had been more than once hooted at by the boys, while
singing pious hymns at her window. In the interim
of putting his household in order, he was hospitably
received and entertained by the proprietor of the
adjoining
estate, who added to these attentions his advice
and assistance, with an off-hand frankness and
liberality
which seems a growth of the soil of the new
world. Of this gentleman, it is proper to say
something
more particular, as he will figure largely in the
ensuing narrative.
The father of Mr. Hugh Tyringham, as this
gentleman
was called, was the scion of a younger branch of
a very ancient and noble family, that had become
illustrious
by changing sides some sixteen or eighteen times
during the wars of York and Lancaster, but withal
was much more distinguished for its blood than its
money. For several generations, the younger sons had
been compelled to live by their sword, or their wits, as
the family estate was barely sufficient to enable the
eldest son on whom it was entailed to marry and keep
up the breed. In cases of this kind, it is usual in
almost
all enlightened Christian countries, to give these
unlucky outcasts who are disinherited by their birth
a tolerable education, and then quarter them on the
country for a maintenance. Though deprived of their
share of the family property, they are welcome to the
family interest, which is always zealously exerted in
their behalf; and though the fortunate inheritor of the
estate is prohibited from selling any portion of it to
benefit the unlucky
Desdichado
, it is said he not
unfrequently sells himself for that benevolent purpose.
The father of the gentleman now introduced to the
reader was, like his father before him, a younger son,
and consequently destined to become a proteg of his
country. He received a good education, and acquired
the fashionable accomplishments of the age, which
together
with a purse of gold, a good steed, a competent
outfit of rich raimentan expensive article at that
timeand the parental blessing, constituted his
business
capital. The court was at that period the great
point of attraction to this species of adventurers, and
a handsome person the foundation of a man's fortune;
his Majesty King James the First, then on the throne,
as well as his immediate predecessor, being a great
admirer of masculine beauty. The young gentleman
in question possessed a face and figure in the highest
degree attractive, and in the hope of gaining the
notice of the King, bent his way towards the seat of
honors, full of agreeable anticipations.
After the manner of the heroes of good old fairy
lore, he travelled, and travelled, and travelled, until
at length, in due time, he arrived at the court of a
puissant monarch, who is said to have had little
discretion
and no valor; and of whom all our readers
have had a full and true account in romance, if not
history. Here he fell into the ranks of expectancy, and
continued a long time attending the motions of the
court with unwearied diligence and inexhaustible
patience, without having had the supreme felicity of
being spoken to, or in any way noticed by his Majesty
or his minions. By this time both his money and his
wardrobe became nearly exhausted, and he was
seriously
meditating the alternative of entering into
foreign
service, or adopting the expedient of Prince Hal
and his roystering companions. But those who wait
patiently the ebbing of the tide are sure to float on
the flood at last. And chance afforded what he could
not obtain by seeking.
Pacing one day in the antichamber of the King, his
Majestywho since the Gunpowder Plot had become
even more nervous than after the Gowrie conspiracy
being alone in his closet, chancing to hear a sound
which caused him to turn suddenly round, was so
grievously alarmed at seeing the reflection of his royal
person in a large mirror, that he mistook it for an
assassin, and cried out for help most lustily. Master
Tyringham, then under the lucky star, happened to
be the first who ran to the rescue, which he did, sword
in hand; and having through an unerring instinct
acquired by long residence at court, penetrated the
whole affair, stoutly asserted on this, as well as all
other occasions, that, on entering the closet, he had
distinctly seen a person with a dagger vanishing through
an opposite door.
This spirited exertion in behalf of the life and honor
of his sovereign, was not without its immediate fruits.
He was taken into special favor, and might in time
have supplanted Steeney, if the King had dared to
displace that formidable minion. His Majesty was
content for the present to bestow on him the high
responsible office of Gentleman Sewer, whose vocation
it was to change the king's plate, and see that he did
not wait for that important ceremony. What rendered
this promotion the more honorable was, the fact that
it had been bestowed in opposition to the entire
Scottish
influence at court, which was rallied in behalf
of a nobleman of that country whose ancestors had
become
illustrious from having been one hundred and
sixteen times in arms against their lawful sovereign.
Master Basil Tyringham was thenceforward
considered
a rising man at court. His personal comeliness
and accomplishments, added to his high position of
Sewer, in due time attracted the notice, and finally
secured the hand of one of the Maids of Honor, who
was even more in favor with the Queen than he was
with the King, whose secret he kept inviolable. The
lady was of course noble, and could trace her lineage
as high as Catharine Swineford, and Joan Hill, though
it must be confessed, she valued herself much more
on her paternal than maternal descent. However this
may be, a marriage took place, and though neither
could boast of much actual wealth, they calculated
with certainty on the bounty of the King, who was
excessively liberal of the money of his people. Nor
were they disappointed, for on the death of that
monarch
,
they retired at a respectable middle age, to a
competent estate in the country, graced by a title.
As might be supposed from his Norman extraction,
which had long since been certified by Lyon
King-at-arms
,
Lord Tyringham was exceedingly loyalfirst,
on the score of descent; secondly, in virtue of the high
office he had held; and thirdly, for the special reason
that the King is the fountain of all honors and profits.
The wise old gentleman at our elbow says he has
invariably observed that the most rampant loyalists
will surely be found among the tribe of petty officials.
The issue of this union, were two sons and a daughter.
The destiny of the eldest son was of course settled, by
the right of primogeniture; that of the younger was
equally certain; and the daughter was specially
brought up in the conviction that her first duty was to
practice moral restraint, and marry for an
establishment
,
in conformity to a long enduring and purely
aristocratic custom, which hath descended to the present
time. Hastening over this portion of our story, it is only
necessary to state that Hugh, the aforesaid younger
son, being predestined by Magna Charter to become a
national pauper, as his father had been before him,
was shortly after coming home from college, like him
sent forth to carve his way through life, under the
guidance of that Providence which is said to take
especial care of younger brothers.
The troubles of Charles the First's reign had now
approached a crisis, and Hugh Tyringham, having not
only a loyal father, but a loyal
alma mater
, proceeded
to London, where, through means of a college
acquaintance
,
he was received among that band of young
men equally loyal and wild, which had been drawn
about the palace of Whitehall, under color of
protecting
the King, but in reality, as was surmised, for the
purpose of overcoming the Parliament. Here he led
rather a disorderly life, frequenting ordinaries and
theatres; gambling when he had money; paying his
devoirs to tradesmen's wives, and quizzing the
Roundheads
whenever opportunity offered. The band
consisted
principally of younger brothers, of ancient
families, victims to the first-born of Egypt who naturally
fell into a state of abject dependence on the patronage
of the King, and became the servile instruments of
power. It is these who principally compose the officers
of European armies, and who, under the respectable
name of loyalty to the King, become the most
inexorable
oppressors of the people.
When this association of young sparks at Whitehall
was broken up by the jealousy of Parliament, and
hostilities had actually commenced, Hugh joined a
troop of horse in the service of the King, and fought
manfully in his cause, until Old Ironsides, and his
valiant psalm singers, after stripping him of his crown,
bereft him of the head that wore it. By the result of
the contest his family was temporarily exiled, and
himself left not only entirely destitute, but his person
placed in jeopardy. He was fain to secrete himself in
the great wilderness of London, where, under the
pressure of that iron necessity which is the only poor
excuse for actions otherwise inexcusable, he lived in a
manner not altogether reputable in the eyes of those
who are free from similar temptations. Still he
preserved
the stamina of a gentleman; and though in
some measure fallen, never descended so low as to be
quite irreclaimable. He still retained a distinct sense
of integrity and honor, and despised himself for what
rendered him despicable in the eyes of others. Above
all, he preserved his free and generous spirit in the
midst of every temptation, and his good qualities still
predominated over the exigencies of his situation.
Though soiled, he was not past washing. The stain
was not indelible.
When Oliver Cromwell assumed the Protectorship,
many Cavaliers, despairing of the restoration of the
Stuarts, and perhaps apprehensive for their own
safety, turned their eyes towards Virginia. Among
them was Master Hugh Tyringham, now equally
destitute
of fruition and hope. He applied to his brother,
who had taken refuge in Holland, and from him
received a remittance, which barely enabled him to
fit himself out, and pay his passage to the New World.
In this adventure he was accompanied by a faithful
follower, who had attached himself to his fortunes in
early youth, and never deserted him in their lowest
depression, either from real liking, or because he did
not know how to better his fortune.
Gregory Moth, as he was called, had accompanied
his master to Oxford, and acquired a smattering of
scholarship, at least so far as words went, as well as
of the fables, traditions, and antiquities of that ancient
seminary. He was moreover a great wag in his way,
though of infinite gravitya tipler upon occasion, and
a coward always. He was for ever anticipating
danger
,
that he might have an excuse for being frightened
without reason. Though he trembled at the very idea
of crossing the ocean, and had an insurmountable
antipathy to the Salvages, as Captain John Smith
calls them, he was so attached to his master, either
from habit or inclination, that he finally made up his
mind to accompany him. Accordingly, they
commenced
the voyage together, and after the usual long
passage of those days, at length launched on the capital
of Virginia, as helpless a pair of adventurers as ever
set foot on the virgin soil of the new world.
Tyringham however soon encountered, and was
welcomed by one two of his associates in the civil wars
who had preceded him, and introduced to some of the
old settlers. Being of a fine person, genteel address,
and frank, generous spirit, it was not long ere he
captivated
the affections of the heiress of a goodly
plantation
,
a discreet, sober, and excellent widow, not very
young, or very accomplished, but of gentle disposition
and great good sense. In the dearth of females which
then pervaded the colony, this lady had often been
wooed but never won, until Master Hugh Tyringham,
according to the phraseology of a lady of color in the
family, melted the ice of her yellow-baster heart.
With this excellent lady, he retired to the country,
to the cultivation of rural tastes and tobacco. He
succeeded rather better in the latter than the former;
and though liberal somewhat beyond prudence, found
himself waxing richer every revolving year. The first
question was what to do with his money, and after
due consideration, he as usual determined to consult
Gregory on the subject, who had long since become
his oracle. Accordingly, one pleasant evening as
Master
Tyringham was sitting, in the philosophic
enjoyment
of the fragrant weed, on his rustic piazza, and
Gregory, in order to recognize the degree of precedence
between himself and his master, on the lowest step.
Moth, said the old cavalierfor he by this time
was not youngMoth, repeated he, puffing out a
cloud of smoke, what think you of my building a
new house. He then chuckled a little, and said
partly to himself, I wonder what my lord brother
would say if he found me living in a log palace. Moth,
why the plague don't you speak?
Master, quoth Gregory, you know I never
speak without due consideration. I was reflecting on
the matter, and see but one objection.
Heywhat is that?
Why, sir, there is an old proverb in the way.
Heywhat is that, Moth?
Why, sir, that fools build houses, and wise men
live in them.
Pish! what care I for such musty old saws. Did
not King Solomon build him a magnificent house, and
send all the way to Lebanon for the timber?
Yea, quoth Gregory, but I never heard that
Solomon was held the wiser for it, any more than for
having so many wives and concubines. But there is
great wisdom in old sayings, master; they are, as it
were, a part of the common law, inasmuch as the
memory of men runneth not beyond them.
Pooh! Knowest thou not, Gregory, that what is
called long-established truth, is often nothing more
than grey-beard falsehood consecrated by time? But
a truce with your proverbs. I say I am resolved to
build a new house.
Well then, master of mine, I see no use in
asking
my opinion.
But I want your opinion as to what kind of a
house it shall be. I suppose you can give me that.
O, if that's the object, sir; well, you know there
are divers sorts of houses, to wit, the aulae lapidae,
the aulae plombeae; the aulae vitrae; the aulae
cum camino; and the aulae cum stramine cooperate
whereof the first is of stone, the second of lead, the
third of glass, the fourth hath a chimney, and the
fifth is thatched with straw. You can take your choice,
sir.
But I want your opinion, I tell you.
Well, sir, if I were in your place, I would not
build a stone house, because there is no stone within
fifty milesnor a leaden house, because the first
Indian
war that happens, it would be run into bullets
nor a glass house, because there are things occur in
all houses that ought not to be seen by everybody
nor a house with a chimney, because two are much
betterlastly, sir, I would by no means have you
build a straw house, inasmuch as you are continually
stumbling over single straws, and would certainly break
your nose over a straw house.
Moth; do you know I've a great mind to send
you on the expedition fitting out against the Indians.
They are in great want of men, and you will be a
host. If I can't get anything out of you, the colony
may.
This insinuation acted instantaneously on the nerves
of Master Gregory, who exclaimed in a paroxysm of
fearFor Heaven's sake, master, what put that in
your head? What have I said or done that you should
condemn me to be roasted alive, as I certainly shall be
if I go out against the pagan salvages. What was it
you wished to get out of me, sir?
Why your opinion about the house, confound you.
I don't want to know what house I ought not to build,
but what will be best.
O, is that all? Why then I should advise you,
sir, to build a wooden house, because there is plenty
of timber near at hand, and your new saw mill will
supply boards.
Gregory, quoth Mr. Tyringham, you're a
perfect oracle. The house shall be of wood, I am
determined
,
and now I will go and consult Mistress
Tyringham
.
He did so, and as that good lady never
opposed him, when he was in the rightan example
earnestly recommended to all discreet wives  the
wooden house was commenced on a great scale for the
new world and finished in due time, to the satisfaction
of all concerned. The building of the house was
followed
by the birth of a son, who was fast verging to
manhood, and in his own opinion already a man, at
the period when Harold Habingdon took possession of
the adjoining plantation. Having thus brought the
Cavalier and the Roundhead together, we shall proceed
straightforward in our journey, without once looking
behind.
Seldom have two men been brought together into
close contact with more points of dissimilarity than
Harold Harbingdon and Hugh Tyringham; and though
the latter with the spontaneous generosity that marked
his character had tendered the new comer his house,
his advice, and his services, it was next to impossible,
considering the bitter prejudices subsisting between
the Cavaliers and Roundheads which were as yet
unmitigated
by time, that they should ever become friends.
Both religion and politics forbade; and though oil and
vinegar are found to mingle together harmoniously in
the latter, yet has it unhappily been but too often
demonstrated
that religious antipathies, like those of
nature
,
are seldom reconciled. The stern and
self-sufficient
pride of human opinion seems more inflexible
here than elsewhere, and that which teaches
humility
becomes a source of arrogant intolerance.
7
To do the two gentlemen justice, they did not fall
out at the first encounter, nor during the brief sojourn
of Harold with the gay Cavalier, who made it a part
of his creed never to affront a guest, even though he
refused to pledge him in a bumper. Yet it cannot be
denied, that a solid foundation was laid at this early
period for a long series of suffering to those they loved
best on earth. Tyringham was the embodiment of a
sentiment which seems almost extinct at the present
time, when the feeling of loyalty to kings, which was
rather a slavish principle, has been almost superseded
by the more enlarged and manly one of patriotism.
Harolddoubtless stimulated by the plebeian blood
that contaminated his veinson the contrary was a
republican. One was high church; the other
abhorred
the prelacy, and was, in truth, as much of a
democrat in religion as politics. Without entering
into more minute chemical antipathies, it will readily
be seen that here were fruitful sources of discussion
on points which almost invariably end in contention
and dislike. As almost every man has an opinion of
his own, it is a great pity he is not willing to allow
the like privilege to others.
Still, however, the two neighbors being the only
settlers within a distance of several miles, continued
for some time to hold a lazy, indifferent sort of
intercourse
with each other, and to exchange the offices
of good neighborhood. The only son of the Cavalier
and the only daughter of the Puritan were thus
occasionally
brought together, but to all appearance took
no special note of each other. There was not much
difference in their ages, but a total dissimilarity of
disposition
.
Miriam Habingdon resembled her father in
the staid sobriety of his outward deportment, as well
as in the deep fervor of his inward feelings, and her
mother in her plaintive voice and gentle bearing. She
was naturally full of poetic feeling; but both the
precepts
and example of her father had taught her to
limit her enthusiasm to piety alone. For aught that
appeared otherwise, all her feelings were concentrated
in filial duty and profound devotion. Her reading had
been almost entirely confined to the Bible and books
of a serious cast; and her language had acquired
much of that apostolic simplicity which would indeed
seem inspiration, since it baffles all attempts at
imitation
.
Like her mother, her appearance was not
striking
at first; but the oftener she was seen the more she
gained on the eye and the heart, even of those who
were in some measure steeled by long cherished
prejudices. Her approaches were slow but sure; like
the bee, she gathered her honey almost imperceptibly,
and what she gained, she scarcely ever lost. Her
voice has already been commemorated, and was so
musical that good nurse Mildred solemnly declared
that she had rather listen to it than to a sermon; and
Gregory Moth, though he always called her the
Crop-ear
young lady, more than once assured Master
Langley Tyringham, that were he buried under the
Polar Sea, the very sound of her voice would melt him,
even as a Virginia dog-day. Miriam too had wit; but
it was a melancholy wit, which is said to be far more
dangerous than a merry one.
Master Langley Tyringham, though not quite of
age, and an only child, was yet a man in thought,
hardihood
and daring. Though brought up in the woods,
he was not to be scared by an owl; and though no
great scholar, his faculties had been awakened,
schooled and matured, by dangers and vicissitudes.
From his first breath of life, he had been surrounded
by savages, whose friendship was as precarious as
their enmity was active and terrible. His father lived
at the very outskirts of civilization, and was obliged
to be his own protector as well as avenger. In his
very childhood he had once been seized by an Indian
while playing on the verge of a wood near the house,
who was making off with him, when he was shot by
the father, and instantly killed. Tradition says that
the stout little fellow neither shed a tear or uttered a
cry on this occasion, but kicked, scratched and
struggled
manfully. He handled the rifle like a
backwoodsman
;
guided his boat on the river with the dexterity
of an Indian; tracked the wild deer with the instinct
of a hound; and took the lead on all occasions in
those rural sports which at this period were
accompanied
by perpetual exposures and dangers. Though not
accomplished according to the acceptation of this age,
he was by no means ignorant or unlettered. He had
for his instructor Gregory Moth, who boasted of being
an Oxford scholar, and who had indeed managed to
scrape together, by hook or by crook, from that vast
pile of accumulated learning, where so many bring
contributions and carry nothing away, a modicum of
scholarship that might almost pass muster at a college
examination. His father, also, who, when he brushed
off a little of the rust of time, was by no means
deficient
in general intelligence, paid no little attention to
his progress in learning. Though of a figure like that
of Apollo, or an Indian, he would not have made a very
brilliant debut at a modern fashionable assemblage;
but in all those qualities, moral, intellectual, and
physical, which give one man superiority over another
in the stern and trying warfare of the world, and in
times of suffering or danger make him the master
of his fellows, our herofor such he iswas liberally
gifted. In short, he was the very man for a new world
and a free country.
The gentle and courteous reader, who hath doubtless
had his perceptions brought to so fine an edge by a
constant study of cheap literature, that he can smell
a rat where there is not a mouse stirring, will assuredly
have anticipated our future disclosures by pronouncing
at once that the two young persons, just sketched, are,
long before this time, in love to distraction, and that
the secret is just about being formally disclosed. But
he is quite out in his reckoning, and had better be
quiet until he knows what he is talking about. The
two young people are not in love with each other, nor
shall they be until it is our good pleasure to make
them so. It is a sin and a shame that an author
cannot
be allowed to keep his own secrets till he sees
proper to disclose them, and that some prying,
disagreeable
readernot one of ours, of coursewill always be
putting in his oar, and plumping the boat high and
dry ashore, when, in fact, the pains-taking author is
not yet half through the voyage, thus bringing his
work to an untimely end, by satiating the reader's
appetite before he has half finished his dinner. We
hereby pledge ourselves that this young couple did not
fall in love at first, or second, sight. Miriam shrunk
from the high spirits and frank deportment of Langley,
while he felt chilled, if not repelled, by what he
considered
the stiff, cold, and distant reception he always
received from Miriam. It was ten to one they would
soon dislike each other heartily, unless some
unexpected
obstacle presented itself to their intercourse;
for as the thunderstorm approaches apparently against
the wind, so do the passions of the human race
strengthen by opposition, and expend themselves
with greater force when that opposition is overcome.
In the meantime, the coolness between the Cavalier
and the Roundhead gradually approached the freezing
point. It was not as yet exhibited in any sudden
outbreak
of spleen, or exemplified by any overt act. It
matured by degrees, and became more inflexible, as
well as lasting, from the slowness of its growth. It
was not active hatred, but passive, inveterate dislike.
There was not only conflicting opinions and prejudices,
but opposite habits to encounter; and these last are by
far the most difficult to reconcile. The stiff sobriety,
colloquial precision, and staid abstinence of Harold, ill
suited with the frank speech and manners, or the
convivial habits of the Cavalier, who swore he could
never elevate the Crop-ear one degree above zero, and
who cherished a sovereign contempt for a fellow who
had so little of the spirit of good-fellowship in him,
that he would not drink a glass of wine with a friend,
even against his conscience.
Two events happened about this period, which
contributed
to bring about a non-intercourse between the
two neighbors. In a little skirmish that took place at
an accidental meeting, on the subject of the Prelacy,
Harold had roundly asserted that the mitre of the
bishops was a Pagan device, borrowed from the
high-priest
of ancient Rome. The Cavalier, who, it must
be acknowledged, was more zealous than pious, took
fire at this attack on the hierarchy, and covenanted
with himself that he would cut the Crop-ear out and
out, from that time forward. But the holidays were
now approaching, and softened by the benign and jolly
influence of that beneficent saint who presides over
the season of good wishes, good things, and good
fellowship, the Cavalier sent Harold a frank, cordial
invitation to meet a few friends from the capital at a
Christmas dinner. The invitation was promptly
declined, with the additional offence of a slur on
Christmas festivities, which, being of Pagan origin,
Harold denounced as unworthy of Christians. This
was not very polite; but zeal often gets the better
of good manners.
The Cavalier was a great lover of holidays, which,
he maintained, were invented on purpose to afford
occasional opportunities for the poor to eat, drink, and
be merry. Especially did he delight in the hilarity
of the little children on these occasions, and the
obstreperous jollity of his colored dependents, who
managed to crowd into a small compass as much
enjoyment as would sprinkle a whole life of those whose
sole employment is hunting it throughout the world.
Neither did he like holidays the less, that they gave
him a fair opportunity of indulging his own convivial
propensities, by gathering a few of his old cronies
about him from the capital, and feasting them royally.
He was therefore highly indignant at Harold's refusal,
and especially resented his reflections on the venerable
Christmas holidays. As he complained that he never
could stimulate his wife to sympathize in his
extempore
bursts of indignation, it was his custom on all
such occasions to summon Gregory Moth, who, either
from long and faithful services, or through the
influence
which the air of the new world seems to exercise
over all those who breathe it for any length of time,
had of late been admitted to a reasonable degree
of equality, and aspired to that freedom of speech
which is held the birthright of Americans.
Plague take that impenetrable Roundhead, said
Master Tyringham, to Gregory, who was seldom far
from his master; he will neither eat, drink, or be
merry; and what is such a man good for, I should
like to know. It will take ten summers in Virginia
to thaw him. What shall I do with the fellow?
Call him outhey?
Sir Master, quoth Gregory, logically speaking,
before I undertake to advise you what to do, it is
manifestly expedient for me to know what has been
done unto you.
Why the psalm-singing curmudgeon has not only
refused to dine with me at Christmas, but insists that
keeping Christmas is a Pagan custom altogether
unseemly
in Christians. What think you of such a
felloweh?
Why, sir, logically speaking
O confound your logic. If you will speak, say
something to the purpose.
Well, sir, syllogistically speaking
'Slife, Gregory, what has a Roundhead to do with
syllogisms. I want your advice as to how I shall
manage this two-legged cabbage, who, I verily believe,
vegetates against his conscience.
Well, sir, how can I give my opinion of a single
individual without first defining the species? And
how can I define the species except logically or
syllogistically
?
You might as well judge of a goose by
its feathers.
WellwellI know you are an obstinate ass,
with ears only the longer from having brayed against
the outside of a college. You make as great a display
of your shreds and patches as others do of a whole
suit. But proceed, either logically or syllogistically,
just as you please; and as I perceive very clearly you
7*
are going to make a speech as long as a Roundhead's
prayer, I will light my pipe and take a seat under this
tree. Proceed, sir.
Well, sir, replied the other, taking his seat on
the green sward, in order to define what man
really is, it is proper and right, nay, absolutely
necessary
,
that we should go to the fountain-head. I will
therefore, begin with Adam.
The Devil you will! cried Master Tyringham,
taking the pipe from his mouth, and puffing out a
cloud of smokepfew! But pray proceed, Master
Gregory, with your infernal logic.
Infernal logic, sir? Why, Master, the excellence
of logic is such as cannot be expressed in words,
conveyed
by signs, or embodied in thought. It is a net
that no man can escape, a cobweb from which no fly
can disentangle himself. It muzzles the mouth of
ignorance, silences the chattering of fancy, and chokes
a wild boar
Chokes a wild boar? exclaimed Master
Tyringham
.
How do you make that out, Gregory?
As thus, sir, logically. It is authentically
delivered
by tradition, which being the father of history,
is therefore more venerable and infallible, that a
scholar of Oxford, in days when wild boars came to
college, I don't mean, sir, that they studied, or took
their degrees, as A. B., A. M., LL.D., and such like,
but when they prowled about, shortly after King Brute
and his valiant Trojans laid the foundation of the first
college at Oxford.
Well, get on with your story, and have done with
these old greybeard tales.
As I was saying, sir, a scholar of Oxford, having
retired to a neighboring forest to pursue his studies,
was surprised and sorely beleaguered by a huge wild
boar, the which he finally utterly discomfited by
thrusting a volume of Aristotle down his throat, which
choked him incontinently.
Faith, Gregory, I don't wonder at it. I was
nearly choked in the same way myself. But to the
point. I desire to know what I am to do with the
Roundhead.
Very well, Master, to proceed logically, though I
don't hold it absolutely necessary, yet it appears to me
quite indispensable
Hem, quoth Mr. Tyringham.
That we should go a little beyond Adam, whereby
we shall be the better able to tell what man is, by
defining what he is not, for, as Aristotle says, your
negatives are sometimes more potent than your
affirmatives
,
especially when they hunt in couples. If you
please then, sir, we will begin at the creation of the
world.
Here Master Tyringham leaned back against the
tree, and shut his eyes, probably that he might see
the clearer into Gregory's logic.
I remember, sir, continued Master Moth, there
was in our time a great dispute concerning the
question
whether or not the world ever had a beginning,
and that one learned professor lost his wits in seeking
a solution. But however that may be
Here Gregory observed his master beginning to nod,
and that his pipe was very near scorching the flaps of
his waistcoat, whereupon he essayed to wake him by
crying out, in a loud voice, For my part, sir, I have
a sort of disagreeing consent to this theory, and think
I can see in the perspicuous cloud of human reason a
clear way to get into insurmountable difficulty by
striving to get out of it. I will therefore whisper in
a loud voice and be silent, in order that I may
penetrate
the deep shallowness of my hearer.
What's that you are saying? quoth Master
Tyringham
,
rubbing his eyes. Deep shallownesshow
can that be, you blockhead? It is downright
contradiction
a
logical paradox.
By your leave, sir, answered Gregory, there
is nothing so apposite to the illustration of a logical
truth, as direct opposites, whereby we the more clearly
discern the exact likeness of a thing by seeing
something
as unlike it as possible: just as we become the
more sensible of the presence of ghosts by their being
invisible.
Very wellthat will do, Gregory, said his
master
,
interrupting him, I understand a Roundhead
perfectly. Please to take the boat and catch a
sturgeon
for dinner. You will doubtless succeed best
among the deep shallows of the river.
Gregory departed well pleased that he had indulged
his humor, and what, indeed, was his principal object
in all such discussions, gained time for his master's
choler to evaporate, which it did very soon, for though
quick to anger, like his own trusty rifle, he cooled
immediately, the moment he had discharged his load.
The Cavalier called for his horse, and proceeded, as
was his daily custom, on a tour of inspection over his
plantation, which was some miles about. For this he
had two very rational objects; the first to see how
matters were going on with the tobacco; the second
to get an appetite for dinner, which, however it may
be despised by sentimentalists, is by no means to be
contemned by philosophers. He who cannot relish his
dinner, can scarcely relish anything else; and the
man who can enjoy his meals and sleep soundly at
night, must not only possess good health, but be
blessed with a clear conscienceor none at all.
As usual in these peregrinations, he encountered his
overseer, with whom he consulted, and to whom he
gave his advice on various matters, about which he
knew little or nothing. The overseer informed him,
among other things, he had that morning heard a
rumor
that the Roanoke Indiansa tribe once reputed
to speak Welsh, were meditating an incursion towards
Powhatan River, and advised the necessary precautions
to guard against surprise. These Indians had not
long ago smoked the Calumet with the Governor; but
mutual suspicions, mutual apprehensions, mutual
aggressions
,
and long cherished recollections of past
injuries
,
rendered it exceedingly difficult, if not impossible,
to maintain a lasting good understanding between the
Redman and the white. At this distant period of time,
it is useless to inquire, and perhaps impossible to
ascertain in all cases, which was to blame, or which
most to be blamed. Both parties feared each other,
and fear is the parent of hatred. In this, as in many
other cases, a looker-on is not the best judge. He
may see, but cannot feel the most; and to decide this
question, the umpire should be placed in the same
situation with the early pioneers of the new world. It
is not to be settled in the peaceful chimney corner, by
pious old ladies, or universal philanthropists. On his
way home, the Cavalier, forgetting his late affront,
called on Harold, to give him warning that he might
be prepared for what should happen. But that
gentleman
,
having not yet realized the obligations imposed
on him by his new situation, and the absolute
necessity
that any man should become not only his own
defender, but the protector of others, talked about the
abstract principles of justice; and losing sight of the
great law of self-defence, declined to take any measures
for that purpose, as it went against his conscience. He
had never injured the savages, nor had they ever
injured him, and he relied on Providence alone for
protection.
Master Habingdon, said Tyringham, with
emphatic
seriousness, I am a magistrate, and it is my
duty to see the laws executed, most especially those
necessary to the safety of life and property. Among
these is one which makes it incumbent on every male
member of the community, not disqualified by age or
infancy to bear arms, and be ready at a moment's
warning, to defend himself and protect others. Now,
sir, however contrary it may be to my feelings as a
neighbor, I am bound by my oath of office, to see that
all do their utmost in time of danger, and I shall be
obliged to enforce the law against you, in the event of
an inroad of the savages. Until then, I will shut my
eyes and say nothing, in hopes that you will think
better
of it.
Master Tyringham, replied Harold, stiffly, I
always act from principle, leaving it to Providence to
shape the consequences. From all I can learn, these
wild men of the woods have been treated harshly and
unjustly, and if we suffer for it, I conceive it is only a
salutary atonement. I should scruple to shed blood in
a cause like this.
After shedding it in the cause of rebellion, sir
said the other, I should suppose you might be less
scrupulous. The man who has drawn his sword
against his king, need not shrink from employing it
against his enemies.
Master Tyringham, you and I differ so widely on
this subject, that argument is useless. You are under
my roof, sir, and came here on a friendly errand. I
cannot forget what I owe you as a guest, and I expect
you to remember what is due to me as your host.
The blood of the Cavalier was roused, and that of
Harold, with all his self-command, tingled in his veins,
for the slur of rebellion against a cause he still held
sacred, was a bitter pill. Many keen passes took
place between them, and they parted worse friends
than they met.
The old Cavalier had scarcely issued from the
premises
of the Roundhead, when he met young Master
Langley, riding that way, as if intending a visit, and
somewhat testily desired him to turn to the right
about and go with him. As they proceeded
homewards
,
he repeated what he had heard concerning the
savages, and being too impatient to enter on the
particulars
of his interview with Harold, abruptly desired
him, in a tone not to be misunderstood, to desist in
future from all intercourse with a person who had
bore arms against his lawful sovereign, yet scrupled
to do so in defence of his wife, his family, his
neighbors
and his country.
Now be it known, that Langley Tyringham cared
not a rush for the family of the Roundheads, male or
female, and cherished a positive antipathy to old
Mildred
,
who had divers times put herself in his way and
attempted to convert him. He particularly disliked
the stiff, starched manners of Harold; knew little of
his wife whom he seldom saw; and, though
sometimes
struck with the eloquent simplicity of Miriam's
words, the gentle melody of her voice, and the
harmony
of her face and person, never failed in the end to
be repelled by the staid, sober gravity of her manners.
If left to himself, or if accident had decreed they
should meet no more, it is probable he might never
have thought of her again. As it was, he bowed in
submission to the will of his father, deciding at the
same time in his own mind, that the good gentleman
was a little unreasonable.
When alone he recurred to the subject again, and
after long cogitation as to what special reason his
father had to establish this system of non-intercourse,
at length came to the conclusion that he was under
serious apprehension, that himself and Miriam either
had, or were about to fall in love with each other.
There was something most mischievously titillating in
the idea and its consequences; he thought a good deal
about it that night, fell asleep, and for the first time
in his life dreamed of Miriam.
CHAPTER VII.
Rights of AuthorsWisdom of Gregory MothThe Author Reminded
of One of his HeroinesSomething that May peradventure Give
Offence to Nine-tenths of Our ReadersLittle Miriam Habingdon
Hunts up an ExcitementAn Accidental MeetingA Parting
Langley Tyringham Calls Names.
Every
writer of a romance has an undoubted right to
tell his own story, in his own way, at his own peril.
Some gallop, some trot, some creep along like a snail
with his house on his back, and some stop so often by
the road-side, that the gentle reader is out of all
patience. Some are in such a violent hurry that they
crowd the incidents pell-mell together in most
inextricable
disorder, without connexion or explanation;
others are so careful in preparing the way for what
follows, that the reader forgets what went before, and
anticipates what is coming after, very often with more
certainty than the author. Some are of such
ineffable
modesty that they never venture to appear in their
own proper persons, except, perhaps, in the title page
or preface; while others are so fond of hearing
themselves
talk, that they are very apt to prose the reader
to sleep. Some seem to think that a rapid, unceasing
succession of incident is indispensable to keep the
reader awake; while others, on the contrary, consider
their own thoughts so much better than the actions of
other people, that they are perpetually intruding their
individual tastes, opinions, and feelings, forgetting that
the generality of mankind are so egotistical
themselves
,
that they can't endure the egotism of others.
Action, or incident, is undoubtedly one of the main
props of fictitious narrative, and hence every writer of
romance should pay special attention to that point.
If he finds his fancy, invention, or memory deficient, in
this indispensable material, he must then resort to
talking, and set his actors to making long speeches, or
he must become philosophical and aspire to the dignity
of teaching. It sometimes doubtless happens, that the
author has plenty of incidents on hand, but is at a loss
for motives strong enough to render events sufficiently
probable. There is but one remedy for this. He must
give actions without motives, whereby he will greatly
astonish the reader, and produce an agreeable
excitement
.
The most deplorable case, however, is when an
author has ploughed the fertile bog of his
understanding
,
till it has become a perfect pine barren, in which
the principle of vegetation is entirely extinct. Nothing
is then left him but to make the most of nothing. He
must loiter along like a school-boy, anon chasing
butterflies
,
and next skipping stones in every puddle by
the way. Whenever he introduces a personage, he
should be very particular in giving the precise hour,
or minute of his appearance; be sure to apprise the
reader what kind of a day or night it is, and whether
the moon shines. Most important of all, he should
describe the gentleman's dress to the very button, and
by no means ever send him on a visit to his mistress
without apprising the reader whether or not he had
been previously shaved.
If the debutant is a lady, he should be, if possible,
still more particular, and enact the man-milliner to
the utmost extent of his genius, which, if deficient in
this important particular, should by all means be
refreshed by an application to some competent
authority
among the French milliners. It is indispensable
that he should individualize, and not omit a single
item, except such as claim the privilege of invisibility.
In short, he should take pattern after the London
scribes who chronicle the stupendous events of a
birth-night
ball, and tell us to a penny the value of a lady's
jewels. By these, and other adroit expedientsof
which the present discussion may serve as a specimen
it is amazing (we speak from experience) with what
ease a couple of volumes of cheap literature may be
spun out of an exceedingly small modicum of the raw
material, and how much wear and tear is saved to a
weather-beaten fancy. But we will say no more, least
the intelligent reader should suspect us of seeking to
appear wiser than himself, a degree of presumption we
utterly disclaim. Our sole object has been to throw out
a few hints for the benefit of the rising generation,
gleaned in the course of a long experience in the
mysteries
of authorship. Having done this, we will take
up the clue of our story, if we can find it again.
The Cavalier, as previously hinted, returned home
in great dudgeon, and, according to custom,
summoned
Gregory to a cabinet council on the subject of the
reported movement of the savages. He accounted
that trusty knave the best of all counsellors, since
he was accustomed to boast that he had an instinct
apprising him of any coming danger, which he could
foretell with as much certainty as an almanac does
the weather.
Come hither, sirrah, said Master Tyringham,
you are a notorious poltroon, and they say cowardice
is sometimes inspired with good counsel. I hear the
savages are preparing to fall upon us.
You call me coward, sir, answered Gregory,
but say what you will, there is not a more valiant
man in the colony, so long as danger keeps at a
distance
.
And you take special care always to keep it so,
for you never fail to run away before it comes in
sight.
Just so, sir,that is to say, before it becomes
visible to vulgar eyes. I have a sort of second sight
of danger, and always flee before the shadow, because
I know the substance cannot be far off. I am not, I
thank the sign that governed my nativityto wit, the
crab that feeds by moonlightone of those stupid
people, who, not seeing danger till it is too late to
escape, are compelled to fight in spite of their teeth,
and then desperation passes for valor.
Good-now will you, who understand the subject
so thoroughly, define a man of courage, according to
your system of logic?
Why, sir, your true courageous Philistine
Gregory, don't repeat that infernal word again; it
is perpetually in the mouth of that canting
Roundhead
yonder, who has scruples of conscience in
fighting
against any one but the King and the Church.
Do you know he just now as much as called me a
Philistine, and talked of repelling the savages with
praying and psalm-singing. Instead of Philistines
say Moabites.
Or Hittites, if your worship pleases. But
touching
the logical definition, sir, your only true man of
valor is he who holds danger in such sovereign
contempt
that he incontinently turns his back on it; or,
what is still more incontestible demonstration of
heroism
,
is so little afraid of death that he makes no
resistance, and dies quietly like a true philosopher. A
murrain take those dastardly bullies who are forever
fighting through pure fear of being called cowards. For
my part, I am not afraid of that namenot Iand if
I keep myself out of harm's way, it is only for fear I
should cry out before I am hurt. Others may die from
sheer cowardice, but, for my part, I am not afraid to
live.
'Slife, Gregory, you are the first fool I ever met
with that took such pains to prove himself a coward.
Coward, sir! didn't I follow you to the wars, and
courageously eschew all danger, in spite of the
floutings
of those pestilent knaves, that fought only that
they were afraid to run away, because they feared
dishonor more than death? A man like me has some
right to boast, when he can set his face manfully
against all the world and despise its ridicule. Is not
this a greater proof of valor than to face a single
enemy? You forget, sir, that I saved the whole royal
army by crying out one night that the Crop-ears were
upon them, whereby they were the better prepared for
their coming next morning.
Why, friend Gregory, you have mistaken your
vocation, and were certainly intended for a senior
wrangler. I predict to a certainty you will one day
meet death in the teeth by running away from him.
With your permission, sir, I'd rather it were in
the night, for I should not like to die in my own
presence
,
and see myself after I was dead.
WellwellI confess you to be as courageous as
a hen partridge protecting her young. But enough of
this. I wished to consult your apprehensive cowardice
concerning the probability of this rumor. What think
you, will the caitiffs come?
Beyond question, MasterI feel it in my bones;
they always ache before a basting, and my short ribs
have lately troubled me sorely. Besides I have a
strange tingling sensation about my head, which
causes my hair to stand on end of late, and I think
betokens its loss ere long.
Will you never be serious, thou incorrigible
buffoon
?
Is this a time to be jesting; and would you
think it a laughing matter if the savages were to come
in the middle of the night and wake us up with the
yell of death, never to sleep again except in the arms
of death? Or what is still worse, think of their
carrying
us away captive, not to spare our lives, but to
make death a thousand times more lingering,
agonizing
and terrible. I think I see at this moment our
bleeding scalps torn from our heads, reeking with
blood; our skins bristling with sharp pine knots,
smoking and blazing like lighted torches; our heads
left naked to the brain, covered with live coals; our
legs up to the knees in burning embers, and our bodies
expiring in agonies beyond the reach of thought, or
the utterance of the tongue. This is no theme for
jesting or laughter. Before to-morrow morning we
may have a chorus of dying groans and shrieks of
anguish.
But never man was farther from laughing than
Gregory Moth at this moment. The appalling picture
presented by his master had stirred him up to an
agony of terror. He was on his knees, his eyes wildly
glaring around, his limbs trembling, his teeth
chattering
,
and his tongue cleaving to the roof of his mouth. His master contemplated him with a sort of scornful
pity, and when he had somewhat recovered, said:
Well, sir, are you now prepared to give your
advice
seriously?
Yeees, sir, replied Gregory, trembling,
Yees, sir. My advice is to make the best of our
way to the capital, without once looking behind, and
depart thence in the first ship for Old England, where
these are none of these copper-colored villains.
What! leave my home to be burnt, my estate to
be plundered, and return to England a beggar, as I left
it? Nono, Gregory, those who look for
independence
and fortune here must fight for it. So let me
hear what else you have to propose. I know you are
not such an ass as you affect to be, and can give good
counsel when you please.
Gregory rallied, and, after due consideration,
delivered
himself to this effect. He advised that
information
of the rumor should be sent to the capital, with a
request for assistance; that the house of Master
Tyringham
should be put in as good a state of defence as
possible; that none of the family should be permitted
to stray from home; and that a watch should be set
at night to give notice of danger.
Gregory, said his master, I say and swear it
you are an oracle. Though you yaw about like a ship
without a rudder, you never fail to come safe into port
at last. It is exactly what I had determined on before
I asked your advice.
Hum, quoth Gregory, I thought as much. My
master never consults anybody until he has made up
his mind to do as he pleases.
Preparations were accordingly made in accordance
with the advice of the sage Gregory. But it would
seem, if people are to be caught at all, they are
caught napping. Our friend, the wise old gentleman,
observes on this occasion that it is better to make
preparation
8
a hundred times against danger that never
comes, than to be caught once unprepared when it
arrives. The savages did not come this time. The
rumor probably arose from those unceasing
apprehensions
which would have rendered a residence under such
circumstances intolerable, were it not that perpetual
danger is its own antidote. It is among the special
mercies of Providence, that what mankind are
condemned
to endure without ceasing ceases by degrees
to be unbearable; and that the burden which must be
inevitably borne becomes lighter the longer it is
carried
.
The calm which had for a time been ruffled by
the rumor of Indian hostilities again returned; the
every day business of life went on as before, and the
good people became more confident that the danger
was past, from their having been needlessly alarmed.
But methinks we hear the gentle reader
complaining
that we have lately said nothing of the ladies,
who most assuredly have the best right to figure in
romance, because the greatest number of readers
belong
to the sex. After cheating me, methinks I
hear you say, into a belief that Susan Baneswright
was to be your heroine, and Harold Habingdon your
hero, you drop the one entirely, and say little or
nothing about the other. Is she dead? If so you
might have said something civil about her. For aught
I can see we are to have neither hero or heroine.
Gentle reader! Susan is not dead. But what could
we say of her worthy the dignity of romance? She
has kept on the even tenor of her way, gently
revolving
in the quiet circle of the domestic fireside,
carefully
fulfilling all those noble duties on which women
are now taught, by mischievous discussions on their
rights, to look down with contempt as degrading to
the sex, but which contribute far more to their own
happiness, and that of the entire human race, than all
the equivocal virtues of an Elizabeth, or all the
dangerous
talents of a Corinne. It is not, quoth the wise
old gentleman at our side, it is not by her efforts
without
doors, but within; it is not by winning public
admiration, but by private acts, her unseen, but not
unfelt agency; not by leading armies, subduing
kingdoms
,
governing states, or mingling in the
contaminating
strife of manhood, but by instilling into the
future man those virtues which prepare him for the
performance of high achievements, and the exercise of
great virtues, that woman best fulfils her divine
mission
.
Surely it is enough that one-half the human
race is compelled to delve in Mammon's mine, to
smother or control the generous impulses of the heart,
and become selfish in self-defence. In the name of
virtue and humanity, let not the other half be
engulphed
in the vortex of this scuffling world, least it
become a hell, and be peopled by fiends. The best
praise of woman is never to be talked of by the world.
Silence is her most eloquent eulogium; the approving
thoughts of others her highest praise, and the suffrage
of heaven her richest reward. So saith the old
gentleman
;
but it must be confessed he is at least a
hundred
years behind the spirit of the age.
As our first object in this work was to gain the
approbation of the highest order of fashionable readers
we had determined to avoid all low, common-place
topics, and especially all such domestic concerns as
exclusively appertain to the vulgar. But as the reader
is determined to know something more of good
Mistress
Habingdon, he must be gratified at all hazards.
Be it known, then, that Susan passed most of her time
in plying her needle and knitting stockings. As an
apology for these ignoble occupations, it should be
recollected that at this period there were no
men-milliners
in the new world, and as for seamstresses and
spinsters, professionally, nothing of the kind was ever
heard of. Young women were too valuable to become
hired menials, and a damsel of ordinary attractions
was a prize for a first-rate planter. If not worth her
weight in gold she was in tobacco.
Yet it cannot be denied that the needle is an
instrument
of more value than the sword, the revolving
pistol, or even the Big Gun of the conqueror of
California, being most potent in keeping women out
of mischief. How many heavy hours does it while
away that would otherwise be spent in yawning
lassitude
,
or exerted in the fruitless pursuit of some
fleeting
shadow that mocks her as it flies; and what a zest
it gives to the hours of rest and relaxation, or to the
employment of the mind in wholesome study, or quiet
contemplation. A stitch in time not only saves nine,
but kills time, while it excites a gentle interest, by
carrying her who plies the needle to the end of her
seam. At least one half the errors and follies, not to
say crimes, of the human race, quoth the wise old
gentleman, originate in not knowing what to do with
themselves. Excitement of some kind or other is
indispensable, and those who don't find it in business
must seek it in pleasure or mischief. Having run
down one fancied pleasure, they soon become sated,
and seek another more piquant and racy, until at
length mere folly grows insipid, and excitement can
only be allayed by guilty indulgence. It is matter of
surprise that our lawyers don't urge this in
extenuation
of murder, instead of laying it to the temptations
of the devil, or resorting to the old threadbare plea of
insanity. But a great portion of these temptations
may be avoided by the gentle sex if they will only
resort to the needle, which is a sort of non-conductor
to all sorts of mischief. As the lightning rod protects
the house from the dread flashes of the angry cloud,
so does the needle ward off the besetting sin of love,
insomuch that it is an established truth that no woman
can possibly thread her needle while thinking of her
sweetheart. Well might the goddess of wisdom,
continues
the old gentleman, dispute with Arachne the
superior management of the needle,
[1]
[1]
Some pretend it was the distaff.
and change that
notable damsel into a spider for excelling her in
stitching
,
for it is most undoubtedly the greatest of all
female accomplishments. Would I were a tailor!
Not that Susan devoted herself exclusively to the
needle. The spinning wheel was not then quite
obsolete
,
and often, yea, every day, though not all day
long, would she and Miriam join in the harmonious
concert of the spinning wheel. It was worth a trip to
the Nile to see them, as they sat side by side, on a
balmy spring morning, at an open window that looked
out over a spacious greensward, dotted with trees, as
old as the flood, on the wide expanse of the shining
river. Dressed in the simple fashion of the sect,
without
ornaments of any kind, they might almost pass
for sisters. Susan was one of those jewels of women
that grow handsomer as they grow old, and though, as
long ago stated, no beauty when young, had become
one of the most comely of matrons. Miriam was the
genuine representative of a very small class of females,
that like a glorious landscape cannot be described,
because
no words can convey an idea of the expression
of one, or the cunning dexterity of nature in combining
the other. As the mother and daughter plied this
most graceful of occupations, their appearance was
touchingly attractive. The easy motions of the head
and chest, keeping time with those of the little foot;
one hand touching the light distaff, the other moving
to and fro as it drew forth the slender thread and
returned it again, all formed a picture fresh from the
hand of nature, more graceful and alluring than all
the grimaces and contortions of sickly affectation. Talk
of the waltz, the polka and mazourkapshaw!
In those long delicious summer twilights, equally
dear to the poetic as the contemplative mind, it was
their custom to ramble along the shore of the river
whose silvery sands, washed by the salt waters of the
not distant ocean, the hollow drumming of whose surf
might sometimes be heard, afforded a pleasant
promenade
.
On these occasions they were generally
escorted by Harold, and sometimes, previous to the
prohibition of the wrathful Cavalier, by Langley
Tyringham, when he chanced to come that way.
Their conversation was generally of a sober, pious cast,
sometimes enlivened by the spritely or enthusiastic
sallies of the youth, who, with all his active, vigorous
habits of body, was of an imaginative mind. These,
though they excited a smile in the face of Susan, and
sometimes a thrill in the heart of Miriam, were
received by Harold with a stiff, discouraging gravity,
which, though not expressed in words, was sufficiently
intelligible.
Harold was a sincerely pious man. He loved his
Maker, but did not seem to love His works; and when
Langley and sometimes Miriam broke forth in
admiration
of the glories of the setting sun, or the silvery
beauty of the rising moon, would check their innocent
and happy feelings, by drawing contemptuous contrasts
between the eternal omnipotence of the Creator, and
the frail duration of all created things. He did not
seem to comprehend the beautiful truth, that there is
an inseparable connexion between the great Creator
and His works, which are the Jacob's ladder by which,
step by step, we ascend to the beneficent Architect of
all these wonders. Where shall we look for a livelier
type of infinite goodness, than in the beauties of
nature, and the bounties of the generous earth? Where
shall we look for a more striking exemplification of
His mercy than in the rich gifts He has bestowed on
wayward, ungrateful man? And where shall we find
a greater proof of His omnipotence, than in
contemplating
the uncircumscribed infinitude of His glorious
universe?
It is greatly to be regrettedsays the wise old
genman
aforesaidthat rigidly righteous persons do not
sometimes condescend to make themselves agreeable
to those who are not precisely so; that they clothe
religion in sackcloth and ashes; war against the
cheerful
hilarity of youth, and the innocent recreations of
manhood; and convert a smiling cherub into a
scowling
demon, looking askance at all that adorns and
embellishes human existence. Thus is the balmy
solace sent to cheer us onward through the thorny
path of life converted into gall and bitterness; and
the light intended to guide us to port, becomes not a
beacon to the haven of rest, but to the iron-bound
coast of gloom, despondency, and despair. It were
much to be wished that piety would make herself
more amiable to the young, instead of adopting that
species of monkish austerity, by which the anchorites
of old sought to starve their way to heaven, by
rejecting
the bounties of the earth. Surely, to turn our
backs on nature and all her beautiful works in sour
disdain; to refuse to partake in the banquet spread
out before us, because it may sometimes be enjoyed
to excess; or to stifle those glorious impulses of
genius, which, if anything on earth can claim so
high a mission, are direct emanations from that spirit
which is everywhere and eternal; to war on smiles
and laughter, which are among the gifts bestowed on
man alone, of all created beings, and to shut our senses
in bitter spleen against all the good provided for us
hereto do this, is surely neither conformable to
reason, philosophy or religion, but a fanatical
perversion
of a glorious blessing.
Harold became every day more deeply infected with
this bitter piety, and both Susan and Miriam in some
degree partook of its twilight gloom. They lived as it
were in the shadow of life, and never enjoyed the
sunshine
in all its warmth and brilliancy. Still they
were, perhaps, as happy as their neighbors; for it
would be a sad thing if there was but one wholesome
and palatable dish in this world, seeing that each one
has his peculiar favorite.
But Miriam was fortunate about this time in having
a new excitementa gentle one it is truebut any
excitement was better than none, to one whose whole
life was one day so like the other. At the expiration
of some ten days, or perhaps a fortnight, after the
interdict of the Cavalier, she was sitting at the
window
admiring the setting sun, and the many-colored,
ever-changing tints of the river and the skies, which
gave forth their brightest hues to the dying day.
Without being actually engaged in contemplating the
past, or anticipating the future, her fancy, like the
butterfly among the flowers, was lightly skimming
8*
from one to another, without closing its wings, or
settling
on either. In this state of wayward wandering,
it all of a sudden occurred to her that she had not seen
Langley Tyringham for a great while. She did not
much like him to be sure, and cared not if she ever
saw him again. He was too gay and flighty, too
headlong and enthusiastic for her taste; and she had
seen him actually drink wine. Nay, it was told her
by Mildred, who had it from Gregory Moth, that he
sometimes danced at balls at the capital, and had on
more than one occasion attended a horse race. Such
a man could be nothing to her; but still she could not
help, somehow or other, wondering a little why he did
not call at the house, or meet them in their evening
walks, as he used to do once or twice a week. In a
word, she began to think of Langley Tyringham, and
the longer his absence continued, the more she
wondered why, until at last her curiosity became
quite uncomfortable. It was the old story; what she
slighted in possession was valued when lost, and
Miriam by degrees became conscious that Master
Langley
had been a very efficient spoke in the wheel of
time. Of late that worthy old gentleman of the hour
glass had limped along on a snail's gallop, and his
scythe became so dull that he left a great many weeds
behind in his path.
Langley, too, had a grievous perplexity on his
shoulders. He could not for the life of him see any
reason why he should be prohibited visiting Miriam,
merely because the two old gentlemen differed in
politics
and religion. He had no more to do with this
than the man in the moon, who is a mighty indifferent
old gentleman, and an example to all busy-bodies. At
length, through a long rigmarole of ratiocination, he
arrived at the conclusion, that unless there was
something
very particular to prevent, there was no
particular
reason for prevention. What this particular reason
could be puzzled him sorely, until one evening it
suddenly
popped into his pericranium, that it must be
Miriam, though it is believed this was the first time a
reason was ever metamorphosed into a woman. But
why this should be, was a question that always brought
him to a dead stand, where he stuck fast, thinking
and thinking, but always coming back to his old
conclusion
,
that his father was afraid he might fall in
love with, and marry the Roundhead's daughter.
Thus it will be perceived that he was continually
coupling Miriam and matrimony together, a most
dangerous conjunction, worse than that of Virgo and
the Twins.
In this mystical state of mutual sympathy, which
is said to be ominous of other mutual affinities, it so
happened that Miriam, one balmy twilight in the
merry month of May, which, in that genial southern
clime is worthy all the raptures of the rascally poets,
set forth on a lonely ramble by the river-side. A
variety of good reasons might be given why she was
not accompanied by one or both her parents, as usual,
which would fill a page or two very comfortably to
the author, and doubtless equally edifying to the
reader. But, notwithstanding the temptation, we
shall content ourselves with stating, positively and
unequivocally, that it was decreed by fate that Miriam
should be alone that evening. Precisely at the same
time did Master Langley, doubtless touched by that
magnetic telegraph by which young people in love, or
destined to fall in love, communicate with each other
without being a whit the wiser, set forth in the same
direction.
It was a charming evening of the sunny south,
when the lazy twilight, like some ancient dame
picking
her way through the increasing obscurity, and
sounding the path with stick in hand, lingers long
after the setting sun. The lord of day, though sunk
behind the distant mountains, had left the reflection
of his glories behind him in the skies, which presented
a gorgeous array of purple, red, and gold, mingling
with, and decking the light fantastic clouds that slept
in the lap of the blue heavens, unmoved by a single
breath of air, and yet were perpetually changing in
hue and form. The broad river was at rest like all
nature around, and only presented a quick succession
of varying purple tints reflected from the skies. The
mockbird, that Orpheus of nature's tuneful choir, was
running the round of all his endless variations, and
trilling forth his matchless melodies, with such a
joyous
hilarity, such a rich redundancy of
extemporaneous
song, that had any of our prima donnas heard
him she would have died of envy. Other than the
rural minstrel no sound met the ear, save ever and
anon at a distance, and at distant intervals, might be
heard the splashing of the huge strugeon, as he fell
back from his ambitious attempt to see a little of the
world above. The reader must pardon this sketch,
for we delight in such scenes, whether of fancy or
reality, and pity those, whether old or young, who
have outlived, or never enjoyed, a wholesome relish of
nature's enchanting beauties.
The two wandering pilgrims saw each other at a
distance, and, as they were proceeding opposite ways,
of course gradually approached each other, without
attempting to avoid a meeting. They actually did
start a little at first sight, for it happened they were
at that moment both thinking of the same thing.
Langley was wondering at the prohibition of his
father, and Miriam was wondering why he had ceased
his visits. Certainly this was a wonderful coincidence,
and foretold something extraordinary. As they were
both walking along the same river path towards each
other, it is obvious they must have met in time; and
accordingly meet they did, under a great antediluvian
tree, whose wide-spread branches overshadowed half
an acre of stinted greensward. The ceremonies of
meeting were very common-place, and if either blushed
it passed unheeded by the other, for both had enough
to do to hide their own. It is the proper business of
women to begin first, because they are said to be
always ready; and Miriam, seeing Master Langley in
all appearance at a loss for words, addressed him in
her simple Doric dialect:
Thou hast been a stranger at our house of late,
Master Langley.
Master Langley, not exactly knowing what to say,
answered in that expressive monosyllable with which
single ladies are wont to reply when asked a certain
impertinent question, and another pause ensued.
Hast thou been absent?
No.
Hast thou been ill?
No.
The maiden paused a few moments, and though she
knew nothing of logichaving never had the benefit
of Gregory Moth's instructionsactually achieved a
syllogism. He has not, thought she, he has not
been absenthe has not been illergo, he did not
wish to see me. The conclusion was, on the whole,
not satisfactory. In the meantime, Master Langley
had been chopping logic, too, and arrived at a
conclusion
,
that it was equally due to Miriam and himself
that he should apprise her of the cause of the abrupt
cessation of his visits. This he did with all the
frankness
of his nature, adding, that though at a loss to
know his father's reasons for the sudden prohibition,
he had felt bound to conform to it, however contrary
it might be to his wishes.
Alas! replied Miriam, sorrowfully, well do I
know the reason. It is that which caused the
persecutions
of my dear mother and her parents; it is that
which sets friends against friends, countrymen against
countrymen, brother against brother, sons against
their fathers, and fathers against their children: it is
that which deluged England with the blood of her
sons; it is that which drove us from our home to seek
a refuge in the wilderness of this new world. I
thought not that it would cross the broad seas, and
follow us here to set neighbor against neighbor, where
it seems so necessary that all should unite in defence
of each other. But the ways of heaven are not for
me to scan. Doubtless all is right, or all will come
right at last.
There was no declamation or effort in all this. It
was spoken with the most perfect simplicity, slowly,
and in a voice of plaintive sweetness. Her face was
calm and unruffled, yet touched by an expression of
profound sorrow, hallowed by devout resignation.
Her dark chestnut hair, which was quite anti-Puritan,
and would curl in spite of the platform, fell back from
her snowy brow as she raised her eyes towards heaven,
and Langley, as he gazed on her innocent look, called
to mind the pure, unspotted virgins offered up in olden
time on the blood-stained altar of persecution. He
felt too much to speak, and another silence ensued,
which was again broken by Miriam.
Thy father hath seen it right to forbid thy coming
to my father's house, and doubtless he wishes we
should not meet elsewhere; continue thy walk and I
will return.
Nay, Miriam, he did not forbid my seeing you by
accident.
No, but that was doubtless intended in his
prohibition
.
Good evening, Master Langley.
I entreat you to stay a moment. Surely my
father cannot dislike one so young and unoffending
as you. His resentment is against your father; and
he is not, I assure you, of a disposition to confound
the innocent withwith
With the guilty, interrupted Miriam with a
sad smile, with the guilty, thou wouldst say, after
the manner of presumptuous mortals, who make their
own principles, yea, often prejudices, the standard for
the reason of others, and are not content with freedom
themselves unless they can impose bondage on the rest
of their fellow creatures. Good evening once again.
I wish thee well, though thy father hath condemned
me.
There was truth in her voice and her eye as she said
this; Langley was touched deeply as he gazed
earnestly
in her face and almost thought it beautiful. There
was a placid and earnest simplicity in all she had
said; a native dignity of manner, a proud humility,
that awakened an interest he had never felt before,
ardent in disposition, quick in his feelings, and prompt
in expressing them, he gently arrested her departure,
ontreating her to continue her walk and permit him
to accompany her, this she gently but firmly declined;
but finally acquiesced in a compromise, and assented
to his accompanying her towards home.
You seem to wish it, said she, and I at least
am not forbidden to meet thee, though I tell the
frankly my father does not like thee.
I know it, replied Langley, but I hope you
don't partake in his dislike.
I dowhat she would have added was suddenly
arrested by a slight embarrassment, and she said no
more, as they continued their walk slowly, and with
frequent pauses in the conversation. In truth, there
seemed little accordance in their feelings, sentiments
or opinions. By degrees, inspired by the mellowed
luxury of the air, the beauties of the scene, and the
fragrance of the blossoms of many a nameless shrub
and plant that sprung up in wild luxuriance around
them, Langley launched forth in his naturally poetic
vein of talk, and became eloquent with feeling. The
little Puritan girl listened and looked up into his face,
as if half wondering and half admiring. Sometimes
she answered not, and once she said with an almost
breathless sigh
Though hast strong feelings and a virtuous mind,
else thou couldst not thus revel in the delights of
nature. Pity it is thou dost not look upwards from
this beautiful earth to Him who created and bestowed
it on His creatures.
Langley thought of the Crop-ears; but though this
speech did not exactly please him, there was a
sincerity
and fervor in the speaker, and such a beautiful
expression of piety in her face, that he paused to
admire it.
I am sorry, at length, he said, that you don't
admire such a scene as this. Living as I have done,
for the most part alone in the forests, without a
companion in thought or feeling, I know not what I
should have done had I not learned to commune with
nature; to fall in love, and almost make her my
mistress. You think it wrong to worship nature?
To worshipbut not to love her, answered
Miriam, with a gentle smile. Thou dost me wrong
in thinking I am blind or insensible to the bounties
of Heaven, or the beauties of nature. I love the green
meadows, the silent, shady woods, the murmuring
brooks, the waiving hills, and misty mountains. I love
the lily's whiteness, the rose's blush, and the purple
hyacinth, clothed in all the glories of nature's
many-colored
wardrobe. Whoever loves the Creator must
love his beauteous handiwork. But the enthusiasm
is catching, said she, checking herself and
blushing
,
I beseech thee not to laugh at me.
Laugh at you, cried Langley, with all his heart.
Laugh at you? By my soul, I love to hear yougo
on, I entreat you.
I have nothing more to say, but that those who
love the beauties of nature should be grateful to Him
that spread out the banquet before them.
Who dares to say, exclaimed the youthful
enthusiast
,
who dares to say that piety is sour and
repulsive
?
By my soul, as I see it now, it seems more
lovely and alluring than all those temptations that lead
astray the world.
No more of this, sir, said Miriam, gravely, thou
hast twice invoked thy soul to witness for thee.
Believe me, that when thus invoked it bears only
testimony
against thee.
Langley was fairly unhorsed. His enthusiasm was
checked in its flight; he again thought of the
Crop-ears
,
and all his Cavalier prejudices were awakened.
He could not at that moment forgive her, and she was
suddenly transformed into a prim, starched,
common-place
Puritan. He did not know she was as much of
an enthusiast as himself, only in a different way. In
this mood they arrived at a little gate which opened
into the wide lawn spreading out from Master
Habingdon's
house to the river.
Leave me now, said she, I am at home, and
thou must no farther transgress the command of thy
father.
But I don't like to appear as if I were afraid
of being seen. And besides, if I skulk away now,
will it not be suspected that our meeting was not
accidental?
If my father or mother should think it so, I will
tell them otherwise, and they will believe me. Good
evening, added she, as Langley opened the gate,
or rather I should say, farewell, for though we live
near each other, it may be long before we meet again,
to take another pleasant walk together.
Ah! accident may bring it about again.
Think not so, Langley,she had never called him
so before,it will not be accident if we walk there
again at one and the same time. Promise me thou
wilt walk no more there of evenings, or I must walk
elsewhere or stay at home. He promised, and she
addedFarewell, once morewho knows if we shall
ever meet again. But this may be said by all that
part, even for a moment. I shall often remember this
evening.
And so shall I, said Langley. Farewell, gentle
Miriam, when I look back on the past, I shall often
find you there.
Miriam passed up the lawn, and Langley pursued
his way towards home, sometimes belying his heart,
by calling her a little canting prude, at others almost
revering her piety and singleness of heart.
CHAPTER VIII.
Eulogium on the Divine Tobacco PipeA Discussion and a
Catastrophe
The
Cavalier grows PeremptoryA SoliloquyThe Cavalier
for once Agrees in Opinion with the RoundheadMiriam Talks
like a Simpleton, and Thinks not a whit more WiselyFalls Asleep
in a Profound Doubt.
Moth
, said Master Hugh Tyringham to his trusty
squire, who was philosophically solacing himself with
the truly republican relaxation of the fragrant pipe.
We call it republicannot to say democraticbecause
it is emphatically the poor man's luxury, innocent,
cheap, and refreshing; one that he can enjoy at home in
summer on his porch, in winter by his fireside, without
seeking abroad for vagrant pleasures; one that, while
it produces a gentle, harmless excitement, leads to no
excesses, like the mischievous inspiration of wine, and
whiles away the time in the intervals of exhausting
labor. Well have the wise red men of the woods
selected the pipe as the seal of reconciliation, the
token that the bloody hatchet has been buried, for it
is the very emblem of peace and repose. Would any
man wish to calm his troubled spirit, ruffled by the
rude elbowings of the busy world, or wasting away
with disappointed hopes, or never-ending toil; would
the philosopher wish to explore the depths of some
unfathomable doubt, or metaphysical mystery; would
the poet aspire to reach the highest haven of
inspiration
,
or the lover seek to indulge himself in weaving a
web of fancied bliss, let him light his pipe, and, like
the fabled wand of the magician, it will conjure up
before him such a host of happy ideas, that he will no
longer seek the fruition of dull reality.
Were we to attempt to exhibit a picture of content
the only real happiness this earth affordsone that
would attract the envy of mankind, we would set
before them yonder grey-headed Dutch farmer, not fat,
but round and portly, with his brown, ruddy face,
calm as the noble river that flows along his verdant
meadows. He is seated under his porch, one of the
last remaining types of the little cocked hat, erewhile
worn by the great Frederick of Prussia, and other
celebrated warriors. He has finished his hay and
harvest, his barns are full, and generous plenty laughs
him in the face. It is a delightful summer evening,
and it is not yet time to go to rest. No wind but the
sweet southwestern zephyr, which the Indians say
comes from the abode of the Great Spirit, ruffles the
leaves or the waters; no noise but that of the rural
concert of tinkling bells and lowing herds, nothing to
awaken the wickedness of man, or afford his great
enemy a bait to lead him astray.
He has lighted his pipe, and the eddies of smoke
ascend in spiral volumes, gradually fading away in
boundless space. Beside him sits a wholesome, portly
dame plying her knitting needles, and now and then
it is clear, from the old man taking the pipe from his
mouth, that they are exchanging a few words. On
the lower step of the porch, and at a respectful
distance
,
sits honest Coony O`Brien, of the Emerald Isle,
a hired man, who, saving that he sometimes makes a
respectable blunder, is as honest and well spoken a
person as one would wish to meet with. He has saved
from his wages enough to pay his brother's passage to
the land where labor meets its due reward, and
plenty sits laughing in the lap of liberty. Coony, too,
is modestly smoking the stump of a pipe, black as
ebony, and counting the days till the coming of his
brother. Notwithstanding all the loyal and orthodox
writers of England say of Irish ignorance, barbarity,
and that sort of thing, they certainly have strong
natural feelings and affections, and if they are
impatient
of the process of starvation, we must expect the
apple to sputter a little while roasting. The honest
fellow looks so comfortable that we could almost find
in our heart to wish we were Coony O`Brien.
A plague on those musty moralists who would feed
the world with crab apples; who rail against the
majesty of tobacco, and seek to deprive the poor and
lowly of their cheap, as well as harmless, solace in the
few short hours of cessation from labor. And most
especially a plague on those pestilent rulers who leave
the expensive luxuries of the rich unburdened, only to
lay the load on the poor man's enjoyments. Smoke
away, honest, portly Dutchman, and smoke away,
Coony; if this is the worst thing you do would we
were in your old shoes
GregoryGregory Moth! exclaimed Master
Tyringham
somewhat impatiently, though the reader must
not imagine Gregory was quite as long in answering
his master's summons as we have been in weaving
the foregoing train of philosophical speculation.
Coming, sir, answered the squire, I am just
knocking the ashes out of my pipe. Dust to dust, is
the moral of smoking.
Have you seen Langley lately? I wish to speak
with him. I hear more about the Indians, to-day.
The Governor has sent us an express to put us on our
guard.
For the love of mince pies, I beseech you, sir, not
to mention those disagreeable heretics. It benumbs
my faculties at once, and I have no use of myself for
hours afterwards.
Will you be pleased, Master Gregory, for once in
your life, to answer directly and categorically? Have
you seen Langley lately?
Why, sir, I can't say directly, categorically, or
positively, for there is no trusting one's eyes, to believe
what we see, unless it conforms to the deductions of
science, and can be demonstrated on principles of
philosophy
.
But if I might trust any of my five senses
I saw him a little time ago walking along shore
yonder.
Along shore? Why, what has come over the
young blockhead to be rambling about alone by
himself
.
Has he fallen in love, or grown poetical?
Why, sir, if, as I before remarked, my eyes did not
deceive me, I think I saw something walking beside
him very like a woman.
A woman! impossible; why they are so scarce in
these parts they are worth a hogshead of tobacco,
inspection and all. Are you quite sure?
I again aver that I can't say positively, seeing, as
I before premised, there is no trusting the villanous
five senses. The other night I thought I heard some
one crying murder, but it turned out to be only a
screech owl, and not long ago, sir
Gregory Moth, let me ask you one question:
Have you any inclination to get your head broke?
which will certainly happen if you don't answer me
directly, and in as few words as possible.
Honored sir, quoth Gregory, you doubtless know
I am a man of few ideas, and consequently a great
multiplicity of words. Allow me, by way of
illustration
a
prudent man, with only one guinea in his
purse, willprimo, divide it into shillingssecundo,
into penceand tertio, into farthings, before he
ventures
to expend the least modicum. I, sir, taking
example from this judicious arithmetician, having,
figuratively speaking, but one idea, essay to make the
most of it by sub-dividing it grievously.
The fiend take you, and your one idea to boot.
Was it a real bona-fide woman or not? Speak, villain,
or die!
9
Patience, honored sir, you will drive my one idea
to distraction. I opine it was a woman, howbeit, she
certainly wore a petticoat; and, as we used to argue
at Oxford, the man is only a remote circumstance of
his dress, so may it be logically inferred that a
two-legged
animal wearing a petticoat is a woman.
Well, sirrah, having settled the species, can you
tell who was the individual? Was she old, young, or
middle-agedblack, white, or copper-colored?
I am inclined to believe she was not old, as my
young master stuck pretty close to her side. I draw
the logical conclusion that she was not of a middle
age, for she tripped along like a little zephyr, and I
pronounce her most emphatically young, because
Master
Langley, like unto his father, has too much
discretion
to consort at evening walks with any other than
a fair, blooming damsel, not more than eighteen at
farthest.
Did you see her facedo you think you can
identify the hussy?
I was not watching them, sir. I scorn it. But I
think I may say, without injury to my reputation for
veracity, that it was the little Crop-eared damsel.
Impossible, Gregory, quite impossible. I have
forbid him all communication with any of the family.
Hem, quoth Gregory, now I am certain of it.
At this critical moment Langley returning from his
evening stroll, in what some unlettered people aptly
call a fit of distraction, stumbled against Gregory
Moth, whose pipe he shivered into countless pieces,
and as usual, when people are themselves in fault
gave him a broadside for standing in his way. The
loss of a pipe was thought more of in those times than
taking the benefit of The Act is now-a-days, as it
could not be repaired within less than a score or two
of miles. But Gregory was a philosopher, and
proceeded
to pick up the pieces with great deliberation.
After which, like a wise man, he took his departure to
see if he could not mend the matter.
Where have you been, sir, asked the father,
rather sharply.
Taking a walk, sir, replied Langley.
Where?
Along the river side, sir.
With whom?
With Miriam Habingdon, sir.
Why, didn't I forbid your entering the door of that
confounded Crop-ear again?
I have not entered his door, sir. Our meeting was
quite accidental, though I acknowledge we walked
together afterwards. I accompanied her to the gate
of her father's lawn, but did not go in.
WellwellI believe every word you say. But
did it not occur to you, that you were breaking your
promiseat least the spirit of your promise, if not the
word of my command?
Why, sirreplied Langley, smilingI confess
it did come across me, after our walk was ended, that
such might be the case. But really, I can't think
there was any great harm in availing myself of a mere
accident.
Perhaps soyou may be of that opinion, sirbut
I have my reasons, which as they are no concern of
yours, I shall not trouble you with. I have my
reasons
,
sir, for prohibiting not only your going to the
Crop-ear's house, but associating either by accident or
design with any of the family, most especially his
daughter. I must beg of you then, sir, to understand
this in future, accident or no accident; if you see
Miriam Habingdon coming towards you, turn about
and make tracks as if the old Harry himself were
coming
.
If you see her going another way, you must
turn short about.
And follow her?said Langley, laughing rather
irreverently.
No, sirI tell you, noyou mustyou mustgo
to the dl. And the indignant Cavalier turned into
the house and sought his bed, it being his custom to
retire early to roost, except when he had a few boon
companions from the other side of the river to keep
him awake.
The reader will recollect it had been voluntarily
settled between the two young people, that they should
meet no more. Langley was content to accede to the
arrangement, since he cherished no feeling towards
Miriam strong enough to prompt him to resist the
will of his father. Why then,thought he, as he
lay that night on his pillow, why should my father
so peremptorily forbid what I had no intention of
doing? There must be some special reason for this
unwonted exercise of his authority, and now I
recollect
he said something about secret motives. What
can they be? It is not possible that a mere difference
in politics and religion can estrange two families
residing so near each other, and having no neighbors
within a distance of many miles. In this remote
region surely the bitter feelings of hostility which
were awakened in the old world, by mutual rivalry
and bloodshed, cannot exist in such rank maturity as
to produce fruits like these. What can it mean? he
again asked himself, and again the thought came over
him that his father was apprehensive of an attachment
between himself and Miriam. This set him musing
on the probability of such an event; and in order to
weigh the subject dispassionately, he recalled to mind
the simple dress and unstudied gracefulness of
Miriam; he dwelt on her piety, which had something
poetical in its mode of expression; her love of
flowers, so indicative of a pure taste and delicate
sensibility
,
and her perception of the grandeur and beauty
of nature, characteristic of a pious, elevated soul.
From these, by a very natural transition, his memory
and his fancy together, conjured up a vivid and
exaggerated
picture of her exuberant chestnut hair, which
curled about the snow-white cheek, which never
glowed, save when her heart beat rapidly, and her
large, pensive, penetrating eyes, sometimes in despite
of themselves, sparkled of other joys than those of
Heaven.
The end of all this was, that Master Langley began
to think there might be some reason for his father's
apprehensions, and entered on a rigid self-examination
which resulted in the conclusion that the thing was
possible. In the midst of these cogitations, it cannot
be denied, that a rising spirit of opposition, a feeling
so often conjured up by what are deemed unreasonable
exactions of parental authoritywas awakened in the
bosom of the son.
How can those,continued Langley, resuming
his silent soliloquyHow can those, that like my
father, who, though loyal to his sovereign, has learned
in this new world of unrestricted reason to scorn the
slavish doctrine of passive obedience and
non-resistance
how
can they deny the application of this
principle
to a tyrant king, and apply it to a tyrant father!
I am a manI reason, and I draw conclusions. If
left to myself, I can take care of myself, in danger
and difficulty. I am past the age of correction, I
should no longer be commanded. When rational
beings differ in tastes, opinions, and principles, are
they to break each other's heads, if strangers; or if
they stand in the relation of parent and childthe
latter arrived at years of discretionis it for the father
to command at will, and the son to obey against the
impulses of his heart, and the convictions of his
understanding
?
Where then is the authority of the parent
to cease, and the freedom of the child to commence?
The law says at one-and-twentybut I am not
mooting
a question of lawhumumum. Here he
began to grow sleepy. The difference between what
is reasonable, and what is not, is assuredly very plain
if one could only see it; but like black and white, the
edges may be so blended together that it is impossible
to tell where one begins and the other ends. So
Langley fell asleep, and again dreamed of the little
Crop-ear.
Precisely at the same moment the Cavalier was
haranguing his son, the Roundhead was questioning
his daughter, in a different style, but in the same
spirit, and on the same subject; another proof that
the destinies of these young people were spun from
the same distaff. He inquired where she had been
walking, with a cold gravity that savored of
unkindness
,
a feeling far from his heart, for he loved his
daughter almost as dearly as his own stubborn will.
Miriam stated the simple truth, without hesitation,
and without a single tell-tale blush to impeach her
veracity, or betray a latent feeling. The mother, who
was present, saw with the unerring instinct of woman,
that it was a mere common-place affair; but the
father, who was rather too much given to holding a
tight rein, when the steed had no disposition to run
away, took occasion to express his disapprobation of
her rambling forth alone.
Do you think there is any danger, father? said
Miriam. If you do I will not go out alone again,
though I own I love the quiet summer twilight along
the river. It makes me feel so calm, and awakens so
many agreeable fancies.
Miriam, replied Harold, knowest thou not that
the indulgence of the imagination is dangerous to
youth! It lures us astray from the path we are
destined
to tread in this weary pilgrimage, rough as it is,
and leads to a worse, among thorns and briars.
But father, does it not sometimes lead us among
the roses, as well as the thorns?
Yea, daughter, to inhale their fragrance for a
moment, and suffer for years from the wounds they
inflict. The pilgrims of this world are destined to
cope with that which is real, not that which has no
existence; and they who, according to profane
language
,
build castles in the air, will peradventure be
crushed by their fall.
Ah! father, it may be so. But when I am
rambling
alone amid the delights of nature, breathing of
sweetsseeing naught but what is pleasing in my
eyes, and grateful to my heart, I cannot keep my
mind within the narrow limits of reality. Methinks,
I dream rather than feel; I seem to live in some other
world, more beautiful even than this, and fancy a
happiness
I never felt, and never expect to feel. Yet is it
delicious to my heart, and like the reflected glories of
the sky at summer twilight, is far more soothing and
gentle, than the real presence of that sun, from
whence they derive their lustre.
Harold gazed on her awhile in silence. He wondered
where she learned to feel thus, and to express herself
in such glowing terms. He forgot she was young,
and that her teacher was that same Nature, which
inspires the glorious love of song, gives magic to the
strains of the musician, and teaches the artist almost
to outdo his teacher. For a moment or two, he
contemplated
her with all the proud affection of a parent,
but again relapsed into his usual frame of mind. He
had sacrificed all for religion, and religion was all to
him. Though he partook in moderation of the
enjoyments
of life, he persuaded himself it was because
they were essential to existence, and not for the
gratification
of the senses. He grudged himself and his
household any pleasure or relaxation that had not
reference, in some way or other, to what he called the
one thing needful. Thus his home was gloomy, his
face gloomy, and all around him partook in the
infectious
gloom. His presence was a restraint, and his
absence a relief.
Dost thou not know, Miriam, at length he said,
that such thoughts and feelings are carnal and
wicked, seeing they lead astray from those higher
purposes
which should be perpetually before our eyes and
in our hearts? But this is not what I wished to say
just now. My object was to warn you against
consorting
with that profane and unbelieving youth,
Master
Langley Tyringham.
Unbelieving, father! exclaimed Miriam, then
suddenly checking herself, I do not consort with
him. Our meeting, as I told thee, was accidental,
9*
and will not be repeated. His father had forbidden
him to come here.
This information grated harshly on the feelings of
Harold. His besetting sin of spiritual pride reared its
head aloft, and the serpent hissed in his ear. What
an insult, in one of the imps of ungodliness to forbid
the intercourse of a sinner with one of the saints! It
is as if the spirit of darkness should turn his back in
disdain on the spirit of light. True, it was calculated
to bring about the very thing he was himself aiming
at. Yet he was deeply mortified that the first
movement
had not come from him. He had long since
persuaded himself that his temper was entirely
subdued
;
a dangerous delusion, since it throws us off our
guard, and induces us to drop the reins when they
should be most firmly grasped. It is true he was able
to repress all outward expression of passion; but the
spirit of forgiveness was not within him. He
swallowed
his anger and it turned to gall. On this
occasion
he answered Miriam in his usual measured tone
without any appearance of passion:
Thou shalt see the young man no more. If not
an unbeliever he is one of those who have perverted the
precepts of the only true faith. His sect, his family,
and his father, have been the persecutors and revilers
of thy father, thy mother, and thy whole race. They
scourged and mutilated thy grandfather, who died in
my arms on the field of Naseby, a martyr to his faith;
they drove thy mother and grandmother from their
homes, and made them outcasts; and they and their
friends have banished me and mine, from that
peaceful
home which had sheltered my forefathers for eight
hundred years, to this howling wilderness, to murder
or be murdered by the savage Indians. Yet here, even
here in the boundless solitudes of nature, the whip is
brandished over our heads, the viper spits his venom,
and the scorner continues to scorn. We are not, I
find, permitted the free enjoyment of our consciences
even here, for I have this day been apprised that we
must attend at the church which has persecuted us to
death, and hear ourselves and our faith contemned, or
ridiculed, or pay a fine for liberty to stay away.
Miriam, my daughter, wouldst thou mingle thy
thoughts, or hold communion with one who has
neither
sympathy for our wrongs, respect for our faith, or
feeling for our sufferings? Surely the grand-daughter
of Isaac Baneswright, the martyr, will not even wish
to do this; and here I declare that never while I live
unless some dire necessity should occurif I can
prevent it, shalt thou see or speak to him more.
I do not wish it, father, answered Miriam
somewhat
sadlythy wishes shall be mine. I have
never disobeyed thy will, and trust I never may.
Harold, stern as he was, at least outwardly, was
softened by the passive obedience of his daughter, and
said to her kindly,
Now go to thy rest, my child, and shut thine eyes
like yonder flower that closes its leaves against the
dew of night. Commend thyself to Heaven, and sleep
in peace.
Miriam did not sleep in peace. The quiet current
of her innocent thoughts, which had hitherto flowed
along almost without a ripple, or a murmur, was
disturbed
.
She thought to herselfSurely the spirit of
our faith cannot be that of mercy and forgiveness, or
my father would not be so bitter against poor Langley.
He
never persecuted or slandered us, I am sure; he
is too noble and generous for that; though, I confess,
I never thought much of him, till I heard he was
forbidden
to see me. What can my father mean by my
marrying Langley? The attentive reader will
recollect
that Harold had not said a word about matrimony.
I am sure I have never dreamed of such a thing, but
now he has put it into my head, I dare say I shall
think of nothing else, can it be possible that Langley
wishes totowhat nonsense! But if he don't, how
strange that my father should forbid what is never
likely to happen. Thus she lay for hours, ruminating
on love and marriage, mixed up with Langley
Tyringham
a
most dangerous concatenation. At length she
fell asleep, with a weight on her heart, without being
able to tell exactly to what cause it was owing;
whether to the sternness of her father, or his antipathy
to such a harmless young man.
CHAPTER IX.
A Great Event Signalized by a Great FeastTransformation of a
Boar's Heada Red Herring on HorsebackTristrified Flesh
Apology for Making Merry in this Miserable World.
On
the morning succeeding these decisive movements
of the Cavalier and Roundhead, the former was sitting
on the piazza apparently in deep contemplation, which
was interrupted by a sudden jerk of the body, an
elevation of the chin and a determined compression of
the lips, indicating that he had arrived at a conclusion.
Pausing a moment, he shouted in a loud, decisive
voice
Gregory Moth!
Sir!
Come hitherI want to speak with you.
Here I am, sir, in
puris naturalibus
that is to
say, in my own proper person.
Gregory, do you know that Langley will come of
age on Friday next?
An unlucky day, sir. I thank my stars I was
born on the twenty-ninth day of February, which
being, as it were, no day at all, cannot be called
unlucky.
Poohdon't talk, sir, but listen. I mean to give
a great dinner on the occasion.
Better not, sirMaster Langley is already rather
hard in the mouth, and depend upon it, if you once
put the toga on in him, he will take the bit between
his teeth, and for aught we know run right into the
arms of the little Crop-ear damsel.
No danger of that, Gregory. Has he not
promised
not to go near the house, and you know as well
as I, he is a man of his word.
Sir, in the course of my study and observation of
men, manners and customs, as well as the instincts of
animals, I have never failed to notice that they all, man
and beast, have a pernicious hankering after forbidden
fruit, insomuch, that I am fully wrought into the
conviction that were they permitted to do as they
liked, they would never go out of their bounds.
A most logical conclusion, worthy the famous
wild boar that swallowed a volume of Aristotle.
Relieve
them from all restraint and they will not require
to be restrained. Eh? But have done with your
nonsense, I am determined to celebrate this
auspicious
day by a grand dinner. I shall invite
The Roundhead gentleman, I suppose, for he is
the only Christian man, besides ourselves, in twenty
miles round, at least on this side the river.
No, sir, not the Roundhead. Do you call
him
a
Christian man? Why, the fellow don't believe in the
bishops. I mean to invite the Governor and council,
the general-in-chief, the judge, the doctor, and the
parson, who, you know, is not one of your
water-drinking
dissenters.
No, he never dissents from good wine; conforms
exactly to a bowl of punch; and swallows the
thirty-nine
articles in as many bumpers.
Hold your tongue, sir, who has a better right to
drink than a man with a quiet conscience? But
we'll have the dinner, I'm determined, so set about
making provision without delay. Let me seeah
yesa haunch of venison at both ends
By your leave, sir, interrupted Gregory, I
would respectfully and reverentially recommend a
boar's head at one end of the table, with a lemon in
his mouth, and a red herring riding away on
horseback
,
to come on with the second course, after the
good old fashion of king Brute and his valiant
Trojans
,
who, accompanied by certain Greek philosophers,
came into Britain, and reached a place called
Bellositum
,
afterwards Oxenford, where they feasted lustily
on wild boars, and laid the foundation of that ancient
seat of learning, eleven hundred years before the
Christian
era.
Confound me if I believe a word of it. But I
have no objection to the boar's head, and the red herring
riding on horseback, for I think the latter will be a
new dish in these parts. But for all that, I don't
believe one word about king Brute and his valiant
Trojans. Why don't you go back to your favorite era,
the creation. That is an excellent starting point.
You don't, worthy sir? If you had broached such
a doubt at Oxford, you would have been expelled, as
you told me the great John Locke had lately been, for
heresy, or something else. You ought to have
flourished
at the time when the study of Greek was
considered
little better than heresy, and
ego legit
, and
ego currit
, held to be good Latin.
The Cavalier seemed to pay little attention to
this display of learning. He sat apparently in a fit of
abstraction for a few minutesthen began nodding
his head and rubbing his handsconcluding by
passing
the back of his right hand briskly across the end
of his nose, right and left, as was his custom when
tickled by any idea passing in his mind.
Ah, Moth, those were pleasant times at Oxford
hey? Do you recollect the bonfire we made in the
college walk on the Prince's birth-day, in spite of the
Crop-ear proctors?
And do you remember, said Gregory, the plot
of the students to expel the Crop-ear Garrison?
Yes, and that you got tipsy drinking small beer,
fell asleep on your favorite seat, The Penniless Bench,
as it was called, and being waked up by the morning
gun, was so frightened that you let out the whole
secret.
And lucky was it for you all, sir; for I opine that
if we had carried our plot into execution, we should
have been terribly drubbed by the Ironside Crop-ears,
and the survivors expelled incontinently. I peached
from pure humanity, sir.
Very well, so be it. Now go and make your
preparations
,
and mind there is no scarcity.
They shall have as much as they can swallow,
sir.
Six times as much, Gregory. It don't become a
Virginia planter, and Cavalier to boot, to stint his
guests. But now I think of it, where the deuce is the
Boar's Head to come fromeh?
Sir, said Gregory proudly, did you ever know
me to propose anything that could not be done. You
know there are many swine that have strayed away
into the forest, and become wild boars, to all intents
and purposes. You will send your forester to shoot
one of these, whether sow or boar is of no consequence.
If he should fail, I will go and catch a sturgeon, and
send up his head instead. If you ply the guests well
with punch before dinner, they won't know the
difference
.
Goodright, Gregory, and if any man except the
Governor and the parson questions its being a boar's
head, I'll call him out. So now go at the business,
and I'll consult Mistress Tyringham, about the
puddings
.
There shall be a plum pudding at each end of
the table, and two in the middle.
The guests were bidden, the invitations accepted
all but the governor, who was ill with the goutfor
when people live a great distance from each other, they
are always most anxious to meetthe wild boar was
not shot, and the red herring mounted on horseback,
ready for a drive. The excellent Mistress Tyringham
smiled at the boar's head and the red herring, besides
hesitating a doubt, as to the six plum puddings.
But being a sensible woman, she quietly acquiesced
in any reasonable matter that pleased her husband.
The day at length arrived, and with it the guests,
who, in those days, were accustomed to come betimes,
in order to whet their appetites for dinner by certain
libations of punch, as that unequalled beverage, mint
julep, was not yet discovered. It was the product of
a more enlightened period, and doubtless stands first
among those improvements which give one age a
decided
superiority over another.
Gregory Moth was among the immortals. He had
determined to celebrate the majority of his young
master
royally, first, because he had a great affection for
the young man, secondly, because he had a still greater
attachment to good liquor: accordingly, like a prudent
man he began early, and was tolerably well ballasted
before dinner. At the instant the guests entered one
door of the dining-room, Gregory, as had been
concerted
with his master, came into the other, bearing
the boar's, or rather sturgeon's head, most elaborately
disguised, and singing a stave of a classical old song
which ran as follows
The boar's head in hand bear I,
Bedeck'd with bays and rosemary;
And I pray you, masters, merry be,
Quot, quot estis in convivio.
Which was received with great applause.
The commander-in-chief, who in his youth had
served a campaign or two in Germany, was first
helped
,
Mistress Tyringham, as is often the case among
good housewives, having exerted herself so zealously
in manufacturing the six plum puddings, that she was
obliged to go to bed with a headache. At the first
taste, the general-in-chief crossed his knife and fork,
and looked doubtingly. The judge tried it twice, that
he might, as it were, hear both sides; the doctor
looked
as if he had swallowed one of his own prescriptions;
and the parson, as if he had swallowed a Jesuit or
a Presbyterian. Master Tyringham did not know
whether to laugh or be angry; Langley, who was not
in the secret, wondered at the general abstinence;
Gregory stuffed a napkin into his mouth, and the
gentlemen
of color in waiting showed a vast quantity of
ivory.
The general-in-chief tasted again, and again laid
down his weapons.
It's dd fishy; I ask your pardon for
swearing
in your presence, parson, said he, turning to the
Rev. Mr. Truehart, who sat next him.
Truly, it has an ancient and fish-like smell,
replied he, quoting Will Shakspeare.
Yes, and taste, too, said the general. I have
eaten of a boar's head more than once, in Bohemia,
but I'll swear it did not taste like this. I say,
Tyringham
,
where did this boar come from?
Why, Gregory says he was shot somewhere in the
forest, yonder.
I should rather suppose it was in the river, for
between you and me, it tastes more like fish than
flesh.
Here Gregory, seeing his master at fault for an
answer, made a diversion in his favor.
If the general-in-chief will permit me, it is
dressed after the manner of King Brute and his
valiant
Trojans, with crab sauce. Besides, sir, the wild
boars often come down to the river to feed on the
clams and periwinkles, which give them a fishy taste
sometimes.
That is a curious fact in natural history, Mr.
Truehart. You who are fond of such studies should
investigate the matter, said the general aside to his
neighbor.
By this time a general titter circulated round the
table, and the Cavalier began to perceive the joke was
turning against him, especially when the doctor
exclaimed, A sturgeon's head, by all the gods, and
burst into a roar of laughter. He debated within
himself
whether to call out the doctor, make Gregory the
scapegoat, or make an honest confession. Being both
bold and generous, he determined on the last course,
and told the whole story. The sturgeon's head, so far
from disturbing the harmony of the company, only
occasioned a more general merriment. Gregory was
quizzed unmercifully about the boar's head, and the
red herring riding on horseback; while the
general-in-chief
took occasion to tell the story of a servant of
his from the old country, who being sent out to
procure
a sheep's head, instead of a fish brought back the
head of a fine old ram with magnificent horns. But
Gregory stood fire like a hero; at every shot he
reinforced
his courage with a stiff glass of punch, and
came off with flying colors. Though a systematic
tippler, he never got fairly seas over, or lost the
command
of his head or his legs. He resembled those
tempers which are easily pushed to a certain point,
beyond which they are immovable. Like a bottle, the
fuller he was the stiffer he stood.
The rest of the dinner went off swimmingly. The
venison and wild turkey amply atoned for the
sturgeon's
head; the becon and greens were received with
the honors of a national dish, and the plum puddings
met with universal acceptation. Poor Langley was
called upon so often to exchange bumpers in honor of
the occasion, that he became at last oblivious, and
fell asleep in his chair; whereupon the Cavalier winked
to the company and saidNow that the old
gentleman
has retired, suppose we young fellows make a
night of it. Come, a toast, and a song from the
doctor
.
The master of the seven sciences, who valued
himself on his singing, toasted Church and King,
and forthwith followed it up with rare Ben Jonson's
exquisite song, Drink to me only with thine eyes,
which he sung with great unction, but repeated the
chorus so often, that the general-in-chief at length
exclaimedDoctor, how many eyes had this same
lady? I think she must have had as many as a
amprey. Your song has as many eyes as a peacock's
tail, or a piece of bird's-eye maple.
Yes, said the doctor, good humoredly, she saw
double, like some of the present company, that shall
be nameless.
The laugh went against the general-in-chief, who
was fined a stupendous bumper for interrupting the
song; and not to give offence to scrupulous folks by
descending to further particulars, the merriment was
kept up far into the night, and the morning dawned
on a set of quiet gentlemen peaceably sleeping in their
chairs. The scrupulous reader may be assured that
not a single one of them was under the table, and that
they maintained the strictest silence and decorum.
This circumstance will, it is hoped, make some
atonement
for our having introduced a scene, with a view
to illustrate the manners of the times. For so doing,
we earnestly hope forgiveness from all conscientious
tetotalers, especially those who convert abstinence
from one sin into a license for indulging half a dozen
others. This is said to be not altogether uncommon,
as was exemplified in the case of the Italian robber,
who quieted his conscience for the habitual
commission
of murder by scrupulously abstaining from flesh
on Fridays. But however this may be, there are
certainly
many sins more grievous than making merry
occasionally with our friends, provided we don't disturb
our conscientious neighbors.
It has been or it might be truly remarked, that
though you may exclude the air from escaping out of
a bottle, it is impossible to do so with a secret. Cork
it up as tightly as you will, seal it hermetically if you
please, but it will be just as vain as to attempt to hold
an eel by the tail. This is most especially the case in
the country; and what is very remarkable, people that
live at a distance from each other, are almost always
the soonest enlightened by such disclosures. The
carousal of the old Cavalier, however, was not intended
to be kept secret in the first instance. But certain
incidents which are here related, rendered it desirable
that the point of honor metaphorically conveyed by the
classic phrase of Under the Rose, should be observed.
Yet by some means or other, never fully developed,
the particulars of the whole affair, greatly exaggerated,
were in less than twelve hours conveyed to the ears
of Harold Habingdon and his family, by telegraph or
otherwise. It was said that the old Cavalier had
sacrilegiously set fire to the parson's wig, and that the
latter had swore like a trooper on the occasion; that
the judge had not only nodded on the bench, but
pitched head foremost under the table; that the
general-in-chief had cleared the board of bottles and
glasses, sword in hand; that the doctor had sung such
vulgar and indecent songs, that Mistress Tyringham
was obliged to leave the table; and finally that Master
Langley had signalized his majority, by getting
superlatively
corned, and fighting a pitched battle with
Gregory Moth.
The dislike of Harold towards the old Cavalier was
by these rumors increased to disgust. Almost every
man has his peculiar horror of some one particular vice
or foible, and the antipathy of Harold was drinking,
though he was in truth rather addicted to good eating,
and was apt to be a little ruffled at an ill-cooked
dinner
.
But so it is. Habit and custom is everything.
In Russia and China, it is no disgrace to be cudgelled;
while among the people of Europe, and emphatically
among Americans, a blow is considered an indelible
stain on manhood, and is never submitted to without
incurring contempt and disgrace. What is held
indecent
and barbarous in one place, is perhaps the
highest
ton
in another; and in all the wide circumference
of this world, there are not two nations that agree
exactly in their estimate of manners or morals. All
have their different standards, and all might learn from
this diversity, to abstain from offensive scurrility, or
contemptuous airs of superiority.
Miriam, too, was highly indignant at the backsliding
of Langley Tyringham, though she certainly had no
right whatever to be angry. What was he to her, or
she to himnothing. They were to be strangers in
future, and there was no reason in the world why she
should care a straw if he got fuddled every day. Still
she felt angry, as well as sorry. It was a great pity,
she thought, that so clever a youth should thus throw
himself away, by becoming addicted to an odious,
beastly vice. Above all, when her fancy pictured him
engaged in a drunken fight, with Gregory Moth, she
turned from him in disgust, and resolved to think of
him no more. Whether she kept this resolution, will
be best known from a perusal of our second volume.
END OF VOL. I.1*
CHAPTER I.
A PREFACE WHICH OUGHT TO HAVE PRECEDED THE FIRST
VOLUME OF THIS WORK.
It
hath been a mooted point with that class of
philosophical
inquirers, which so usefully occupies itself
with discussions that can never be brought to a
conclusion
,
whether the age gives the tone to literature,
or literature to the age. It is a knotty question, and
not being of the least consequence to any practical
purpose, it will be passed over with the single remark,
that it is quite useless for an author to write in good
taste if the public won't read, and equally idle for the
public to cherish a keen relish for polite literature, if
there are no authors to administer food to its appetite.
It is certain, however, that owing either to the
excessive refinement and intelligence of the age, or it
may be, to causes directly the contrary, the present
taste of the venerable public is exceedingly
carniverous
.
If any conclusion can be drawn from those
classical productions which are so industriously hawked
about by the genuine representatives of the illustrious
Dicky Doubt, who, by an allowable figure of
speech, may be called the handmaids of the Muses,
there must be an exceedingly voracious appetite in the
reading community for all sorts of breaches of morality
and breaches of the peace, not omitting smothering,
poisoning, and suicide. Authors do not mind
committing
murder in cold blood, or perpetrating any other
atrocious crime, any more than they do borrowing an
idea from some old, forgotten writer; and the most
timid, delicate, nervous lady in the land, who would
shriek at the apparition of a caterpillar, or run away
from a butterfly, is now so accustomed to battles,
robberies
,
poisonings, and assassinations, that it would
not be altogether surprising if we some day hear of
one of the elite, after going the rounds of polite
literature
,
and committing a few murders in the way of
poisoning, together with some other fashionable
et
ceteras
not proper to mention by name, though the
thing itself is highly aristocraticshould make a
brilliant
exit by blowing up a whole square of houses
and perishing in their ruins.
There was a timeit was in the dark ages, previous
to the apotheosis of phrenology and animal magnetism
there was a time when the records of crime, and
those exhibitions of human depravity, which disgrace
the name of man, and make angels weep, were
confined
to the romance of the police, and the last dying
speeches of convicted and converted murderers. A
taste for these was considered as characteristic only of
the vulgar and depraved, and they seldom ascended to
the parlor or the drawing-room, except by stealth. At
present, however, it appears that the most fashionable
species of romance is a sort of Newgate calendar, in
which the crimes and depravity of the lowest and
worst species of real human beings, are cast into the
shade by the creation of imaginary monsters.
The reader, however, is not to conclude from these
preliminary remarks that we meditate the
presumption
of finding fault with the prevailing taste for blood
puddings, and concentrated soup of depravity. On
the contrary, with the amateurs of thorough-going
barbarity and wickedness, we are perfectly willing to
defer to the taste of the venerable public for that
species
of meritorious romance, which, if anything can
achieve it, will assuredly, in the shortest possible time
with the aid of the diggings of Californiabring
about that Golden Age, when the saint and the
assassin
shall lie down in peace together; when the sword
shall be turned into a bowie knife or a revolving
pistol
;
firemen meet at midnight conflagrations without
broken heads and bloody noses; and last and greatest
miracle of all, the bright star of Bethlehem cease to
be the torch of discord.
We are full of hope that the time is not far distant,
when the human heart shall become so mellowed and
humanized by being accustomed to these pictured
horrors, these atrocious crimes, and this total
degradation
of the human species exhibited in polite literature
that certain portions of select readers should in time
lose all perception of the distinction between virtue
and vice, and the good and bad mingle together in
perfect harmony. Thus the world might at length
be brought to a perfect good understanding, and no
more blood be shed, except in romances.
Doubtless the experiment is worth the trial, and we
propose in this our second volume to flourish the besom
of destruction somewhat liberally. Hitherto, we have
only killed two or three honest people, in fair fight,
and, as yet, not one of our actors is qualified for a hero
of romance. But we shall do better in future, by
introducing, in due time, a gentleman so utterly
divested of any attribute that might redeem him from
abhorrence, that he cannot fail to conciliate the favor
of the judicious reader. It shall go hard with us, too,
if we don't commit a most exemplary murder soon. If
it comes not in our way, we will seek it. If we can't
kill by retail, which is much the most emphatic and
striking, we will go at it by wholesale, and demolish
entire communities without regard to age, sex, color
or condition. Should all our resources fail, we will
murder our story and smother ourselves with charcoal
to escape public justice.
CHAPTER II.
A Forest SceneThe Wild Man in the Wild WoodsA Short Speech
Worthy the Imitation of the Wisdom of CongressAn Ingenious
Mode of Trying the PatienceA Thunder StormThe White Man
Asleep when He Should Be Wide Awake.
In
the depths of the vast primeval forest, where
echo had never replied to the axe of the woodman
the great instrument of civilization, or the long
resounding
burst of the hunter's rifleon the margin of a
nameless lake, where dark waters, though pure as the
skies, reflected no object of the earth, was assembled
a band of red men, a race made for the shade, as the
white man is for the sunshine. The lake was several
miles in circumference, and lay in the centre of swamps
whose limits were almost undefinable, and its approaches
at that period only known to the savages who roamed
its borders. It was a gloomy, wild, fantastic scene,
silent as death, and melancholy as the grave, yet
decked with a profusion of flowers, and flowering vines
of gorgeous tints and various odor, that wasted their
sweetness on the desert air. There every production
of nature, around the margin of the lake seemed to
spring out of the water; for the land, if so it might be
called, was nothing but floating earth, that quivered
like a jelly under the light foot of the Indian. Vast
cypress trees, with slender limbless trunks and tufted
heads towering to the skies, and rocking with the
slightest breeze, rose from the water apparently
self-supported
on its surface; and with the exception of a
level spot on the southern shore which loomed some
ten or twelve feet above the surface of the lake, the
entire margin was one dead level morass of decayed
vegetables saturated with moisture. A numb and
moody silence reigned far and near; no woodland
minstrel
caroled his joyous notes in these pathless wilds,
whose unapproachable recesses were never cheered by
the rays of the sun even in winter, for the trees were
all evergreens and knew no change of seasons. At
intervals during the day, a lonely woodpecker, the
hermit of the forest, might be heard tapping some
rough-barked tree; and sometimes the monarch eagle
was seen in solitary majesty resting on a dry limb,
silent and motionless, as if he were the guardian genius
of this gloomy empire.
The hour was near midnight, and a large fire around
which a crowd of dusky figures were moving back
and forth, tinged the melancholy cypress trees with a
silvery lustre, and threw a long line of light athwart
the dark water. It was an Indian council of the
surrounding
tribes, whose deputies had met together at
this secret hour, in this secret haunt, to devise the plan
of a general attack on the intruding white man, and
practice those preliminary rites, which were always
the precursors of war to the knife. It is the
characteristic
of the savages of North America, that they
have always some old injury to remember, or some new
one to avenge. Though without historians to record
their wrongs, they never forget them; and a legacy of
revenge is handed down from generation to generation.
Time never heals these wounds, however slight; and
when these motives are wanting, a dream interpreted
to suit the purpose, a whim of some old woman, a
fraud of some mountebank, or a real or pretended
desire to appease the spirits of the dead, is sufficient
to rouse the ever restless savage to war and rapine.
A war was now in contemplation which not merely
involved a single tribe, but all the tribes within reach
of the influence of the colony, together with their
allies, and which had for its object the utter
extermination
of the whites, as well as the total destruction
of their property. The civilized and savage men are
two dry sticks; rub them together and they take fire.
The causes which produced this combination of the
Indian tribes were such as seem innate and
inseparable
from the irreconcilable relations of savage and
civilized man, and will be passed over, as not material
to our story. At the moment of which we are
speaking
,
the final decision had been made; the deputies of
all the tribes were agreed; the plan of operations
concerted
,
and nothing now remained but to practice those
religious rites and warlike ceremonies customary on
such occasions.
A chief who had fasted till the vapors of an empty
stomach had ascended to his brains, and half-crazed
his intellect, now came forward and addressed the dark
assemblage as follows:
Brothers, I have had a dream. The great Spirit
appeared to me in the shape of a bear, and said: The
blood of your brothers is not yet wiped away. It
smokes from the ground. The spirits of your fathers
are not appeased. They wander about the spot where
they fell, and disturb me with their shriekings. You
must go and take scalps, burn houses, lay waste tobacco
fields, and eat the long-knives. Say to your young
men, take courage, dress your hair, paint your faces,
sharpen your tomahawks till you cannot feel their
edge, for the Great Spirit is with you. Go and avenge
the dead, that their spirits may no longer wander on
the face of the earth, howling like hungry wolves. The
long-knife is fast asleepgo and wake him.
This speech was answered by a shrill, withering howl,
that quavered through the silent air, and awaked the
echoes from their sleep. Songs, filled with boastings
of exploits that might make the hair stand stiff, were
sung, followed by a succession of dances, rehearsing
the vicissitudes of war, and the various manuvres of
Indian tactics, all exhibiting a variety of strange,
grotesque motions, accompanied by harsh, dissonant
music. When these were ended, the aged warriors
proceeded to test the self-command of the young braves
who offered themselves, for the first time, as candidates
for service, and were to act under the immediate orders
of the great war-chief. It was a maxim with these
strangely wise barbarians, that no man possessed true
courage who is not master of his temper, on all
occasions
.
Nature is more knowing than most people
think her.
The old warriors, accordingly, inflicted every possible
insult, provocation, and outrage on the young
candidates
.
They called them cowards, women, and
threatened
to dress them in petticoats; they accused them
of running away from bears and wolves, nay, even the
timid deer; they made faces at them, followed by the
most contemptuous gestures; they beat them with
cudgels, pricked them with knives; and, as a last
effort, threw hot coals and blazing brands at their
heads. All this was borne with the most stoical
indifference
,
for if any one had exhibited the least sign of
pain, anger, or impatience, he would have been
considered
disgraced, and unworthy to go forth to battle
with men. After this came the great war feast,
consisting entirely of the flesh of dogs, which,
being
their most valuable possession, was offered up
to Areskou, the god of battles. The feast being
ended, they extinguished the fire, and slowly departed
to their respective wilds, chaunting the song of death.
The silence of the grave succeeded their departure, but
their next coming was the signal for groans of agony,
shrieks of despair, and shouts of demoniac triumph.
CHAPTER III.
A Scene not Uncommon in the Early Settlements of the New World
Obstinacy of the RoundheadA Massacre and a Siege
Unparralled
Achievement of Gregory MothLangley Distinguishes
Himself
A
Providential Shower and its ConsequencesA Scene and
a Reflection.
The
inhabitants of the colony, who were by these
barbarous
ceremonies devoted to destruction, remained
not only ignorant, but unsuspicious of the destiny at
hand. So many false reports and unfounded alarms
had of late followed in succession, and passed away,
that they, as a natural consequence, only produced an
additional feeling of security. The savages had
concealed
their purpose with consummate art, and the
infant of the new world lay sleeping in its cradle,
unconscious
that the serpent was coiling around him. Every
station on either side of the river, except the capital,
which was too strongly guarded for their simple
tactics
nay,
every house was marked out, and a body of
Indians expressly devoted to its destruction. The plan
was laid with a cruel sagacity, and executed with
equal silence and celerity. Not a human being, white
or black, would have escaped, but for the compunction
of a half-civilized Indian, who paid the debt of
gratitude
by betraying his brothers.
He was one of a small tribe which, some years
previous
to this period, had been nearly exterminated by
the victorious Iroquois, the few survivors of which had
sought refuge among the Indians of the South, and
were received by adoption. Among them was a little
lad, who, being ill of body, and worn out by a long,
wearisome journey, was dropt by the way, and finally
fell into the hands of Master Tyringham, where he
became the companion of Langley, then a boy of about
the same age. By degrees he grew to be a favorite;
shared in Langley's studies, amusements, and
occupations
,
until finally scarcely any difference appeared
in the treatment of the white man's son, and the
Indian
boy. They became greatly attached to each
other, and but for the difference of color might have
passed for brothers.
Somewhere about the age of sixteen, Langley was
sent to pass the winter at the capital, with a friend of
his father, with a view to polishing his manners, by
intercourse with the little community, among which
were many persons of liberal education and high
breeding
,
some of whom had figured at courts in their day.
Circumstances prevented the Indian boy from
accompanying
him, and he was left behind. From that
moment he became melancholy and discontented. He
no longer paid any attention to his studies, insomuch
that Gregory Moth prognosticated that the Indian
blood was up, and that nature was becoming too
strong for habit. His days were spent in wandering
through the woods, or paddling on the river, and finally
he disappeared to return no more.
On the day succeeding the scene sketched in the
preceding chapter, as Gregory was early in the
morning
scouring the wood in search of wild turkeys, he
was half-frightened out of his wits, by the sudden
apparition of an Indian, who approached him without
arms, making signs of peace. Whether Gregory
understood or not is a question, but certain it is, that
at this instant his gun went off, but happily without
doing any injury. The savage still approached, and
coming up said with a smile
Your gun is bewitched, Master Gregory.
Gregory trembled like a leaf, and replied only by the
chattering of his teeth. The other then asked,
Don't you know me?
No, said Gregory, somewhat restored by his
gentle
voice, and pacific deportmentNo, my
acquaintance
is not very extensive among gentlemen of your
complexion.
That is rather strange. I was once a scholar of
yours.
Hah! quoth Gregoryeyeing him closely, a
scholar of mine! Let me look at youbut don't
come a step nearer. Whywhyif it is not our
Indian boy, I am a blind beetle. Where did you come
from, where are you going, and what brought you
here, after playing my master such a trick, you
ungrateful
salvage?
True, I am a savage, and will speak to you in the
style of my native home. ListenI see a black cloud
in the sky.
Where? said Gregory, looking upwardsI
don't see it.
Nothe long-knife is asleep. He don't see
anything
.
The cloud will burst soon, and then he will
wake too late.
What do you mean by that? Speak out like a
Christian, can't you.
The Great Spirit is angry with the long-knives.
When the next sun is high up yonder, he will speak
to them in blood and fire.
A murrain seize this metaphorical villain,
thought Gregory, he is as obscure as a Pagan
oracle
.
I say, speak out. I can't understand your
gibberish
.
Its all Greek to me.
The Indian talks his talk, and the white man his.
But I will try to speak with the double tongue. Run
fly like the deer to your master, and tell him from
me, that this dayat the middle of the day, when the
white man is resting from his labors, the red men will
spring from the woods, like hungry wolves, and
devour them all at a single meal. Tell him from me,
to make the most of the few hours yet left him, or
woe to him and his! He paused a moment and
added, I have been ungrateful to the white man for
his kindness, and am ashamed to meet him. Tell him
the Indian cannot fight against his adopted tribe, nor
join them in scalping the white man who has fed him.
He will go and seek some other tribe far away. Be
quick, long-knife, they will come at noonlet it not
be night to you all. Thus saying, he bent his course
towards the West, and was never seen again. His
information, for a time, almost paralyzed Gregory,
whose limbs and senses seemed equally to fail him.
At length he recovered to a perception of his duty, and
winged by fear, made the best of his way home,
where he communicated his information to his master.
It was now verging towards eight o'clock, of as fair
a day as ever dawned upon the sunny South. Mild,
gentle, and soothing, it irresistibly disposed the mind,
as well as body, to languor and repose. But the tale
of the Indian had effectually roused the inmates of the
mansion, which in these early times, when danger
lurked behind every tree, had been built with a view
to defensive operations, though its materials were
principally of wood. There was no other house of any
pretensions within a distance of many miles, on that
side of the river, but that of Harold Habingdon, which
was by no means so well adapted to resist the Indian
mode of attack, as that of his neighbor. In the castle
all was hurry, and confusion. The massacre was to
commence between twelve and one, when the field
laborers would be resting themselves in languid
indolence
in the shade, or fast asleep in their cabins, and
the masters shut up in their mansions to avoid the
sultry summer heat.
Every means of defence the brief period would
permit
was adopted, and messages sent out to give
warning
on both sides of the river; but, alas! too late. In
addition to this, Langley Tyringham took occasion to
mention the defenceless state of Harold and his family.
The old Cavalier's spirit rose within him, not in anger,
but sympathy. He forgot the past, and only
remembered
the present hour, when a common danger
demanded a common sympathy.
'Slifethat's true. The Crop-ear is more exposed
than we are, and besides makes a point of conscience
to offer no resistance in cases like this, as he told me
not long ago, when I called to warn him against the
savages. There is yet timego to him. I see there
a horse ready saddled at the door. Go, and entreat him
to come hither instantly with his family and people.
Say to him, from me, that danger should make us
friends, and he shall be welcome. Be quicknot a
moment is to be lostmount and away! But mind
you don't suffer his obstinacy to detain you too long.
Langley mounted the horse, and gallopped full
speed to Habingdon. Entering without ceremony, he
found Harold apparently unconscious of the terrible
calamity impending, and was received by him with
an ungracious courtesy, by no means gratifying.
Harold stiffly inquired his business, which was
equivalent
to an insinuation that nothing but that would
excuse his visit; and Langley, without preface,
communicated
his errand. Harold had previously wrought
himself into an obstinate doubt of the reality of the
danger, and positively declined the invitation of his
neighbor. He professed to rely on Providence, which,
as he had never wronged the redmen, would doubtless
incline their hearts in his favor. Langley besought
him to come home to his father's. He painted in few
words the indiscriminate vengeance of the savage,
which spared neither age nor sex, and involved all in
blood and fire; he entreated him, if not for his own,
for the sake of his wife, his daughter and his
dependents
,
who looked up to him for protection, to accept
the invitation of his father, which he assured him was
cordially given; and finally reminded him that the aid
of Providence was only vouchsafed to those without
other aid, or who made every effort to help themselves.
The stern obstinacy of Harold became only more
rigid and inflexible, under the increasing warmth with
which it was assailed. A precious half hour was
wasted, and the young man at length took his
departure
under the influence of feelings he had never
experienced before. It was not alone compassion that
tugged at his heart, but a stronger sentiment, which
had been a nurseling in his bosom ever since that wise
old gentleman, his father, had so judiciously proclaimed
his edict of non-intercourse. The danger in which
Miriam was placed took precedence, nay, swallowed up
all other feelings for the moment, and he thought only
of her. So young, so pious, so innocent and helpless,
he bound himself by a solemn vow she should not
perish if he could save her. On his departure Harold
apprised Susan and Miriam of what he had just heard,
his doubts of its truth, and his determination to await
the event. They heard, and submitted in silence.
VOL. II. 2
Susan had long since acquiesced in the supremacy of
her husband in all cases not directly compromising
her conscience, and the religion of Miriam was that of
obedience. They retired and sought consolation in
prayer.
Langley galloped furiously home, and related to his
father the ill success of his mission. At one time he
thought of asking permission to return and endeavor,
if possible, to protect those helpless women; but he
recollected he had higher duties at home, and
relinquished
the design with a calm resolution to do his
duty, and submit in silence to what seemed inevitable.
The brief period preceding the expected attack was
employed in various devices of defence which former
experience had taught them; and these being
completed
,
the hour had come that more than any other
tries the strength of manhoodthe hour of watchful
caution, and of deep suspensethe hour of dread
anticipation, ere action has conquered thoughtthe
hour when the arm is idle and the fancy busy.
It was indeed an interval of dreadful silence and
grim repose; a stern, terrific calma crisis that tried
the firmness of the soul, ere it called forth the strength
of the arm. At length, when the sun had gained the
midway of the sky, Langley, who was on the watch,
suddenly saw on the opposite side of the broad river
a hundred columns of smoke, beginning slowly to rise
in various directions, as far as the eye could reach.
The land was a rich alluvial plain, extending many
miles, and constituting the most thickly settled, as
well as best cultivated portion of the colony. Here,
where every object was distinctly visible, he beheld
men, women, and children, white and black, fleeing
before the swift-footed Indian, brandishing his
tomahawk
,
painted like a demon, and yelling like a fiend.
Here he saw a white man bravely contending against
fearful odds, with all the energies of despair, at last
cut down, scalped, and hacked in pieces. There, and
everywhere, there crowded upon his sight scenes the
most horrible and inhumanold men and little
children
,
women and half-blown blooming girlsall
shared the same fate in that bloody hour, and were
offered up a sacrifice to savage vengeance, perhaps
savage wrongs. It was another of the sore trials
which so often occur amid a conflict of painful duties,
that Langley was compelled to be a witness of this
scene of horrors, without the power of administering
aid to the wretched sufferers; for every moment a
similar attack was anticipated. Still he proposed to
his father to cross the river in the boat, if it were only
to rescue one single victim from the grasp of these
relentless barbarians.
Impossible, answered the old CavalierIt will
be fatal to us, without being of the least service to
them. The bloody scene will be over before we can
cross the river, and with only the assistance of the
overseer and Gregory, who is a notorious poltroon,
what could we do? Unless our information is
erroneous
,
we may expect an attack every moment, and
might soon be called to defend our own hearth. In
this case, at least, charity begins at home, and our first
duty is here. But, Langley, added he, as if suddenly
recollecting himselfthere is yet a few moments, I
hope, for another effort to overcome the obstinacy of
that frost-bitten Crop-ear and his family. For himself,
I care notlet him pay the penalty of his folly. But
his poor wife, who really is a kind, good soul, though
a little fanaticaland little Miriam, who, for one of
the elect, is a good sort of a dowdyDowdy! thought
Langleythey are not to blame, and I don't like the
idea of their perishing miserably, as they most certainly
will, if they remain where they are.
Shall I go to him once more, interrupted Langley
impetuously.
Yesquick as lightning! take Fireblood, who I
have ordered to be kept saddled, and put him to whip
and spur. The distance is but small, and possibly the
sight of what is passing yonder may cool his confidence
in savage discriminations. If the Crop-ear resists,
knock him down, and run off with the women, whether
they will or not. This is no time for ceremony. Be
off instantly. I would go with you, only I am sure
the Crop-ear and I would get into a quarrel.
Langley required no spur, and in less than ten
minutes had dismounted at Harold's door. He found
him contemplating the scene on the opposite shore with
deep and solemn emotion.
You see, sir, said Langley, I am here again, and
on the same errand. You can no longer doubt what
will be the fate of yourself and family, if you remain
here. Your only chance of safety is in coming over
and joining my father in defending his house, which
is in some measure prepared. Once more, I beseech
you to lose not a moment.
I have made up my mind, on principle, replied
Harold. I have not wronged these redmen, and I
anticipate no revenge.
Is this your determination?
Unalterably.
Where are the ladies, sir? asked Langley,
somewhat
sharply.
Where they should be, replied Harold; at their
prayers.
Cannot I see them for one moment?
To what purpose? But no matterthey are not
to be seen.
But, by heaven, they shall be seen. Excuse me,
sir. This is no time for ceremony. Life and death
are on the momentand he darted past Harold into
an inner room, where sat, or rather kneeled, the mother
and daughter in silent devotion. The moment he
entered, they rose, and Langley exclaimed, pointing to
Harold, who had followed him
Your
husband and
your
father is resolved you
shall stay here and perish by the hands of yonder
savages. I come, on the part of
my
father, to entreat
to conjure him to take refuge in his house, which we
can defend, at least for a time. But he refuseshe is
determined that you shall both be murdered, scalped,
and consumed in the flames of his dwelling. Go to
himfall on your knees to himcling round his body
clasp his knees, and pray him to avoid the double crime
of sacrificing you, and murdering himself.
Thus saying, he took them each by the hand, and
led them to where the father stood, apparently
unmoved
.
They kneeled at his feetthey embraced his
kneesthey caught his hands, bathed them with tears,
and besought him to accept the offered refuge.
Harold, sobbed the faithful wife, remember we
are not now suffering for conscience' sake. We shall be
murdered, not martyred. If we die, it will not be an
offering to God, in testimony of the truth, but as
victims
to the false confidence of a husband and a father
in the humanity of those who never spare. Ah! hark!
An Indian yell of triumph was heard across the river,
announcing that the bloody work was done.
The iron frame of Harold shivered with emotion, and
his more than iron will was shaken to its centre by
this appeal. He contemplated the only two beings that
bound him to the earth, a few moments, in speechless
tenderness; and, as a second yell sounded in his ear,
raised up the pale supplicants, pressed them to his
heart, and the martial spirit of his youthful days being
once again aroused, exclaimed
Be it so. My own arm shall protect the wife of
my bosom and the daughter of my affections. I will
not trust them even to heaven.
Few, very few preparations were made, and right
speedily they left the house they were never to revisit
more. The emigrants consisted of Harold, Susan,
Miriam
,
and Mildredthe affrighted slaves being
dispersed
in all directions, no one knew whither. They
were received by the old Cavalier, with the warm
welcome
of a frank and generous spirit. His excellent
wifewho we have not yet mustered among our active,
disposable force, because we have already as many
troops on hand as we can managehis excellent
wife was no way behind her husband in hospitable
demonstrations
;
and the logical Gregory, who was
suffering
under a severe fit of the ague, was greatly
comforted
at the new recruits to the garrison, though they
added to its numbers more than its strengthfor
Misery loves company, quoth Gregory Moth.
The dread repose which, for a brief period, followed,
was at length interrupted by the appearance of a band
of painted warriors, cautiously emerging from the thick
forest, that extended from some quarter of a mile
distance
to heaven only knows where. Silent and cautious
as beasts of prey on their bloody midnight rounds, their
dark faces were seen peeping from behind the trees,
and their leaders exchanging vehement gestures with
each other. Being, at length, apparently satisfied that
no enemy lurked in ambush, they advanced warily
towards the mansion, exercising all their savage arts
in making their approaches, under cover of the
outbuildings
,
and keeping in the range of that part of the
house having the fewest windows and doors. Not a
mouse stirred, not a word was spoken above a whisper
within, and the savages at length concluded that the
place had been abandoned. Still with habitual caution
they advanced, crawling like serpents in the grass, with
the intention of plundering and setting it on fire.
The Cavalier had laid his plan of defence with great
skill, as became an old soldier. The few men were
placed at different loop-holes, primed and loaded, with
positive directions not to fire, till the order was given,
and the women, having refused to retire to an inner
apartment, were to supply the ammunition as it might
be wanted. The savage band was still sliding along
in the grass, their heads scarcely visible, and every
gun was pointed with deadly aim, each at its peculiar
victim, awaiting the word to fire, when Gregory,
who was placed at one of the loop-holes, in an ecstasy
of fear, unconsciously pulled the trigger, discharging
his piece at random, and without effect. The savages
uttered a yell, started up, and retreated under cover of
one of the outhouses.
Victory! victory! shouted Gregory, I have
routed the copper-colored catiffs. See how they
scamper.
His exultation was, however, speedily checked by
his master, who without saying a word, seized him by
the shoulder, conducted him to the cellar, and locking
him in, put the key in his pocket. An hour, or more
elapsed without the re-appearance of the redmen, and
it began to be hoped, that Gregory had indeed
discouraged
them from any further attacks. But this
hope was soon dispelled by the advance of the enemy,
from behind the barn, each with a lighted torch. It
was evidently their intention to fire the house, and
force its inmates either to perish in the flames, or come
forth to meet even a more cruel death. Again every
gun was pointed with a steady aim, and at a signal
from the old Cavalier the fire was giventhree
savages fell, and some others limped off in the rear, as
the main body retreated once more to their cover,
yelling with rage and disappointment.
Another pause ensueda dreary pausefilled up
by the spectacle of the conflagration of Harold's
residence
,
which was distinctly seen from that of Master
Tyringham. A detachment from the beseiging party
had plundered, set it on fire, and were dancing like
demons around the ruins. The fugitives contemplated
the spectacle in silent sorrow; but the thought of
what would have happened had they been there,
reconciled
them to their loss, and they were grateful. A
new and nearer danger now presented itself. The
savages were seen emerging from behind the stables,
pushing a wagon laden with straw before them, and
which almost completely protected them, as they
advanced. There was no doubt as to their object,
which was to set fire to the straw, when the wagon
was near enough to communicate it to the building.
This manuvre at once baffled all their previous
arrangements for defence. There was no time to
concert
means to counteract it, and each man was left to
his own resources. It was in vain they kept up a
continued fire; the Indians, sheltered behind the straw,
escaped their aim, and continued pushing the wagon
steadily in a direction to windward of the house. At
2*
this moment of dread suspense and imminent peril,
Langley suddenly exclaimedThere is but one
wayand rushing towards the kitchen, returned
with a blazing firebrand.
What now? asked his father.
Nothingnothing, sir,replied he, hastily.
Don't stop mea moment and it will be too late.
He then made for a door which opened in the
direction
of the approaching danger, and in so doing, passed
close to Miriam, who had acted the part of a little
heroine, during the siege, and who suddenly grasped
his arm, as if to detain him. He paused at the
interruption
,
and Miriam, as if recollecting herself, snatched
away her hand, bent down her eyes, and spoke not a
word. Before any one was aware of his design, he
had hastily opened the door, which was fortunately in
a direction that hid it from the savages, advancing,
and tugging behind the load of straw, and darted
forward
in the same line of direction until without being
seen, he had applied the brand to the dry straw, which
in an instant was in a blaze. He then retreated full
speed, but was detected in his flight, and saluted by a
shower of arrows, one of which lodged in his shoulder,
and remained quivering there, as he rushed in, and
closed the door. It was speedily drawn by the
overseer
,
who was one of the garrison, and like most of his
class, had a smattering of surgery; the blood was
staunched, and Langley, though suffering much pain,
persisted in remaining on duty, so long as he could
point a rifle, or draw a trigger.
But this daring diversion produced not its merited
consequences. The fire having been speedily
extinguished
before it gained the mastery, the wagon was
pushed still nigher and nigher; and as if to aid the
savages in their design, the wind suddenly rose to a
gale. They redoubled their exertions, and at length
having succeeded in spite of the exertions of those
within, in placing the wagon in contact with the
house, they set it on fire, and stood under its cover,
shouting in triumph.
Our time is comesaid Harold, in a calm, steady
voicedeath is inevitable, but there is at least a
choice how we shall die. How say you, friends, shall
we perish in the flames, or die fighting like men? It
is a righteous cause, when life and all that makes life
dear is at stake. This life is as often a choice of evils
as of good. Follow me, friends, and remember the race
is not to the swift, nor the battle to the strong. Come
Susancome Miriamif it please God, we will die
together. Keep close to me, both.
Langley now stept forward, and offered his
protection
to one or either of the poor desolate women,
whose habits of submission to the will of the husband
and father were so confirmed by long years, that they
spoke not a word, but bowed in silence to Harold's
behest. They had clung to him in life, and were
willing
to follow him to death.
You cannot protect them both, said Langley.
Both! replied Harold; God only can protect
them. Alas! a little while ago, I said I would not
trust them even to His keeping; I am punished for my
blasphemy.
But I entreat you, sir, for the sake of others, if
not for your own.
Enoughno more, Master Langley; in this hour
of mutual extremity, when all of us are destined to
one common fate, all differences should be forgotten,
at least for the present. I would accept thy offer;
but, look yonder! There, said he, pointing to
Mistress
Tyringham, there bides your watch. A higher
and holier duty calls you. To her who owes her being
to me, I will give my care; to her who gave you
being, give thine, and die for or with her as Heaven
shall will. Now let us go forth and perish by the
tomahawk rather than by fire.
Langley bowed low, and placed himself beside his
mother. He exchanged a look with Miriam more
expressive than words, and all stood ready prepared to
sally forth in the last extremity. In the mean time
the flames rose, and spread throughout the mass of
straw; the dry pine boards began to smoke, and soon
the lively flames ran swiftly along their edges. The
moment for making a last desperate effort had arrived;
the father and children, the husband and wife, had
exchanged a last embrace, and Langley had whispered
something in Miriam's ear that changed her deadly
paleness into a ruddy glow; when, suddenly, a black
cloud, which had been approaching unheeded, sent
forth a vivid flash, followed by a burst of thunder that
seemed to announce the interposition of a higher power.
The cloud opened its bosom, and a deluge of rain
descended with such volume, as well as fury, as in
a few minutes entirely extinguished the spreading
flames, and drove the savages into the stables for
shelter, where they stood awed into silence, until the
chief addressed them:
The Great Spirit of the white man protects the
longknife, and says he must live. Let us return
home, lest he should be angry with us for opposing his
will. Let him live to tell the story of this day, and
teach his children how the redman avenges his
wrongs.
Under the influence of this feeling they all assented;
and taking up their killed and wounded, retired into
the recesses of the forest, chaunting the song of death.
The little garrison, after awaiting in silent awe
the passing away of the providential shower, and
finding
the savages did not make their appearance,
proceeded
to consult on what was best to be done. It
was unanimously resolved to remain on the watch till
next morning, and if no attack was made in the
interim, it might be safely inferred that all danger
was over, at least for that time. The night passed
away in anxious suspense, but without any alarms;
and on the morrow, a party went warily forth
without
meeting the enemy. On a careful examination
their tracks were traced in the wet ground till they
entered the forest, and it was the unanimous opinion
they had departed not to return.
Feeling now a sense of security, their thoughts
reverted to the melancholy scene they had witnessed
on the opposite shore, where every appearance of life
and animation had ceased. The savages had departed
after finishing their bloody business, leaving nothing
but ruin and death behind them. One dreary,
deathlike
solitude extended for many miles along either side
of the river; and, save those of Master Tyringham,
not a single building was standing. The whole country
wes scathed with fire. The nest of the toiling emmet
was broken up; the labor of lives reduced to ashes;
the meed of dangers, hardships, exile and privation,
for long, suffering years, swept away in a single hour,
and the owner of the fields lay a mangled victim
among their ruins. A party from Master Tyringham's
passed over with a view to rescue any survivor that
might chance to have escaped, and to bury the dead.
The scene was equally calculated to awaken both pity
and vengeance. Here lay a grey-headed Cavalier, who
had fought bravely, for his hands were cut to the bone
in grasping the Indian knife; close by his side was
his wife, who had accompanied him to the New World
to share his fate; and between them a young woman,
doubtless their daughter, with her head cleft asunder
by a tomahawk, and reft of its crown of glossy hair.
Here and there lay little infants with their brains
dashed out; and more than once they encountered
one of these innocent victims clasped in the arms of
its mother, or its faithful black nurse, who had
perished
with it. Last of all, lay a banished, wandering
Quaker, whose non-resistance little availed him here.
Some were basking in the burning sun, and some
lay half consumed in the still smoking ruins, and all
had undergone the bloody Indian rite of scalping.
Men, women, infants, not one was spared. Black and
white lay side by side; and the slave had ascended
with his master to the judgment seat of Him who
knows no distinction. So rolls the wheel of time, and
crushes as it rolls. Shall we while lolling in the lap
of security, enjoying the rich legacy of peace and
prosperity
bequeathed us by our forefathers, who paid so
dearly for it, rise up in judgment against them, if in
avenging this bloody tragedy, they took care to prevent
its repetition? Forbid it, justice! or if not justice,
forbid it, gratitude! The pioneers of the New World
came here under the sanction of rights universally
recognized by all Christian nations; they occupied
their early possessions by purchase, or by donation of
the savages; and for a long time afterwards their
weakness placed them under the immediate obligation
of self-defence, the first law of nature.
CHAPTER IV.
Resuscitation of Gregory MothHow Accident sometimes
Disconcerts
the Projects of Wise MenDecisive Consequences of Turning
to the Right instead of the LeftSensible Cogitations of a Young
Man about Falling in LoveAnother Accident Leading to a Long
Talk, which, as Is commonly the Case, Ends in Nothing particular.
While
the events recorded in the preceding
chapter
were in progress, Gregory Moth had remained
ensconced in the dire donjon-keep to which he was
consigned by his master. Nor was he, in truth, at
first altogether discontented with his situation, as it
placed him entirely beyond the reach of the Indian
arrows. But there being no window on that side of
the cellar where the savages were making their
approaches, his solicitude to know what was going
forward soon became exceedingly troublesome, and in
process of time the dead silence that prevailed gave
rise to a thousand thronging apprehensions. He was
suffering the martyrdom of fear, when all of a sudden
his nostrils were grievously assailed by a strong
effluvia
of smothered smoke, which threw him into an
agony, or rather an ague. He concluded at once that
the house was on fire, and gave himself up for a lost
man. The moment all hope was over, he quietly
resigned himself to his fate; for the desperation of
cowardice is often a substitute for manly resignation.
He was roused from this state of abject despair, by
the flashes of lightning that penetrated his dungeon,
and the loud peals of thunder that rolled over his head,
followed by the pelting shower, which occurred so
opportunely. After this, a dead silence again ensued,
and he was left to his own conjectures, which finally
ended in a profound sleep, produced by the struggles
of his mind and exhaustion of body. Here he lay
undisturbed, being forgotten by all amid the
apprehensions
each one entertained for his own safety, and in
the contemplation of the desolation around.
It so happened, however, that early in the morning
of the day succeeding the raising of the seige, it
became necessary to procure some articles of comfort
or convenience from the cellar, and one of the colored
serfs, who it should have been before noted, had been
safely gathered in their master's fold, on the first alarm,
was dispatched for that purpose. Cuffee, or, as he was
usually called by Gregory, old King Cole, was a native
of Africa, with a face that glistened like a well-polished
boot, luxuriating in the splendors of patent blacking.
Descending into the cellar, which was rather darkish,
King Cole stumbled over the body of Master Gregory,
who was solacing his hunger, which now began to be
rather imperative, with another nap. Being taken by
surprise, the gentleman of color pitched head foremost
against the stone wall of the cellar, but being
providentially
provided with a competency of woolly hair,
escaped without any material damage.
Gosh! exclaimed King Cole, rubbing his pate
what dat dare yeer?
I am a sort of living creature, quoth Gregory,
very like a man, I believe, though I can't be certain,
in this dubious light.
Hey! Masser Gregoryyou hide away from
Indian herehey?
I hide from the Indians! thou discolored specimen
of the genus manI scorn your words. My master
sent me here to forfeit daylight, and starve in a
dungeon
,
because I did utterly discomfit and put to flight
the copper-colored catiffs, with my single arm, and he
wanted to get all the credit of the victory to himself.
But Cuffeegood Cuffeeif thou hast the bowels of
a woodcock, I do beseech thee in thy merciful cruelty,
and pitiful hardheartedness, to petition my master to
let me out. I am, as it were, on the extreme edge of
starvation, and could make a glorious meal on pickled
grasshoppers. Go nowdo, mine honest Cuffee, and
solicit earnestly for my release. I will reward thee
with the stump of my old pipe. King Cole graciously
condescended to this pleading, and communicated it
to his master.
Bless my soul! exclaimed the CavalierI had
quite forgot poor Gregory, though some how or other,
I felt as if I missed something. Poor fellowhe must
be as hungry as a wolf by this time. Send him
hitherI must beg his pardon.
King Cole obeyed with all the dignified solemnity
of a favorite household servant; but Master Gregory
instead of waiting to receive apologies, had made
tracks towards the kitchen, where finding breakfast
ready, he sat down without saying grace, to the great
discontent of Goody Mildred, and solaced himself with
a degree of satisfaction quite exemplary. And now,
having released friend Gregory, and placed him
status
ante bellum
, we feel at perfect liberty to proceed in
our narrative with a clear conscience. Some doers of
romances seem so entirely destitute of humanity, that
they will leave a man just on the point of drowning,
or with a house burning over his head, or a sword
through his body, while they lead the gentle reader a
dance no one knows where, leaving the poor victim all
the while in this imminent jeopardy. We remember
a grievous case of this kind, in which a very
interesting
young lady fell overboard into the lake of Geneva,
in the first chapter of a romance, and was not rescued
till the middle of the second volume, the author being
occupied all that time in discussing a question of
politics
.
But, thank our stars, we were not born under
Saturn, to feel pleasure in devouring our own children,
for such we consider the personages of our story.
The destruction of the abode of Harold Habingdon
made it absolutely necessary for himself and family to
continue under the roof of Master Tyringham, until some
other refuge could be provided. Every other building
for a wide circuit around had been consumed; and
though the little capital of the colony had escaped, in
consequence of being protected by wooden defences,
guarded by a company of soldiers, it was at a distance
of many miles. Hospitality is the virtue of the new
world, and the old Cavalier, to do him justice, not
only frankly offered his house, but insisted on the
family remaining his guests, until provided with
another residence. Harold did not relish the proposal;
it went against the grain. But there seemed no other
alternative, and after a degree of hesitation that made
the old Cavalier feel quite belligerent, rather stiffly,
and ungraciously, signified his acceptance. Thus
Langley and Miriam became inmates of the same
home in spite of the stern decision of their fathers; and
thus did what could not be foreseen, baffle all the
foresight
of these calculating worms. Were it not for fear
of being stigmatized as a turbaned Turk, one might
almost be tempted to believe that what is called the
chapter of accidents is the book of fate.
The wound of Langley Tyringham, though not
dangerous was slow and lingering in its cure. But
at the expiration of a week he was able to leave his
room, and sit out on the piazza, where the refreshing
breezes from the river seemed to infuse new life and
vigor into his frame. Here he was sometimes joined
by different members of the family, in social chat; we
cannot say cheerful chat; for the deep impression of
the recent massacre, joined to the wide-spread
desolation
that everywhere presented itself, depressed the
jocund, airy spirit of youth, and turned the gravity of
age to sober melancholy. When Harold announced to
his wife and daughter the arrangement he had made,
he contented himself with gravely, almost sternly,
reminding the latter of his former conversation on the
subject of Langley, and repeating his prohibition of all
intercourse, as far as it could be avoided, without
direct offence to their host and his family. In spite of
filial duty, Miriam could not help thinking these
restrictions unreasonable, as regarded herself, and
ungrateful towards those who had opened their house
and their hearts to receive them. Still, she offered no
objection, but as usual acquiesced in his wishes with
silent resignation. She was obedient, as well from a
habit of duty, as from the dictates of conscience. The
deportment of Harold towards her, though in the main
kind and affectionate, was rigid and inflexible in all
matters involving what he termed principle. He
checked the vivacity of her youth, and was intolerant
of all those little amusements, or recreations that had
for their object merely whiling away the hour,
and dissipating that weary listlessness, always the lot
of childhood, when in the absence of all capacity to be
useful it resorts to trifles for amusements. Thus,
instead of growing up among the flowers, her early
days were passed in the shade of her father's pious
gloom. In her infancy, she was never a child, in her
youth, she was never young. Perhaps it was all for
the best, and that this stern discipline prepared her to
endure with patience the severe trials she was destined
to encounter.
Though she avoided Langley, as much as possible,
without absolute rudeness, strange as it may appear to
some, the less she enjoyed his society, the more she
thought of him. She dwelt on his daring courage in
venturing forth to almost certain death, to save the
lives of his parents,
her
parents and herself. Had he
risked his life for her alone, she could not have been
more grateful. Nay, her feelings were only the more
fervent, when she remembered that those she most
cherished on earth were involved in the fate from
which he had ventured his life to rescue her.
Langley
remained for weeks pale and languid, and pity
allied itself with gratitudea most formidable
confederacy
in the heart of woman.
The robustuous Cavalier, who pitched head foremost
into everything, whether a stone wall, or a feather
bed, had in like manner, in his summary mode of
intimating
his wishes, signified to Langley, that though as
a Virginia gentleman, he had invited the family of the
Roundhead to his house, after losing their own, he
must distinctly understand that the edict of
non-intercourse
was still in full force. The wise old gentleman
concluded by positively prohibiting his son from
falling
in love with the little Crop-ear, since he would
never consent to mix his blood or his name with that
of a rebel to his king, and an apostate from his mother
church. The reader is not to presume from this
reference
to mother church, that Master Tyringham was a
very religious man. The honest truth of the matter
is, that though he had fought for the thirty-nine
articles
,
and was ready to fight again, it would have
puzzled him mightily to tell what they were. But
people may have a vast deal of bigotry without
much religion.
However this may be, Langley assured his father,
and that with sincerity, that he had not the least
intention of making love to Miriam; whereupon the
worthy Cavalier departed, highly satisfied with the
wisdom of his precaution. Left alone, the young
gentleman
began to chafe a little on the bit. He was
now of agewitness the sturgeon's head, and the
profound
nap in his chair. Without overrating himself,
he thought he was man enough to resist being treated
as a boy or tied to his father's watchchain. In short,
he waxed rebellious, and meditated an insurrection. It
was well, he thought, that he was not in love with
Miriam, else he might be tempted to woo her, if only
to assert his independence. Then by a very natural
transition, he recalled to mind the sweet and pious
composure, with which she had met the almost
certain
approach of a horrible death. He dwelt on her
pale, placid brow, her deep, feeling eye, as it often
watched him in his efforts for her defence; nor did
he forget the involuntary eagerness with which she
grasped his arm, and suddenly relinquished it, as
heretofore
related. There were certain looks she had
directed towards him, while the arrow was extracting
from his shoulder, which penetrated deeper than his
wound, and made a more lasting impression. Finally,
having lived much alone in his boyhood, he was
accustomed
to soliloquize in thought, and the following may
serve as a specimen of what occurred to his mind
whenever he was at leisure and alone.
How strange it seems, that those religious and
political antipathies, which set us together by the ears
in the old world, should extend to the new. What if
her father raised his arm against his lawful sovereign?
For all their claim to divine right, kings are but men,
for they die like other men, and if people are punished
with death for rebelling against their sovereign, I don't
see why a sovereign may not be punished for rebelling
against his people. It strikes me, that kings may
conspire against the just rights of their subjects, as
well as subjects against the lawful prerogative of the
sovereign. If you punish one, why not the other? As
to high church and low church, I don't see that there
is any great difference, where there are no loaves and
fishes to scramble about. Surely it is not only absurd,
but cruel to persecute those who have themselves fled
from persecution. How can people tell whether they
are treading in the paths of truth, or wandering in the
slough of error, except as the Bible teaches them, not
as the Bible is interpreted by those who with all their
arrogance, do not pretend to inspiration? As to poor
Miriam, she is a dear little soul, as innocent as a lamb,
and as pious as a saint. She follows the faith of her
father, as I do that of mine. If we were marriednot
that I have the least inclination that waybut if by
some unaccountable accident we were to marry, we
might go to the same church, for we are both
Christians
,
without disputing about points of faith when we
came home. It is true, she sings rather long hymns,
but her voice is so sweet, it does my heart good to
hear her. To be sure, there might be some difficulty
about the children. Pshaw! what the deuce am I
thinking aboutand Master Langley concluded his
soliloquy in a huff, by setting forth to cool himself in
a contemplative walk.
It was verging towards sunset, and this was the
first time he had ventured to take a stroll, since he
received
the arrow in his shoulder. He naturally bent
his way towards the water, for there is an irresistible
attraction in the running brooks, the silvery lake, and
the winding river. The playful child, happy in its
innocent thoughtlessness, loves to scamper along its
white, sandy shore, and ever and anon, bathe its feet
in the cold water; the lusty boy delights to hurl the
skipping stone athwart its glassy surface, and count
with exultation the number of its leaps; and the
caretired
spirit, laden with tears and sorrows, is coaxed for
a while into resignation or forgetfulness, by its
soothing
murmurs.
Just before the spirit moved the young philosopher
to indulge in an evening stroll, that mysterious
sympathy
,
which the reader must already have observed,
had unaccountably produced a concert of action,
between Langley and the little Crop-ear girlhad
impelled Miriam to put on her primitive bonnet, with
the self-same design. She had been accustomed to
walk abroad at will since the illness of Langley,
feeling
no apprehension of meeting him, and Harold had
VOL. II. 3
indulged her under a like conviction. Langley had
not proceeded far, when he saw something he took for
a woman, slowly pacing along, as if in deep
contemplation
.
He had a presentiment who it was, and
respecting the command of his father, changed his
course, several points of the compass, by which
manuvre he placed a thick copse of wood betwixt
him and the enemy. Miriam had also seen him
coming
towards her, and moved by a similar impulse of
duty, diverged a little at first, until she placed herself
under shelter of the self-same copse, after which she
turned short about, and bent her steps towards the
house, on the opposite side of the cover. Without a
map, we despair of giving a clear idea of their
juxta-position
;
but certain it is, that these mutual endeavors
to avoid each other suddenly brought them together,
face to face, in turning a sharp angle of the wood.
The truth is, there is no resisting destiny, and it is
useless to argue the point.
The face of Miriam, naturally pale, and that of
Langley rendered so by his late indisposition, both
became suddenly flushed at this awkward and unsought
meeting. To pass without speaking, or to speak
without
stopping, would have savored of discourtesy, and
accordingly the young gentleman addressed the young
lady, halting at the same time. It is believednay,
it is certain, that his first remark had reference to the
weather, that never failing andlet people say what
they willthat interesting subject, which in some
way or other, enters into almost all the concerns of
life. Certain pert writers, aspiring to more fashionable
topics, have sneered at this common-place topic, but
after all, it is better to talk of the weather, than to
scandalize our neighbors, or play dummy, like two
John Bulls, when they meet together after a long
absence.
What a delightful evening, quoth Langley.
Delightful, echoed Miriam; and they rung the
changes on this head, reiterating the same ideas, if
not the same words, until it is believed they scarcely
knew what they were saying. Whether this
unconsciousness
extended to what they were doing, is
doubtful
,
but certain it is, that contrary to all approved
canons of courtesy, instead of the gentleman turning
about with the lady, the lady turned back with him,
without being aware of her condescension; and in
place of returning to the house, they proceeded the
other way, still harping on the beauty of the evening.
All on a sudden, however, Miriam changed the subject,
and fixing her eyes on his face, said in a voice
betokening
an interest in the subject
You are very pale, and must be tired with your
walklet us return.
Tired, what makes you think so? Is it because
you are tired of me? said Langley jestingly.
Whywhybecause you look so. You are so
pale and thin; I am sure you must be weak and
weary.
Indeed, you are mistaken, I never felt better in
health, or happier in spirit, than at this moment.
There was probably something in the tone, manner,
or look, which accompanied these words, that caused a
slight suffusion on the cheek of Miriam.
Do you think there is no danger from the savages?
said she hastily.
None. They will not return. They have pretty
well done their bloody business. Besides, they will
soon have enough to do in defending themselves. We
are preparing an expedition to avenge their cruelties,
and if possible forever prevent their repetition.
And do you go with it?
Certainly. Every man that can carry a weapon,
or put one foot before the other will go, and do his best
to avenge the blood of his kindred and friends.
By shedding his own. But you are not yet fit to
go on such an errand. You are scarcely recovered
from your wound, and should stay at home to protect
us poor women.
I am quite able to pull a trigger, and can best
protect you, by destroying your enemies.
Yes!answered she, with a deep feelingyes,
by leaving them alone to their fearful apprehensions,
awakened by every falling leaf, or whisper of the air;
to feed on their miserable anxieties for your fateto
a conflict of hopes and fears, that only ends in the
certainty of a broken heart. Do not goI entreat
thee not to go. Do not leave usIIspeak in
behalf of thy mother.
Would you have me stay at home to be despised
as a coward? cried Langley, deeply moved by her
gentle solicitudewould you have me called coward
tell me, Miriam?
No, replied she, firmlyMy father is a
Christian
soldier, and has often told me that courage is the
great safeguard of the virtues of man, since without
it he may be frightened out of them all, and commit
the deepest crimes through the instigation of fear. I
would not have you be afraid of anything on earth,
but doing wrong. But I wish you could remain with
us, without incurring a name all women hate and
men despise. When do you go?
The day after to-morrow.
Indeedso soon. And when do you return?
When it pleases Heaven. Perhaps never.
Perhaps so, said Miriam in a low voicelet us
return home. We have committed a fault to our
fathers. Let us go and ask forgiveness.
Langley made no attempt to detain her, and they
turned towards the house, apparently little disposed
for further conversation.
CHAPTER V.
Miriam Sets an Example to all Dutiful DaughtersPoses Her
Mother with a Knotty QuestionSome Prosing about Humdrum
Domestic MattersA Love Scene between Mildred and Gregory
MothSketch of a Character, and sundry Other Matters.
Harold Habingdon
was now busily employed in
erecting
a temporary wooden building for the occupation
of his family, and had frequent occasion to visit the
capital to obtain supplies of materials. It was during
one of these journeys there that the accidental meeting
recorded in the preceding chapter occurred, and
consequently
,
Miriam, for the present, escaped a lecture for
her involuntary transgression. Like a dutiful
daughter
,
she, however, immediately disclosed it to Susan;
for her pure and innocent soul never once harbored
the idea of concealing any act or thought from her
mother. She, therefore, frankly told the whole story,
or at least intended to do so. But, somehow or other,
it was no more like what actually occurred, than the
practice of certain very moral and religious people is
to their professions. She said not a word about looks,
tones, and other accompaniments, which are as
essential
to the proper understanding of a subject as the
expression of the face is to a likeness in a picture.
Susan was a kind, rather than an indulgent mother;
and though she seldom commanded her daughter,
expected obedience to her wishes. She gently chid
Miriam for not returning home immediately.
Would you have done so, mother, if you had been
me? said Miriam, with perfect simplicity.
Why, I don't know whether I would, child. Come,
let us go spin.
The period of departure for the capital to join the
garrison and the few planters that survived the
massacre
in the expedition projected by the governor against
the hostile savages, had now arrived. Harold had
returned, and having been cured of his scruples by the
scene he had just witnessed, voluntarily consented to
be one of the party; and the old Cavalier and his son
panted for an opportunity of retaliating on the Indians
the murder of their friends and neighbors. It was felt
by all that a decisive struggle was at hand, which
might decide for ages, perhaps for ever, whether this
portion of the earth was to remain a wild, unfruitful
heritage of savage man, or the wilderness come in
time to blossom as the rose, by the magic of labor.
The evening preceding the morning of the departure
of these adventurous spirits on this fatiguing and
dangerous
service was passed in grave and solemn
converse
,
interrupted by long pauses of painful thought
and gloomy anticipation. Many were the cautions of
the good dames to their helpmates to be careful of the
nightly dews, and morning fogs; and most especially
were they adjured to keep clear of all trees behind
which the prowling savage might lurk, and launch
his feathery arrows. Good Mistress Tyringham
especially
reminded her husband that she had packed up
his nightcap and slippers; whereupon the old Cavalier
kissed her and, though not in merry mood, laughed in
his sleeve while telling her he did not think he should
have much occasion for such rarities.
The hour of parting came, for they were to start
bright and early next morning. It was brief, solemn,
and sad. At the last moment Miriam gave her hand
to Langley; he felt a warm tear fall on his, and heard
a soft tremulous whisperTake care of yourself for
all
our sakes. The tear, thought he, may have been
for her father, but the words were for me; and he
often dwelt on them as he lay awake in the deep forest
at night, listening to the wolf's long howl, or the shrill
hootings of the solitary owl. The Indian warfare is
no child's play. The American savage is equally crafty
and daring; he moves like a shadow, leaving no track
behind him; instinct and experience have endued him
with a sagacity which often puts to shame the boasted
reason of civilized man, and forces from him an
acknowledgment of his inferiority. In courage he is
a hero, in fortitude a martyr. A union of the virtues
of a North American Indian with those of a civilized
Christian white man would be a great improvement
in the human species. But experience has shown that
the mingling of the blood of the two races rather
combines
their vices than their virtues, and produces a
being inferior to both. The white man is the great
aristocrat of the creation, and cannot amalgamate with
any other color without being soiled by the contact.
The march of our wayfarers was through a long
unbroken succession of woods and wilds, where no
milestone
marked the distance, or fingerpost pointed out
the way. By the aid of Indian guides they were enabled
to follow the trail of the Indian party that had desolated
the colony, until, on the thirteenth day, they tracked
them to the village of the great chief who had led the
massacre. Crouching low in the thick forest that
approached to within a few hundred yards of the
village
,
they waited in breathless silence till the sun
went down, and the shadows of evening gathered
around. They could see that preparations had been
made for a grand feast in celebration of their victory
over the white man, and as soon as it was dark,
hundreds
of wild savages, men, women, and children,
issued forth from their cabins carrying lighted torches,
with which they set fire to a vast pile of pine knots,
which anon lighted into a blaze that shed a red and
angry lustre on the scene. Painted like fiends, and
decorated with fantastic yet picturesque grace, the
warriors danced around the fire, to the music of
triumphant
yells, brandishing the tomahawk, and
howling
forth their exploits in the victory they were now
celebrating. One warrior sung in a sort of recitative
how he had slaughtered the long-knives, and cast them
still quivering with life into the burning flames;
another
boasted of the women he had cut down and
3*
scalped, as they shrieked with agony; and a third
acted over again the massacre of innocent babes, their
brains dashed out, and their bodies trampled in the
dust, or cast among the smoking ruins of the home
where they were born. The blood of the white man
boiled in his veins at hearing these bloody stories.
Some of the victims, whose fate was now rehearsed
with such triumphant exultation, had been their
friends; some their near relations; and among the
lookers on were those who mourned the loss of wives
and children. But for the near prospect of a surer
vengeance, it would have been impossible to restrain
them from instant action; for the scene and the
recollections
it brought to mind almost made them mad.
The leaders urged, over and over again, that it
would be best to wait till the feast was over, and the
tired savages sleeping away their debauch; but when
at length they saw the scalps of their kindred, friends,
wives, children, brothers and fathers, brought forth,
and suspended from poles, round which the savages
danced in triumph, they could no longer be restrained.
Both Langley and Harold, in whispered tones of deep
determination, declared, that however bitter and bloody
the aggression, they could not bring themselves to
await the hour proposed, when the disarmed Indians,
become insensible from drunkenness, would be
unworthy
victims, incapable of resistance or atonement. It
was true, they would at all events be taken by
surprize
,
but they were armed, and so far capable of
defending themselves, that it would not be rank
cowardice to attack them. The old Cavalier seconded
these remonstrances, and an immediate attack was
determined on. The plan of operations had been
previously
settled, and the long-knives, who were not
sufficiently
numerous to surround the village, emerging
from the forest with silent celerity, were upon the
savage revellers ere they were aware of their coming.
The Indians, though taken by surprise, did not fly,
with the exception of the women and children.
Elated by their late success, and by the boastings and
revellings of the night, they met their foes without
flinching. Man to man, teeth to teeth, they met, and
tugged and struggled for life. No quarter was asked
or given, for the long-knife well knew the tortures
inflicted by the savages on their prisoners, and the
savages felt that they were now about to atone for
their recent massacre. Death or victory was the only
alternative, and death or victory the only thought.
Each one fought for himself, and every man was a
unit. None heard, none heeded the word of command,
if any such was given, for now men had no ears to
hear, or eyes to see, aught but the groans of the dying,
or the bodies of their foes. The fires went out, and
still they fought by the light of the stars, that seemed
to shine brighter than ever on the bloody scene,
unconscious
and uncaring. Many gallant deeds were done
that night, and many a gallant spirit, red and white,
never saw the morning. But we will not enter into
particulars. There is enough of bloodshed in the pages
of authentic history, one would think, to satiate the
keenest appetite, and we shall only say, that when the
sun rose that day, and smiled on the open space in
front of the village, he saw nothing but smoking ashes,
and earth smoking with blood. The women and
children had fled into the woods, at the first surprise;
but the red armed warriors, had died to a man on the
ground where they stood, and the village had been set
on fire. So ended for this time the war between the
white man and the red, a war never ending, still
beginning, fighting still, and still destroying. The
surprise had given the long-knives such a decided
advantage, that their loss was comparatively small.
Of the trio, in which the reader is doubtless most
interested, Langley escaped with a contusion received
by a blow from an Indian club; Harold with a few
hard knocks, and the old Cavalier came off scot free,
bringing home his night-cap and slippers in triumph.
During this brief campaign, Miriam and her mother
said their prayers and plied the needle or the spinning
wheel, while Mistress Tyringham seemed to forget her
anxieties for those abroad in kindly cares for those at
home. There were indeed hours and hours, especially
in the dead silence of night, when dismal fears would
beset them, and the whoop of the owl, or the chaunt
of the whippoorwill, came full charged with all those
omens ascribed to them by superstition, from long past
times. But the cheerful light of morning seldom failed
to assuage these gloomy forebodings, and those blessed
every day duties which must be attended to, in joy or
sorrow, sunshine or rain, forbade that constant, wilful
indulgence of care or sorrow, which is one among the
many penalties we pay for what is called the good
fortune
of being in a situation that places us above the
necessity of exertion. Busy men, especially politicians,
and philanthropists by profession, with whom meddling
is a disease, are a mischievous race, and a great
portion
of their time is spent in doing mischief. But little
busy bee, woman, is always gathering honey, when
employed within doors. Every stitch of the needle,
and every turn of the spinning wheel, administers to
the comfort of somebody; and every step she takes
is on some errand of domestic benevolence, tending
towards a happy household, provided always that she
avoids scolding, and the chimney does not smoke.
All would have gone on smoothlyfor the anxious
cares and sad solicitude of the faithful wives and
pious daughters were too deep to ruffle the surface
had it not been for Master Gregory Moth, who being a
man of notorious valor was left at home for the
protection
of the ladies. There had grown up between this
worthy and dame Mildred, the faithful handmaid of
Susan, a desperate sectarian feud, arising from a
difference in politics and religion, similar to that of
their mastersand according to the old saying, like
master like man, they kept up a perpetual warfare.
Gregory, being an Oxford man, considered a bishop as
essential to the Protestant Church as a pope is to the
Catholic, and would as soon have turned Turk as give
up the hierarchy. Mildred, on the other hand, never
called the bishops anything but wolves in sheep's
clothing, and verily believed the mitre a device of
Satan himself. As to the principles of the two sects,
or the points of doctrine in which they differed, they
knew little or nothing and cared less.
Mildred was in the abstract an excellent woman;
practically she had some faults, and many weaknesses.
The great enemy of woman, who figured in the garden
of Eden, had persuaded her, that though not young,
she was still rather handsome, and she had lived so
long in the hope of finding a helpmate, that hope had
almost become a certainty. The vision had become
so familiar that it seemed actual reality. She was,
moreover, violently given to psalm singing, both in
season and out of season, though it must be confessed
her voice did not quite equal the music of the spheres,
as celebrated by the rascally Pagan bards. The fact
is, it was decidedly bad, inasmuch as it united the two
great requisites of shrillness and dissonance, besides
being occasionally as keen as hard cider. It was,
moreover, a most ungovernable and rebellious voice,
always out of the traces; sometimes too high, at
others too low, and continually breaking short off, from
a treble to a bass, without the slightest preliminary
gradation, like unto a desperately-ridden hack, who
suddenly varies his pace from a canter to a trot, from
a trot to a villanous wriggle, and finally ends in a
full stop. In addition to all this, poor Goody Mildred
sung through the nose, and made ugly wry faces just
like a prima donna.
Gregory Moth, who boasted of being not only an
Oxford scholar, but a Cavalier, had a special antipathy
to long psalms, most especially the one hundred and
nineteenth, a great favorite of Mildred. If, as the
most witty of all wits, the reverend author of
Hudibras
,
affirms, in the mischievous spirit of satire, the
Puritans were pious out of pure spite to the Cavaliers,
it may be affirmed with equal truth, that the Cavaliers
were licentious and profane in pure spite to the
Puritans
.
There was a curious conteston one side
which should be the best, on the other which should
be the worst. However this may be, the feud which
deluged a nation with blood, and cost a monarch his
head, had somehow or other descended into Mistress
Tyringham's kitchen, and greatly disturbed its
accustomed
serenity. These two bulwarks of the faith
scarcely ever met without a sparring, and, if the truth
must be told, Master Gregory often provoked a contest,
from which he always came off triumphant by
preserving
his temper. His usual way of rousing the
lion was by singing a stave of some profane song, and
calling her Goody Mildred, a name she abhorred.
A day or two after the departure of the expedition
against the savages, Mildred was sitting in deep
contemplation
of the enormities of the wolves in sheep's
clothing, and at the same time humming a stave,
which from long habit she could repeat without
thinking
.
At this moment Gregory approached her with
fell designs, singing a verse of an old song, to which
she had a special aversion, and which ran thus
Barnaby, Barnaby, thou 'st been drinking,
I can tell by thy nose, and thine eyes are winking;
Drunk at Richmond, drunk at Dover,
Drunk at Newcastle, drunk all over,
Hey Barnaby! take 't for warning,
Be no more drunk or dry of a morning.
Goody Mildred, I wish you would take a lesson
from me in singing, for you know I was one of the
chaunters at Saint Frydeswide's church, at Oxford. I
never heard an owl hoot with a worse grace. Listen
to me, I'll teach you the true cadenza: and he roared
out
My name's not Tribulation,
Nor holy Ananias;
But I'm a pagan saint of old,
Call'd Antoninus Pius.
What dog is that, howling? exclaimed Mildred.
Get out, you cur; and she stamped her foot
significantly
.
Goody Mildred, of a truth, thou hast little taste
and no voice. Why, I have silenced a whole flock of
wolves with that very song. If you don't like it, I'll
sing you anotherFa, sol, la,hemmy voice is a
little hoarse.
Hoarse! said the other; it's always hoarse. It
sounds for all the world like the songs they sing in
Tophet. I wish you'd go and frighten the wolves
again.
Well, but Goody Mildredexcellent, exemplary
Mildreddon't be so Crop-earish; and don't turn up
your devout, impatient nose at me, as if I was a
bishop. I've a great secret to tell you.
Well, what is it? do tell me. Mildred was apt
to be a little curious.
Why, marry, I declare I am almost afraid to tell
you, for I might as well expect a drum to keep a
secret. But, really now, as it were, peradventure, and
howbeit, if I am not greatly mistaken in the
symptoms
,
I am either grievously in love, or at least have
an awful presentiment that I shall soon meet with one
of those fatal accidents called matrimony, and that
without benefit of clergy.
Oh, Master Gregory! not without benefit of
clergy; that would be monstrous wicked. But you
are at your nonsense again. I know you are not
serious.
Serious and solemn as a toad sitting under his
umbrella, which is metaphorically called his stool.
Am not I a Cavalier, and you know they never tell
fibs like unto the Crop-ears.
I don't know any such thing, old Moth, so she
always called him when out of humor.
Well, don't be angry, it spoils your looks entirely,
and that is a great pity, seeing you can't well afford
it. So you won't hear my secret?
Well, out with it. I'm sure I don't hinder you.
As I was sayingno, now I recollect, I have not
yet said itI am grievously tempted, whether in the
flesh or in the spirit, I know notwhether instigated
by the wicked Serpent or not, to commit the awful,
unpardonable, irrevocable sin of matrimony.
Now, you don't say so, Master Gregory. You
mean, then, to reform and marry.
No, I mean to marry and reformthat is the true
order of succession. To reform before marrying is
putting the cart before the horse; for, inasmuch as
that all men undergo a radical change after marriage,
if they were to wax good beforehand, ten to one they
would revolt afterwards and become little better than
the wicked. But, to return to my text:I have
deeply pondered the subject for the last thirty years,
and if I could meet with a real bona-fide woman
I mean a white woman, who has brought her pigs to
the same market,'Slife, Mistress Mildred, I think
I would purchase one of the plantations over yonder,
that have no ownersfor I have saved a little,
skimmed
the creameh! Mistress Mildredyou
understand
?
and Master Gregory slapped his pocket, where
he always carried a few pennies to make a jingling.
Are you really serious? asked Mildred, edging her
chair close to him.
Quite serious, by allbut I won't swear. You
wouldn't like a swearing husband, would you?
Husband? Good la! Master Gregory, I never
think of such a thing. But I would exhort him at all
hours, by day and by night, sleeping or waking,
eating
or drinking, to give up the practice; and if he
refused
You'd convert him with a broomstickhey?
Mistress
Mildred. But to proceedI have had serious,
nay, insurmountable difficulties in finding a suitable
person; for, you know, women are as scarce here as
swallows in winter. I haveforgive my presumption,
most exalted of womenI have all but determined to
cast myself and fortune at your feet, and down he
plumped on his knees.
La! Master Gregory, now you are making game
of me, I can see it in your eyes.
Distrust thy spectacles, divine spinster. Mine eyes
lie most impudently, if they convey any such diabolical
insinuations. In good faith, were it not for one
thing
What is that? cried Mildred, impatiently.
Why, verily it is thisI will be candid with you,
for I scorn to deceive your unsuspecting innocence.
The fact is, you damsels of a certain age are too apt
to boast of your conquests; you go about like a hen,
cackling as if you had performed a great feat, and
wanted all the world to know it. Now, I am a modest
man, possessed of all the delicacy of my sex, and don't
like to be published in this manner. If it were not for
this serious objection, I do verily believe, I should be
tempted to offer Mistress Habingdon a few pounds of
tobacco, for the rich reversion of your remaining years,
seeing that in all probability you would break my
heart by dying a martyr, to prevent me from hanging
myself in despair.
Towards the close of this aboriginal declaration,
Goody Mildred had gradually pushed her chair farther
and farther from Gregory, who sat with immovable
gravity waiting an answer, which came like a
hailstorm
.
Marry come up! cried she, in a rage.
You
talk of marrying
you
talk of buying a plantation,
that can't muster as much as the hundredth part of a
fathom of wampum.
You
miserable bag of bones
you smoked herring, that has hung up so long in the
chimney that rats won't touch it. You dried
toadstool
.
Youyouyou
I
boast of such a conquest
I
cackle like an old hen!
You
an Oxford scholar,
that never studied anything but how to make a ninny
of yourself.
You
a Cavalier
you
pretend to have
kept company with gentlemen in London, that never
entered a decent house but to steal cheese-parings,
and never drank anything but two-penny ale, which
you never paid for, at the sign of the fool laughing at
a feather! But I can't live in the same house any
longer, and I'll go tell my mistress so, this blessed
minute.
Go say thy prayers, good Mildred, and aggravate
thine apathy, said Gregory, and Mildred departed in
a rage.
These sparrings happened almost daily, and
invariably
ended in an appeal to her mistress, on the part
of Mildred. This placed Susan in an awkward
position
,
somewhat similar to an exiled monarch, who has
taken refuge with one of his more fortunate neighbors,
and, if he is wise, never meddles with his domestic
concerns, lest he should wear out his welcome, and
receive a hint to mind his own business. The world
without, it is said, cannot bear two suns, neither can
the domestic world within doors bear a divided empire.
In that sphere the system of government should be
absolute, and the administration an unit. No
division
of power is admissible; and the lordly garment
which has been from time immemorial the emblem of
man's supremacy, should always be hung up at the
outside of the door to indicate a temporary abdication.
The discreet Mistress Habingdon was well aware of
the extreme delicacy of any interference with the
affairs
of the domestic empire, and especially with the
conduct of those household menials who exercise the
important functions of ladies of honor, gentlemen
ushers
,
lords of the bedchamber, and grooms of the stole,
in the courts of puissant monarchs.
Thus, though these frequent complaints of Mildred
were not only disagreeable but painful, still Susan
wisely declined any interference, awaiting with
patience the completion of the temporary building
preparing for their reception, until a better was
finished. By persevering in this prudent course of
non-intervention, it actually happened that the two
ladies, though placed in this dangerous juxta-position,
preserved the most amicable relations, and finally parted
the best friends in the world.
Other than these summer squalls, there was nothing
to disturb the even tenor of their daily routine, except
continued fears and anxieties, which were much
oftener felt than expressed. Nearly four weeks had
elapsed, without any tidings of their absent friends,
save certain vague rumors coming from no one knew
where, which only increased their apprehensions.
Buried in the boundless, pathless wilderness, these
hardy adventurers were lost to the world, and had no
means of giving or receiving information. Both parties
remained entirely ignorant of the fate of each other.
But the two matrons had been accustomed to these
trials, which, without hardening their hearts, had given
them firmness to endure either actual or anticipated
evils. Poor little Miriam suffered most, for she had
not been so well schooled in the rough discipline of the
world, and besides anxiety for her father, had now
begun to cherish in secret, and unknown to herself,
another feeling, which sometimes overmasters filial
love.
Notwithstanding the simplicity and self-denial which
formed the basis of her character, she resembled her
father in the depth of his enthusiasm, and the firmness
of his resolution. She was capablenay, she was
formed for cherishing the most profound and lasting
impressions; and in the misty softness that seemed to
constitute the leading feature of her mind, as it
certainly
formed its most touching attraction, there was
sleeping, as it were, a steady, calm resolution, which,
when once formed, and sanctioned by a conviction of
right, was capable of resisting temptation, danger,
violence and death. Her virtues had grown up and
been nourished in the solitude of youth, and like the
giants of the primeval forest, acquired a strength and
maturity never to be equalled by any after growth.
Had she been wicked, she would have been a monster;
had time and circumstance concurred, she might
have become a saint or a martyr, like those illustrious
virgins whose pure blood cemented the grand edifice
of the Christian Church. But in her present situation
she seemed far removed from such a destiny. Save
piety and filial love, no other strong feeling had ever
agitated her bosom, until she had frequent
opportunities
of meeting Langley Tyringham, who stood before
her all alone, a tall, stately tree in some sandy desert,
without a companion, and without a rival. There was
no one near to compare with him, and the great
solitude
around seemed, in her gentle fancy, animated by
him alone. She was not actually in love, or did not
know if she was. She had lately thought a great deal
of Langley, especially since his wound and his
absence
on such a perilous adventure, for he accompanied
her father, and they were so closely associated in peril
that it was quite impossible to dwell on one without
recalling the other. But he had never spoke a word
of love to her, though sometimes her heart would
whisper sweetly in her ear, that once or twice at least
the tongueless eloquence of his eyes had flashed a
language more easily learned than our mother tongue,
and far more expressive than that of the flowers by
which the Persian youth conveys his secret love.
The time did indeed pass wearily, sometimes sadly,
with the lonely girl, and every day she found it more
difficult to fix her mind on the objects before her. It
wandered away into the region of ideal fancies and
visionary anticipations, half shaped, and peering like
objects in a mist, half real, half a dream. Even her
devotions were often intruded on by worldly thoughts,
and anticipations that flitted past and led her away
into the wilderness; or, what was far more winsome
and alluring, into a region of dim visionary delights
such as are never realized in this world. She often
wandered along the river, careless of its smiling
banks or tuneful murmurs; and still oftener sat idle
at her wheel, until roused by catching the eyes of her
mother contemplating her with deep solicitude.
Ah! Miriam, thou hast a secret in that innocent
bosom, and remember what the poet sings:
If, when within the budding rose
A gnawing worm in secret lies,
Unless the opening leaves disclose
The thief, the flower soon fades and dies.
CHAPTER VI.
Return from the Warsthe Cavalier and Roundhead like Each Other
the Less the Better They Become AcquaintedSpecific for
Dispersing
a FogA Communication Ending with Something like a
Declaration.
One
evening, as the three Penelopes were sitting
together
,
beguiling the time in sober chat and sober
occupation, they were suddenly roused by the entrance
of those who were the subject of their thoughts and
conversation. It is unnecessary to describe the warm,
affectionate welcome they received, or repeat the
thousand eager questions dictated by curiosity or a
deeper interest, and which, contrary to the practice of
many lords of creation, were answered with exemplary
courtesy. All manner of married men should make a
point, when they return home from the daily round of
occupation or pleasure, to answer the inquiries of their
helpmates frankly and fully. They should recollect,
that women are household deities, who only see what
is passing in the world through the windows, and are,
consequently, more curious than the other sex. Nor
should they forget, that they have a right to know
what their husbands have been about during their
VOL. II. 4
absence. Who knows but that they may have been
carousing it lustily at a tavern, losing money at a
horse race, figuring among the young ladies, or, what
is still more provoking, actually making love to a
fashionable dame just returned from the land of
Cicisbeos
.
Yet we have seen brutes of husbands who,
returning
home from fishing or hunting excursions, would
churlishly make a mystery of how many fish they had
caught, or woodcocks they had shot or missed. This
we affirm to be treason against the domestic queen;
but, like bigamy, it never fails to carry its own
punishment
with it, as all men of experience know full well.
If not a storm, there will be a cloudy day after it, as
sure as the world. But a vehement and never-ceasing
desire to render our work highly instructive to all
classes of readers, we fear may draw upon us the
indignation
of some and set the others yawning. It can't
be helped. We must have our say, and those who
don't like it may solace themselves with cheap
literature
and picture books.
We have said nothing of the meeting of Miriam and
Langley, for the special reason that there was nothing
to say. Their behavior was exceedingly provoking.
Miriam only held out her hand timidly, and Langley,
as he gently pressed her finger ends, softly whispered,
You see I have taken good care of myself. The
little goosecap blushed, for she remembered these were
the last words she had spoken to him on his departure.
But there is no time for love scenes just now. We
have a new house on our hands, and must finish it as
soon as possible.
So at least thought Harold Habingdon, the
Roundhead
,
who became every day more impatient to remove
from the domicile of the Cavalier, that never said grace
at meals, and ate a hot dinner on a Sunday. The fact
is, the more these two gentlemen saw, the less they liked
each other. Though both good men in their way, they
were continually ruffling each other, without intending
or knowing it. Like two burrs, they never came in
contact without pricking. It was not only a contrast
of opinion on those ticklish subjects, politics and
religion, but their medium of viewing almost
everything
,
as well as their habits and manners, not only
forbade anything like cordiality, but actually created
a mutual dislike. The Roundhead abhorred drinking,
even to tetotalism, and blasphemed against tobacco.
If asked to take a glass of wine, he declined, with an
air of scornful superiority, which almost amounted to
insult. It happened that just at this time the
classical
beverage called mint-julep was invented by some
happy genius, whose name, according to custom, with
most of the great benefactors of mankind, has been
ungratefully forgotten. The inventor of the plough is
unknown, while he of the daguerreotype, who has been
the instrument of marring more human faces than all
the sign painters that ever existed, hath been embalmed
in divers works that will cause his name to last at
least as long as themselves. Well might the sage
Gregory Moth liken fame unto water, which floats the
feather and lets the diamond sink to the bottom.
The old Cavalier was in truth a man egregiously
inclined to be jovial, though, to do him justice, he
never got foxed, as the phrase then was, except on
extraordinary occasions, such as birthdays, holidays,
election days, and friendly carousals among the chosen
few. If ever man had a fair excuse for sailing over
the Bay, it was him; for the juice of the grape and
the juleps did so harmonize with his good qualities,
that he was, if possible, thrice as kindhearted,
forgiving
,
generous, and loving in his cups, as when sober
as a deacon. With him the love of good wine was a
prelude to the love of his neighbor, not excepting the
Roundhead, whose name he sometimes toasted, when
the wine or the venison was especially good, with the
remark, that though a Crop-ear, he was as honest as
the day, and as brave as Csar, that is to say, on
particular
occasions. But he always relapsed when he
became sober, and hated him mortally, a fact we
relate unwillingly, because it may be that evil-disposed
persons may draw from it an argument in favor of
drinking. Touching mint juleps, it is confidently
asserted, that he was the first man that achieved a
hail storm, by the aid of which he boasted he could
at any time disperse a great fog, and thus escape a fit
of the ague. It was with him an incontrovertible
axiom, that any man who would not volunteer a fit of
the gout now and then, for the sake of good
fellowship
,
was a skinflint, a flincher, and a milksop to boot.
Finally, he was a devoted disciple of Sir Walter
Raleighglory to his name!and smoked like an
aboriginal; was mighty quick on the trigger;
exceedingly
loyal, though he eschewed passive obedience;
rigidly orthodox, in his way; and swore a little upon
occasion.
The Roundhead, it is well known, was neither loyal
nor orthodox, and agreed with King James in nothing
but his disloyalty to tobacco. He never fell into a
passionthat is, he never gave vent to it openly. He
rejected wine on principle; he despised tobacco on
principle; and in short, was fettered by so many
principles
,
that on the whole, though a man of real worth
he was a disagreeable companion, since he was not
content with abstaining himself and setting a good
example, but lectured others for not following it. With
these, and various other sharp points of contact, it is
no wonder that these two neighbors, when the time
came for Harold to take possession of his new house,
parted worse friends than they had met; the
crowning
offence being given by that gentleman, in
discovering
what the Cavalier considered an indecent anxiety
to quit his house as soon as possible. They verified
the old observation, that domestic association creates
either friends or enemies. The story goes, that two
men once retired into the wilderness to make maple
sugar. They occupied a large hollow tree, and there
was not another human being within a distance of
twenty miles. They agreed very well at first, but
soon fell to quarreling, and one of them finally
murdered
the other. So, when there was but one family
on the face of the earth, a brother slew his brother in
a religious quarrel. Let us not boast too much of
poor human nature.
After allowing a few days for putting things in
order in the new habitation, Langley Tyringham,
considering
,
or choosing to consider, the old prohibition
of intercourse abrogated, or superseded by the two
families having not only resided together in peace, but
made war as allies, strolled over one evening to make
a friendly visit of inquiry, and offer his services.
Entering without ceremony, as the door stood wide
open, he found Miriam sitting alone, apparently
perfectly
idlefor it was just at that happy hour of
twilight
,
when all the world has leave to play awhile
indulging a sort of indolent reverie, in which fancy
hovers like the butterfly from flower to flower without
lighting on any. She started at his entrance, and
though he was received not unkindly, her
deportment
evinced a degree of awkward restraint, that
seemed to say he was not altogether welcome. But
soon her habitual calm self-possession returned, and
after a few minutes conversation on past events, she
addressed him with a melancholy gentleness, and her
eyes cast down
Langley Tyringham, I have all my life been
accustomed to obey the commands of my father, nor
will I wilfully disobey them but when my own reason
and conscience forbid my obedience. Here she paused,
as if to take breath, or gather firmness to proceed, and
Langley thought to himself, What is coming now?
She drew a long breath, that seemed almost a sigh,
and then with an effort at cheerfulness proceeded
I see thou art a patient listener, and will be as
brief as possible to reward thee. Dost thou remember
the conversation we had together, walking along the
river side?
Certainly I do. It has often been recalled to mind,
and I almost think I could repeat every word.
Thou rememberest, too, the commands of our
of your father and mine, that wethat is, that thou
shouldst not seek me again; that we were to hold no
converse, and be as strangers to each other?
I do; but don't you know these commands are,
or should be, no longer in force. Have we not lived
together, shared dangers together, suffered and
rejoiced
together, since that time? Surely our fathers
can be no longer enemies after having been thus
closely associated with each other, when all their
earthly interests were bound up together. I feel
myself
free to come and go, unless you forbid me. If
my visits give you pain, I will see you no more.
They do indeed, and
I am gone, then, Miriamsaid he, in a tone of
sadnessIf my presence, as I understand you, is
disagreeable, I will trouble you no more; for, however
deeply I may regret its loss, I would not seek your
society at such a price. Farewell!
Thouthou dost not understand me, Langley.
Thy visits are not disagreeable, but painful to me,
because they involve a breach of duty. O! were it
not for that, I shouldand here she checked herself
in some confusion.
What then? asked he, eagerly.
No matter what; it is of little consequence. Let
me say what I have to say. I am commissioned by my
father, at my earnest request, to say to thee, that having
been sheltered under the roof of thy father from danger
and deathhaving been his guest and shared his
generous
hospitality, he cannot bring himself to forbid your
seeing me in his own house. But he entreats thee,
for reasons of the deepest moment, reasons which can
never be overcome, and that become every day stronger,
thatthat thou wouldst spare him the painful
necessity
of forbidding thy visits, by voluntarily
discontinuing
them.
Why, what, in the name of heaven, have I done to
awaken such strong antipathy? But, no matter; his
wishes and yours shall be obeyed. In my father's
house all are welcome, and his son is too proud to
intrude where that is wanting. Farewell, Miss
Habingdon
;
though you drive me away, I will still watch
over you, and be your protector, should protection be
required.
Alas! Langley, say not
my
wishes, replied she,
sadly; for why, now that we shall meet no more
why should I not tell thee frankly, that but for that
unhappy feeling of dislike, I might almost call it
antipathy
,
between our fathers, it would have been a
pleasure
to me to see you here, or elsewhere. But it is
forbidden, and obedience is my duty.
MiriamMiriamdoes it indeed give you no pain
to think we shall meet no more?
It does, indeed. Why should I, who have all my
life considered it right to speak the truth, speak falsely
now? I shall be more lonely than ever. My feelings
and my thoughts will have no one to commune with,
and I shall prey upon myself. I shall be sorry so see
thee no more. But it must be so.
There was a touching, plaintive simplicity and
feeling
in this frank confession of innocent regard that
waked up all the latent enthusiasm of Langley's soul,
and caused him to pour it forth before her, without
control
Thanks, Miriamdearest Miriama thousand
thanks, of love and gratitude, for your gentle
kindness
.
Nay, hear me before I gohear me declare to
you that I love you better than any living beingthat
you are dearer to my heart than all in this world
besides, and that nothing on earth shall prevent your
being mine but your own heart and your own will.
You say you have always been accustomed to tell the
truth, and I believe you. Tell methe question
imports
much, and your answer moretell me, would
you, did no duty, no parental authority interfere
would you forbid my visits after what I have now said.
Think what you say, and answer frankly.
Miriam reflected a few minutes, as if to realize the
import of the question, and then firmly replied
4*
NoI would not!and now farewell, Langley.
I see my father coming, and your meeting would give
no pleasure to either. I shall tell him
all
that has
passed.
Do so, dear Miriam. Let us have no
concealments
.
Our only sure guide through this world, in
joy or sorrow, danger; or difficulty, is the honest truth,
let what may come. Farewell once moregive me
your hand. I shall watch over you at a distance,
that will be something to live upon.
Farewell, Langley; and the conceited youth
thought he actually felt a gentle pressure of her
fingers.
CHAPTER VII.
Another Example Set by Miriam, which Young Ladies may Follow
in a Similar Predicament, or not, just as They PleaseHarold
again Acting on PrincipleThe Cavalier Becomes Unreasonable,
and Refuses to Consider the Matter, lest He Should Come to a
Wrong DecisionIs Hugely Tickled with the Vision of an Angel,
Which Is Put to Flight by a WomanHow to Manage an
Unreasonable
HusbandThe Cavalier both Astonished and EnragedIndites
a Challenge, but Is Prevented from Sending It, by the Discretion
of Gregory Moth.
Immediately
on the return of her parents from their
walk, Miriam, with that calm self-possession ever the
result of a consciousness of well meaning, detailed to
them all the particulars of the interview with Langley.
The mother listened with somewhat painful anxiety,
the father with evident disapprobation. When the
daughter had concluded, he addressed her with stern
solemnity, as follows
Miriamyou know I always act on principleI
feared, nay, I foresaw this, and for that reason forbade
all intercourse with that profane young man, who
would doubtless lead thee to the path of destruction.
He is one of the followers of Belial, and were he to
become thy guide in this world would shipwreck thy
hopes of that which is to come. Tell meI know
thou wilt speak the truth, even on a subject where
maidens think it seemly to deceive even their parents
tell me, hast this young Philistine touched thy heart?
Come, do not blush and hang thy head. Remember,
I am thy father, and thy mother is a woman.
Miriam did indeed blush and hang her head, and
hesitated before she answered
Father, I know not what thou meanest by
touching
the heart; but if to think often, and sometimes
dream of himif to wish for his presence and regret
his absenceif to feel myself awakened to a new
existence, and to live and move in a world I never
dreamed of before, is to be touched at the heart, then,
I fear, I am indeed touch deeply.
Enoughenough, my daughter, said Susan;
thou remindest me of the days of my youth. I
recognize thy symptomssay no more.
Miriam, spoke Harold, after a silence of deep,
intense thought, listen to what I am about to say.
The young man hath disclosed his love to thee, and
thou hast sufficiently disclosed thine to thy parents.
Thy innocent heart is indeed deeply touched, as I well
can see. Providence, for some inscrutible purpose,
perhaps to try thee in the fire, hath baffled all my
precautions. As a father I have a right to forbid thee
to think more of that reprobate young man.
Reprobate! exclaimed Miriam, timidly. For
aught I have ever seen of him, he is good and
amiable
,
honest and true.
It may be so in the estimation of those who judge
a man by his acts rather than his faith, and substitute
the filthy rags of good works for the sublime mysteries
of the incomprehensible Creator. But whatever he
may be, he is not of thy faith, nor are his habits,
manners
,
and mode of thinking like ours. He belongs to
a church which hath persecuted thy father and thy
mother; to a party which hath forced them into exile
from their country, whose principles are in eternal
warfare with mine and thine, and to whose members
our habits and principles are subjects of ridicule, if
not abhorrence. To live in harmony with such a man
under one roof, and in all the intimate relations of
life, either thou must assimilate with him, or he with
thee. In the natural, not to say inevitable course of
things, the former would be the case; the weaker
vessel would yield, and thou wouldst become not only
a backslider from thy faith, but its deadly foe. All
that I have done and suffered in the hope of at last
enjoying the freedom of my immortal soul, and
transmitting
the like to my children to the latest posterity,
will thus be rendered vain. Thou wilt become an
apostate, and thy children will follow thy example.
He paused, deeply affected by the picture he had
drawn, and Miriam approached, took his hand, and
said
Believe it not, my father. The persecutions of
the living and the dead of my family; the blood thou
hast shed of others, and thine own, and the sacrifices
thou hast made, have caused thy faith to be too
precious
to me ever to offer it up on any worldly altar.
Speak thy commands. I will not say I am convinced
by thy arguments, but I will obey thy will.
Harold kissed her pale cheek affectionately, and
proceeded
I command nothingI will nothing; for I now
see that to do so is only to lift a feather against the
wind. While I thought it might avail, I strove to
prevent what has happened, as I too plainly see, by
forbidding all intercourse between you. But it is
done, and I will interfere no more. If Master Langley
Tyringham offers thee marriage, with the
approbation
of his father, I leave thee to thy own free will to
decide. Only remember this, Miriam; if by
indulging
the wishes of thine heart, thou shouldst break that
of thy father; and, if in vainly reaching after
happiness
in this world thou should forfeit that in the world
to come, the penalty will be the just meed of the
offence, for thou alone wilt be to blame. Thou wilt
have offered up thy soul a victim to thy heart.
Overcome by this appeal, Miriam cast herself on his
bosom, and sobbed out
Father, never while thou livest will I leave thee;
never while I live will I disobey thy commands, for I
know thou wilt never bid me do wrong. Be satisfied
all is over. He pressed her to his heart, and this
prompt obedience made him almost regret this harsh
exertion of his authority. Susan, who had remained
a silent witness of the scene, now drew her daughter
away, and by her womanly sympathy calmed her into
quiet resignation.
In the meantime the old Cavalier had received a
full and true account of the state of his heart, and his
position towards Miriam, from Langley, whose frank
and manly spirit scorned all concealment. He was
answered by a tremendous explosion of wrath, levelled
at Crop-ears, Roundheads, Rebels and Republicans,
not forgetting Oliver Cromwell and the Rump
Parliament
.
He denounced them all in a lump, for divers
grievous offences, such as making long prayers,
singing
psalms through their noses, and cutting their hair
in an unseemly fashion; swore they were no better
than Jews, because they ate cold dinners on Sunday,
and concluded, as was not unfrequently the case
when the froth had subsided into sediment, with
something
like a sensible observation, to wit: that
enthusiasm
might be respectable enough in its growing
state, because it was sincere; but that nothing was
more contemptible than enthusiasm in its decline,
since it was always replaced by hypocrisy.
Master Langley, as was his invariable custom when
the old gentleman indulged himself in an explosion,
listened in respectful silence. But when the storm
had a little subsided, he attempted to expostulate.
But consider, my dear sir
'Slife, sir, I won't consider. I never considered
but once in my life, and then I made a great blunder.
But I have no objection to hear what you have to say,
though I tell you beforehand it will be of no use.
Come, give us an eulogium on Crop-ears, and
particularly
young Crop-ear damsels.
Just at that moment Langley, instead of duteously
listening to his father, had conjured up right before
him the picture of a little Crop-ear damsel, whose
plain, yet touching face, graceful symmetry of form,
gently waving hair, and deep, lustrous eyes, presented
a most agreeable subject for contemplation. The
whole vision defied Puritanism, most especially the
hair, which obstinately curled, in despite of the
Platform. He could not help greeting it with a
smile, which, in classic phrase, raised the old
Cavalier's
dander pretty considerably.
What, cried he, you're laughing, are you? I can
tell you, though you stand there grinning, like a stone
fence, its no laughing matter, sir. If you don't
instantly
relinquish all claim, right, title, interest, reversion,
remainder, and all that sort of thing, to this little
Puritan
Roundhead, who rebelled against the King, put
down the bishops, brought one monarch to the block,
and exiled another,I say, sir, if you don't pronounce,
renounce, and denounce all intercourse in thought,
word, or deed, with this witch of Endor, you're no son
of minedammethat's allnow laugh at that,
sir.
My dear father, replied Langley, who was not
unaccustomed to these tornados, I assure you I was
not smiling at what you said. There was nothing in
it to provoke a smile.
No, I should think not. You'll find it a serious
business, I can tell you. But I insist on knowing
what you were laughing at, sir.
I only smiled, sir; I was not laughing.
Well, sir, that's only a different degree of
impertinence
.
What were you smiling at?
Why, sir, I had a delightful vision
Bless me! a visionthe fellow is half Crop-ear
already. I suppose he will begin to prophecy soon.
Well, what was it, a fiend or an angeleh?
An angel, sir. A little Crop-eared angel, about
the middle size, with a face as innocent as a dove;
teeth white as snow; lips red as a cherry; a neck like
a swan; a shape like Venus; hair, every thread of
which might form a chain for captive hearts, and eyes
in which you see reflected a bright heaven of love and
purity.
By Jupiter! exclaimed the old Cavalier, rubbing
his hands, I should like to see such a vision. It
must have been an angel.
What's that you are saying about angels, my
dear? said Mistress Tyringham, at that moment
coming
into the room, and putting to flight the angelic
vision. Now, whether this inopportune diversion in
favor of Langley grated harshly on his feelings, for
people don't like to be interrupted in giving lectures
or that the abrupt dispersion of the vision produced
that effect, we cannot say, but certain it is the
Cavalier
took it somewhat in dudgeon. Mistress
Tyringham
,
though a woman of ten thousand, was not
altogether
lovely. In fact she was rather a contrast to
Langley's angel.
What was I saying, my dearfor he was
particular
in always treating his wife with gentlemanly
courtesyexcept when he forgot itwhat was I
saying about angels! Why, I was telling this young
gentleman who has visions and dreams, that I would
see him hanged before he should marry the
Roundhead's
daughter.
La! my dear, I'm sure that was not much like
an angel. Why did you so earnestly wish to see one
just at such a time? I declare I begin to be quite
curious.
Why my dearbecausehang me if I know
exactly. Langley, can't you tell me? Langley
shook his head. Well, then, I believe it was because
I see them so seldom.
Well my dear, that's a sufficient reason to satisfy
a reasonable woman, and the good lady departed
perfectly
contented, for she liked to tease her husband a
little sometimes, after the manner of all discreet
wives.
Plague take the womannoHeaven bless the
dear, good old soulshe was only ten years younger
than her husband. Heaven bless her. But she has
thrown me completely out of the traces. Where was
I, Langley?
Why sir, according to the best of my recollection,
I think you were just about giving your full consent
and approbation to my marriage with the little
Crop-eared
angel I saw in my dream, and who took your
fancy so much.
Why, you impudent young scapegrace! But
enough of thisI am a man of few words. You
know my mind, and I once more repeat, that if you
marry that young Roundhead, you are no son of
mine.
My dear, asked Mistress Tyringham, putting her
head inside the doorMy dear, would you like to
have the chickens roasted or fried for dinner? But
what were you saying about Langley being no son of
yours! You ought to be ashamed, my dear, of
throwing
out such insinuations against an honest woman.
Pshaw! said the Cavalier testily.
Well, pshaw or no pshawI say you ought to be
ashamed of yourself. And, Langley, as you are, it
seems, relieved from all obligations of duty to your
respected father, I am clearly of opinion you may go
and marry Miriam Habingdon, as soon as you can gain
her consent. But, my dear, you have not decided
about the chickens.
'Slife, Jenny, what's got into you, to-day? What
do I carefry them, or broil them, or roast them, or
boil them, in the devil's name, for all me.
Well, my dear, I suppose that means plenty of
cayenne pepper. Gregory! Gregory Moth! Please
go and tell Black Rose to tell Phebe to tell Phillis to
put plenty of cayenne inside and out of the chickens.
Her master wants them a little devilled, as he feels
rather
chilly this cool morning. The thermometer was
at ninety. The excellent matron departed, laughing
in her sleeve, contented with having made her
husband
a little ashamed of himself, without resorting to
the
ultima ratio regum
of matrimonyarguing the
question, which in nine cases out of ten, produces
contention. The great secret for preserving domestic
harmony is to let all parties do as they like, and if
they are rational, good-tempered people, they will
naturally like to please each other. If they are not
so, there is no use in argument.
But to return to our story. This interruption of
good Mistress Tyringham again threw the Cavalier
completely off the track; but he soon found it again,
and repeated the sentence of disinheritance with
renewed vigor.
My dear father, said Langley, It is quite
unnecessary
,
I have just been dismissed by the young lady,
by command of her father, with strict injunctions not
to visit her again.
What, cried the astonished Cavalier, rejected
refusedcut adrift by a Roundheada Crop-ear
a rebel to his king, and a renegade from his mother
church! Why 'slife, what is the meaning of all this?
The son and heir of sixteen generations of Cavaliers,
rejected by the daughter of a Crop-ear, and turned out
of the house by a Roundhead! Here, Gregory, Gregory
saddle old Rowley instantly. Rejecteda son of
mine, only four degrees removed from a titleby
Jupiter Amnon, the whole generation of Crop-ears shall
answer for the insult. Langley, this makes matters
ten times worse, and if you have the spirit of a man,
you will implicity obey my command. You may go
I see Gregory coming with old Rowley.
Langley departed, just as Gregory entered, and as
usual, inquired what his master wanted. On being
informed of the gross insult offered to the house of
Tyringham, and that he was to be the bearer of a
defiance, as there was no gentleman in the
neighborhood
to perform that office. He demurred
exceedingly
,
for he had an insuperable antipathy to fighting,
or having anything to do with it. He insisted that the
occasion by no means called for such decisive action;
that the honor of the family rather required no notice
should be taken of this slight; and that being so
greatly opposed to the match, his master ought to be
rather highly pleased than mortified, at what would
place an insuperable obstacle in its way.
'Slife, Gregory, I say again for the hundredth time
at least, that you are the most astonishingly discreet
knave, for so great a fool, I ever met with. You talk
sometimes like Friar Bacon's head, and sometimes as
if you had no head at all.
Ah sir! when I take into serious consideration
that it is not the fashion for wise men to speak wisely
at all times, methinks it were a great pity that fools
should not enjoy the like privilege. Wise fools, sir, are
just as common as foolish wise men. The world is
divided between them.
Gregory Moth, I pronounce you one of the seven
championsI mean one of the seven wise men of
Greece, who like his sacred majesty, King Charles,
according to that villain Rochester, never said a
foolish
thing nor ever did a wise one. Truly, Moth, if
your valor were only proportioned to your wisdom, you
would be as great a wonderasaszounds! I was
never good at a comparison.
You mean, doubtless, sir, to say, that my valor is
as disproportioned to my discretion, as your discretion
is to your valor. Surely, never master and man were
so well fitted. You will defend me by the strength of
your arm, and I will enlighten you by the thickness
of my head. Thus shall we two be invincible.
Well, wellwe won't dispute that matter;
especially
as I can always get the better of you by the
argumentum ad baculinum
, as we say at Oxford. I
have, or to do justice, you have thought better on this
subject. It would be making the Roundhead of too
much consequence to call him out on such an occasion.
The honor of my family is safe from such a mushroom
of yesterday. The doughty Cavalier forgot that the
family of Habingdon could beat him hollow counting
centuries.
To be sure, sir, replied Gregory; especially as
you would have the trouble of horsewhipping him
afterwards; for he would not accept your defiance.
He won't fight; he has scruples of cowardice,
commonly
called conscientious scruples.
No, no, Gregory; to do him justice, he is no
coward
.
He is as brave as old Noll, and quite as ready
to meet danger as you are to run away from it.
I run away from danger, sir! Didn't I utterly
discomfit and put to flight the barbarians when your
house was sorely beleagured, and that with my single
arm? If you had not shut me up in the cellarI say
nothing, but the copper-colored caitiffs would not have
escaped scot-free as they did, to the immortal disgrace
of all Christendom.
This sally put the Cavalier in high good humor, and
he proceeded to consult Gregory on the subject of
Langley's attachment, which he communicated as a
great secret.
I knew it long ago, sir, said Gregory.
You! ahI knowyou are always wiser than
other people, especially in knowing things after they
have come to pass. How did you know it, pray?
Why, sir, he once threatened to crop my ears for
calling the young lady a Crop-ear; and I clearly
discerned
from this, and other infallible symptoms, that
my young master had been converted by the gospel
of eyes.
Well, what do you advise me to do?
Nothing, sir; when King Brute and his valiant
Trojans
Dn King Brute and his valiant Trojans;
what have they to do with this matter?
O, a great deal, sir. Had they not come to
England
,
the great university of Oxford, whose learning is
heaped up like sand, and is equally productive, would
probably have never existed, at least on that identical
spot,; and the church and the bishops might, for
aught I know, have given place to such cattle as
presbyters
and conventions instead of councils and
convocations
.
Think of that, sir.
Certainly, all this is highly interesting; but just
now I want your counsel on other matters. What do
you advise me to do with Langley?
Nothing, sir; let things alone. Love is like a
brush heap on fire; the more you stir it, the more
sparks and flames. Let it alone, and it will burn out of
itself. See you not, sir, that the fire always advances
against the wind?
Well, I believe I'll take your advice. But, harkee,
Gregory, if it turns out badly, I'll make an example
of you.
You can't have a better, sir, answered Gregory,
conceitedly; and the old Cavalier departed to dress for
dinner, a custom he always observed, being resolved,
he said, to be a gentleman one half the day, at all
events.
CHAPTER VIII.
A Little Truth, by Way of a TreatCauses and Consequences
Harold Transgresses the Law by Obeying the Gospel
Inconvenience
of being a Justice of the PeaceThe Justice Seeks Counsel
from a Wise Fool, like the Illustrious PanurgeHarold once more
before a MagistrateIs Fined and Adopts an Important Resolution
Soliloquy of the Justice, which Begins very sensibly, but Ends
in Nothing.
The
people of the colony of Virginia was at this period
both loyal and orthodox; for though they made very
little ceremony in opposing the shadow of the king in
the person of his puissant governor, they reverenced
the substance in the person of his master. It was, as
everybody knows, originally settled by Cavaliers,
roystering
younger sons, victims to the firstborn of Egypt,
who sought the New World to better their fortunes,
or it may be from pure love of adventure, and brought
with them the habits as well as principles of loyalty
to church and state. The former they retained for
several generations, but the latter soon became greatly
modified by the irresistible influence of the free air
they breathed, and the vast space occupied by the
individual
man, which instilled into him a deep
consciousness
of his own personal importance, as well as
almost boundless freedom of action. In order to make
men slaves they must be crowded together, and
elbowed
on every side, as is the case in Europe.
In the first institution of the colonial government of
Virginia, no other form of faith was tolerated but that
of the church of England, and penalties were
denounced
against all dissenters, similar to those at that
time inflicted by the law of England. All those who
absented themselves from the established worship on
Sunday were fined, unless they could give satisfactory
reasons for their absence; and various other severe
statutes were in force against dissenters, especially
Quakers and Anabaptists. It was an age of
intolerance,
and as all lived in glass houses at that time,
posterity should be careful how they cast the first stone.
During the civil wars, and especially under the
ascendancy of the latter period of the Long Parliament,
these penal laws were retaliated on the Church of
England, which received a sample of the treatment
she had accorded to others. On the restoration,
persecution
again returned to its old channel, and the
laws against dissenters were perhaps more rigidly
enforced in the colony in consequence of a conspiracy
of some of Oliver Cromwell's Old Ironsides, who sought
an asylum there, and came near to achieving a
revolution
.
The Quakers were especially obnoxious, not only to
the Established Church, but to the Puritans, and met
with no quarter from either. It was about this time,
that a few stragglers from this non-resisting sect
sought refuge from the persecutions of those whom
persecution had taught to persecute, among the people
of the South, they having no other refuge, as
Pennsylvania
was then a pathless wilderness. Without
meaning
to offer the slightest apology for religious
persecution
,
that indelible stain on the white surplice of
Christianityit may be remarked, that it is not
always the persecuted are innocent of all offence, save
a difference of opinion. Zeal and enthusiasm are
seldom
content with mere toleration and the passive
enjoyment of impunity. Instead of quietly hoarding
what they already possess, they not only seek to make
converts from other sects, but are prone to denounce
all creeds but their own, without mercy, and without
measure.
It will also, in most, perhaps all cases, be found that
innovations in religion necessarily involve innovations
in civil governments, by interfering with long
established
maxims of law, as well as long existing social
institutions. To these causes we may, beyond doubt,
trace much of the persecution for which religious
opinions were made the pretext, but which were in a
great measure owing to that connection between
church and state, which, wherever it has existed, has
converted the trumpet of Zion into a signal for discord
and bloodshed, and the gospel of peace into a bone of
contention for ambition and avarice.
There is perhaps another key to the persecutions of
the Quakers. By the early laws of New England and
Virginia, every able-bodied man was obliged to bear
arms in the public defence. This was indispensable to
the very existence of these colonies for a long time
after their establishment; and the Quakers by
refusing
to perform the highest duty of the citizenthat
of defending the Statenot only rendered themselves
liable to the penalties of the law, but set an example
which, had it been extensively followed, would have
rendered all the early colonies an easy prey to the
savages. That a sect which obstinately refused to
contribute to the defence of a community in whose
safety they participated, and in whose advantages they
determined to partake, should have been unwelcome
visitors, ought not to be matter of surprise, nor can it
be justly charged against those who were perpetually
risking their lives for the protection of those who
refused to protect themselves or others. Undoubtedly
bigotry had something to do in the business, and dropt
her venom into the cup of bitterness. But there were
faults on both sides, and the best lesson to be derived
from the history of those times is that of universal
forbearance.
Some two or three of these wandering exiles had
found their way to Virginia, which was yet smarting
under the tomahawk and scalping knife, and to whose
surviving colonists their tenets could not fail of being
peculiarly obnoxious, as impairing the great obligation
of self-defence. They were completely under the
dominion of enthusiasm, or more properly, fanaticism
for persecution, if it does not find, always makes
fanatics, and very soon attracted the attention of the
civil authorities by attempting to make converts, as
well as by disturbing the service of the Established
Church. Sentence of banishment was passed on them;
but they refused to depart voluntarily and resisted
force. They became, in short, a species of outcasts,
wandering about without a home, and often without a
refuge. It happened that one of these forlorn fugitives
arrived at the dwelling of Harold Habingdon in a most
destitute condition, half crazed with fatigue, hunger,
and fanaticism. He was received with kindness, as a
fellow-creature in distress, though Harold bitterly
abhorred his tenets, and remained some days before he
recovered sufficiently to resume his erratic career.
Some one of those petty officials, the pestilenal
product
of penal laws, and every other species of misrule,
who always outstrip their betters, in zeal for a bad
causebecoming acquainted with this affair, laid an
information before the old Cavalier, against Harold,
for harboring, comforting, and relieving a sinner
against the statute in such case made and provided.
Master Justice Tyringham was excessively annoyed
at this proceeding. As a magistrate, it was his duty
to enforce the laws; but though he utterly eschewed
the Roundhead, and would have fought him with all
his heart, still, as a neighbor he could not reconcile it
to his feelings to proceed against him. They had, it is
true, crossed their swords in the civil wars; but they
had since stood side by side under his own roof,
mutually
defending each other.
Confound the Crop-ear, muttered he to himself
what right has he to place me in this predicament?
I must either violate my oath as a magistrate, or my
conscience by doing an ill-office to my neighbor, who,
though a rebel and a Roundhead, is a brave man and
a good soldier, I will say that for him; though how
a fellow that neither drinks nor swears can be either
one or the other is beyond my comprehension. At
the end of this monologue, he called in the aid of
Master Gregory, who acted as his clerk on all official
occasions, and handing him the information, asked
what shall I do in this confounded business,
Moth?
Why sir, answered Gregory, after due
consideration
If
I were youthat is to say, if you were me
you would first give notice to Master Habingdon,
that he might get out of the way, and then issue a
warrant to apprehend him.
He get out of the way? He'd see me hanged
first. He won't stir a peg. Your genuine Crop-ear
can no more live without a dose of wholesome
persecution
now and then than a fowl without gravel. It
keeps up his bristles, and makes his orthodoxy as stiff
as a poker. No, nothat won't do, Gregory. If
there was another New World he might seek refuge
there; but, take my word, he won't budge an inch.
That being the case, sir, if I were in your place
I mean, if you were in my place, you would do a
good action for once in your life.
Why, you insolent varlet, do you dare to insinuate
that I never did a good action?
You misunderstand me altogether, Justice
Tyringham
.
Do not you comprehend that I am speaking as it
were of myself, seeing I have taken the liberty of
putting
my own proper person in place of your own proper
personergo, logically speaking, it is I that never did
a good act, not you, my most honored master.
Well, wellgo on in your own way.
As I was sayingor rather, to speak more
accurately
,
as I was about to sayI would respectfully
recommend that you perpetrate, as it were, a good
deed, by flying in the face of the law, and acting
according to the gospel, by doing unto your neighbor
as you would be done by. It is not seemly in one of
your station to pay attention to a rascally informer,
who I hereby strenuously advise you to fine and
imprison
in place of Master Habingdon, who, though I
hate as a Roundhead, I somehow or other respect,
against my conscience.
It won't doI tell you it won't do, Gregory. This
good act, as you call it, will lead to the loss of mine
office; and what is far worse, the disgrace of my
person
and character. 'Slife, sir, I should go near to be
taken for a Roundhead, or a Quaker, which last I most
especially abhor, because they will not fight either in
a good cause or a bad one.
Well, Master Justice, that is the very thing. A
good act that costs a man nothing is worth just what
it costs. It is like unto a beggar's dinner for which
he pays no reckoning, and is no better than scraps and
bones. Besides, sir, admitting that this one neighborly
act should be attended by evil consequences to
yourself
,
you have only to perform ninety-nine more, and I
will venture to predict, that one out of the hundred
will repay you for all the rest.
By Saint Gregory the Great, your remarks are
theoretically right, but, what is very provoking,
practically
wrong. My oath of office, Gregory Mothmy
public duties as a magistrate, and all that sort of
thingdon't you see I am acting double, as it were,
and am pulled two different ways between a choice of
evils? But it don't signify talking, I must have the
Crop-ear up, and fine him according to the statute.
If he won't pay, as I take for granted will be the case,
for he is as obstinate as a mule, and always acts on
principle, why he may go to the devil, that's all; for
you know there is no jail nearer than the capital,
and I shall get rid of this confounded business. Make
out the warrant, and I'll dub you a constable to
execute
it; so that eternal busybody, who has given me
all this trouble, will be despoiled of his fees.
Gregory obeyed orders; the warrant was signed, and
the old Cavalier dubbed him a constable by laying his
cane across his shoulders. Proceeding on his mission,
and finding the culprit at home, he performed his duty
agreeably to the instructions of his master, in the most
approved as well as courteous style, informing him that
Master Justice Tyringham was unwillingly enforcing
the law, as a magistrate.
This proceeding caused great consternation in the
minds of the Roundhead's wife and daughter, the
former
of whom still preserved a vivid recollection of the
persecutions of her parents, and her own sufferings in
the days of her youth. She was struck with grief and
dismay at what she believed a renewal of them in the
New World, whither they had fled to avoid them.
She pictured to herself the long catalogue of
imprisonments
,
scoffs, stripes, and maimings which had marked
the footsteps of the demon of spiritual pride; and,
ignorant of the colonial law, as well as the somewhat
milder spirit with which it was administered, looked
forward to seeing Harold return marked with
ignominious
stripes, or possibly without his ears. Poor
Miriam, too, bowed under the infliction, which weighed
the more heavily as coming from the father of one
who, she felt, was every day becoming more dear to
her heart and her imagination. She was now
compelled
to associate him with the persecutors of her
father, and her fair yet gentle spirit rose in
unsuccessful
revolt against the feelings of her heart. As Harold
was preparing to obey the summons, both wife and
daughter hung about his neck, beseeching for
permission
to accompany him and share his fate. But he
resolutely declined, while he comforted them, saying
Be not cast down, my beloved. I am not afraid,
though I little thought that persecution would track
me, like a bloodhound, into the forests of the New
World. But be of good comfort; if I understand the
law, the utmost that can be inflicted is a fine, and, in
default of payment, a prison. Is it not so, Master
Moth?
5*
Gregory signified assent, and Harold, mounting his
steed, accompanied him to the seat of justice. The
old Cavalier, who saw them coming, felt more like a
criminal than a magistrate; but, by a great rally,
mustered sufficient dignity to receive him with the
stiff solemnity of a citizen in office. He began by
apologizing, which was cut short by Harold, who
interrupted him, saying
There is no necessity, Master Tyringham, for
apology. You are a magistrate, and must do your
duty. The law is the tyrant, not those who enforce
it.
Hush, answered the Cavalier, remember that
respect is due to the laws, which should be reverenced
as well as obeyed.
I know no difference, sir, between the oppressions
of the law and the tyranny of a single despotic will
But enough on this point. May I ask of what offence
I am accused?
That of aiding, comforting, and consorting with
one who has been banished from the colony for flying
in the face of the law and the gospel. Here is the
witness.
My offence requires no witness. I acknowledge
it, without scruple and without compunction. There
came a wretched man to my door, weak, hungry, and
almost naked. I did not ask him his creed, nor did I
inquire whence he came, or whither he was going.
I saw he was a man, and that he wanted succor,
for his face was pale and thin, and his limbs trembled
as he stood leaning on his staff. I received him into
my house, for he was an outcast from all others, and I
and mine administered to his necessities till he recovered
and went his way. I saw that his faith was neither
mine nor thine, but it seemed to me that was no
reason why he should perish, like a beast of the field,
in the midst of Christian men and fellow-creatures.
I have suffered persecution, and God forbid I should
ever inflict it on others.
He spoke this in the sincerity of his soul, forgetting
that, for some time past, he had been unconsciously
acting on the same principle which dictated the law
under which he was now smarting, and inflicting on
two amiable beings far more severe penalties, solely on
account of a difference of opinion. But all mankind
are liable to these delusions, and in truth are seldom
self-satisfied but when they deceive themselves.
The sturdy old Cavalier winced not a little at the
view of the subject presented by Harold, and was
perfectly
conscious that, in a like case, he himself would
have done the same. He could not help
acknowledging
it was a hard case that a man should be punished
for an act of humanity. But, at the same time, there
was something in Harold's manner and appearance
which so forcibly reminded him of the preaching
rascals, as he called them, who had beaten him and
his brother Cavaliers so soundly at Marston Moor and
Naseby, that his newly awakened feelings yielded to
his ancient inveterate prejudices, and he relapsed into
the stern, inflexible magistrate, who forgets the spirit
of the law in acting up to the letter.
Master Harold Habingdon, said he, it is not for
you or I to sit in judgment on the laws of the land,
but to obey them. It is true we are commanded by
the Gospel to love our neighbor as ourself; but if the
law says the contrary, why there is no more to be said.
You have subjected yourself to fine, as well as
imprisonment
,
in default of payment. But as the jail has been
burnt by the savages the law must remit that penalty.
I shall, therefore, inflict the fine, as is my duty; but
whether you pay it or not is none of my business, nor
shall I trouble myself on the subject. You are free,
sir.
Harold, however, insisted on paying the fine, and the
justice and culprit separated with most ceremonious
politeness, though the dislike of the former was
materially
increased by having been thus forced to act
against his better feelings by the innocent agency of
the latter; and Harold felt most keenly the conviction,
that persecution and bigotry were citizens of the
world, at home everywhere. On his way home, and
after his return, he silently brooded awhile in the
recesses of his mind, and having apparently come to a
decision, called his wife and daughter, to whom he
announced his determination to depart from the colony
of Virginia, and seek refuge in New England. Susan
received the announcement in silent acquiescence;
Miriam started and turned pale, but said not a word.
Harold, always prompt in action, proceeded, without
delay, in carrying his project into execution.
At this period, the intercourse between Virginia and
New-England was altogether by sea, a great portion
of the intervening country being, as previously stated,
a howling wilderness. But intercourse of any kind
was extremely rare; and though at long intervals a
coasting vessel from Boston or Salem would find her
way into the Chesapeake, on a voyage of speculation,
yet this produced nothing like friendly or social
intercourse
.
The old leaven of the mother country still
fermented in the bosoms of the emigrants to the New
World, and to this day is not altogether extinct. On
inquiry, however, Harold had the good fortune to find
at the capital a schooner of moderate size, bound for
New England, and lost no time in making his
arrangements
.
A man who is ready to take what he can get
soon finds a purchaser; and he managed to arrange
not only his domestic but money matters so speedily,
that he was ready to embark before the schooner was
ready to sail.
Now, when the old Cavalier heard of the intention
of his old neighbor, and saw his prompt preparations
to carry it into effect, his heart smote him with the
recollection of his enmity, and especially his late
magisterial exercise of power. He felt a conviction
that this latter was the immediate cause of this
second exile, and fell into a train of reflection, which
may be embodied in the following words:
'Slife! I wonder what is the reason people who
call themselves Christians can't live together in peace
and quiet like Christians, instead of squabbling,
fighting
,
backbiting, and spitting at each other, like so
so many crabs in a basket? Here now, are Master
Habingdon and I, thrown by the vicissitudes of life
into a new world, of which we may almost be said to
be the sole Christian inhabitants; and yet we can't live
together as friends and brothers, and why? He is a
brave, upright man, and has never done a mean act
since he came here, and I'slife, I'll say that for
myself
am
neither a coward, a hypocrite or a rogue, for
I never turned my back on friend or foe, except at
Marston Moor and Naseby. I did scamper there like a
rabbit, that's certain. Yes, the bloody Crop-ears, with
their infernal long prayers, and psalm singing,
scattered us like chaff before the wind, and may I
never eat venison again, if I forgive them. A
Roundhead
,
is a Roundhead, old world or new, and there's
an end of it. Let him go to New England, or New
Guinea and welcomejoy go with himI'm glad he
is going.
So the two neighbors who had lived several years in
sight of the smoke of each other's chimneys, parted
without bidding farewell, though the chances were a
hundred to one they would never meet again.
CHAPTER IX.
Unaccountably Perverse Conduct of MiriamA Message by Gregory
Moth, who Makes MischiefAn Evening in the South, which
actually Ushers in an Apology for a Love Scene, which will, It Is
feared, not altogether Satisfy the Reader, for Want of Sufficient
High SeasoningA Last Parting.
When
Miriam left the room, after hearing the
resolution
of her father, to bid an eternal farewell to the
banks of the Powhatan, the first, perhaps the only
thought that occupied her mind was, that she should
never see Langley Tyringham again, and the cold
thrill that shivered through her heart taught her, for
the first time, how precious was the certainty of being
near, though she might not see him. There was
something in the idea of proximity, exquisitely
soothing
,
just as the soft luminaries of the heavens,
twinkling
with reflected lustre, administer a sweet delight
to the contemplative spirit, though for ever beyond its
reach. We know they are there; we realize their
presence
;
they exist to us, though all intercourse is
forbidden
.
She was resigned to the thought of their
never coming together, so long as it was possible for
them to meet; but when an insurmountable barrier
was placed between them, and all hope of its ever
being removed was over, she felt a saddening gloom,
such as had never come over her spirits before. It
was no longer a sacrifice to filial duty, or an offering
on the altar of faith, but an irresistible destiny which
took away all the merit of voluntary submission.
Where is he? thought Miriam. Will he not
come and bid me farewell! But I have forbid his
coming, and he promised to obey. Yet now that I am
going away, to be forever separated by stormy seas, and
impassable wilds, if he disobeyed me, I think I could
forgive him. I should like to see him once more, if
only to tell him to forget that he ever loved me, and
that I will never forget him. Surely he cannot know
that we depart so soonfor I feel if I were him, I
could not rest without a last farewell.
These, and such reflections, were perpetually
interrupted
by the necessity of exertion in preparations for
their departure. Yet they only returned with renewed
strength, from their temporary suppression. The
nearer the period of departure approached, the stronger
became her anxiety to see Langley once more, as well
as her conviction that she might do so without
violating
the spirit of her promise to her father. But she
was not of a nature to rest in doubt on any point of
filial duty, and one day frankly, though covered with
blushes, asked permission of Harold, to send for
Langley.
Miriam, said hewouldst thou wed this
young man? Tell me truly, and without maidenly
hypocrisy.
No fatherat least not against thy will.
Then why wish to see him again?
I scarcely know. But if he were only a common
acquaintance, living as we have so long near
neighbors
,
and having been sheltered from death under his
father's roof, to go thus without taking leave would
increase the pain of parting. Why then, since we are
still near to each other, should we part without bidding
farewell?
Because, my daughter, it will only make your
parting more painful.
No so, my fatherat least not to me; and I trust
not to him. I wish very much to say a few parting
words to Langley.
To tell him to remember you, Miriam?
Noto tell him to forget me. To tell him, as I
would without being ashamed, that though if no
insuperable obstacle interposed, I would gladly be to
him what my mother is to you, yet as that is
impossible
,
when we are far away from each other, he must
think of me no more.
My dear daughter, said Harold, kindlyfor his
principles were prone to yield to his feelingsyou
overrate your firmness, I fear. The sight of this youth
for the last time will soften you to yielding
acquiescence
,
and he will extort from you pledges you can
never fulfil without disobedience to your father, and
belying your faith to heaven.
Is there, then, more than one God, and do not he
and I both believe in him? Is there more than one
Saviour, and is not he equally so to both of us? But
of this no more. I owe my father obedience, and the
debt shall be paid. I am but a simple girl, but I so
far know myself as that I feel I can sacrifice my own
dearest wishes to my father and to my faith. I beseech
thee, father, to let me see him once more. Mother,
wilt thou not entreat for me?
Susan had been present during this dialogue, but
did not interfere, for she knew it would be ill taken
on the part of Harold, whose system of domestic
government
by no means approximated towards
republicanism
.
She, however, answered this appeal, by
saying to her husband
When we parted at the gate of the prison, in days
long passed, I would have given much to exchange a
few words with thee; and it added sorely to my
sorrow
at parting, that we could only take a silent
farewell
.
This reference to former times awakened a long
train of recollections in the mind of Harold, which
softened his heart and relaxed his will. He at length
granted the prayer of his daughter, and a message was
sent to request the presence of Langley Tyringham.
The servant returned with the intelligence that he had
been absent for some time past at the capital on
special
business, and that the period of his return was
quite uncertain. He received this information from
Master Gregory, who being, as the reader knows, a
most inveterate joker in his way, concluded in the
following
words
They say he has gone on my master's business,
but I reckon I know better. There is a young lady in
the case, and I smell a wedding before long. But its
a great secret, and you must promise not to tell a
living soul.
Gregory well knew the state of his young master's
affections, but his infirmity of jesting was aided on
this occasion by a long-cherished antipathy to the
Crop-ears, and he felt great satisfaction in throwing
a random arrow that struck deep where it fell. The
bearer of the message kept his promise so far, that he
only told the secret to Mildred, and the rest may easily
be imagined.
Miriam received the first item of this news in silent
sorrow, but the latter portion caused her to turn deadly
pale. He requires no consolation from me, she
thought, but gave her thoughts no tongue. The
succeeding
morning was destined for their departure.
During the day she seemed a different being from what
she had ever been before. Her habit was always that
of repose and self-possession; but now she scarcely
remained still for a moment. She wandered about the
house, apparently without object; but it might have
been noticed, that her steps always rested awhile at
an open window, that looked toward the abode of
Master Tyringham. Towards sunset, she told her
father she wished to take a last walk on the banks of
the river. He proposed to accompany her, but she
said she preferred going alone, and he acquiesced in
her wishes.
It was a scene to make one melancholy in bidding
it a last farewell. The sun had just slipt behind the
distant hills that rose in waving outlines above the
level borders of the river, and left a flood of glory
behind him in the evening sky. A range of airy and
fantastic clouds sleeping quietly in the lap of Heaven
skirted the horizon, never moving, but perpetually
varying in shape and color, and exhibiting, in their
changes, all the colors of the rainbow. The river slept
in a dead calm. Not a single tiny wave broke on the
white pebbled shore, and not an object moved on its
surface but a little skiff, paddled by two negroes, who
kept time to the homely, yet pathetic old ditty, which
has for its burden Long time ago. In the silence
and distance its simple pathos was exquisitely
touching
;
and the plagiarist mock-bird, after stilling his
song and listening a while, vainly attempted to catch
its plaintive melody. It was one of those scenes which,
though they awaken no joyous feelings, are dear to
the senses, the imagination, and the memory. When
not overwhelmed with sorrow, or smarting under the
lash of remorse, they seldom fail to inspire a pleasing
and luxurious melancholy, divested of all painful
recollections of the past, all gloomy anticipations of
the future. We confess our delight in lingering about
such scenes as this we have just sketched, and that we
would fain inspire our readers with a taste which can
at all times be so easily gratified. It is a cheap, as
well as blameless luxury; it costs no sacrifice, and is
followed by no regrets; it is one of those pleasures for
which we pay nothing, in the past, the present, or the
future; and in a world where every good we enjoy
seems to be so dearly purchased, it is a great privilege
to banquet at the feast without paying the reckoning.
It is, moreover, a pleasure at all times, and everywhere
within reach; and, while it appeals to the senses, is,
at the same time, a step in Jacob's ladder, leading
from earth to Heaven, since there is an inseparable
link between the great Architect of the Universe and
His glorious works.
Miriam wandered on, too full of that within to notice
that without; or, if it called her attention for a
moment, it was only accompanied by the painful
conviction
she should behold it no more. There is
something
in this that makes parting even with what we
little value more or less painful. To part for ever in
this world, brings with it the certainty that we shall
die before we meet again. It is a foreshadowing of
death, which, though the common lot of all the living,
is still a grisly spectre, clothed if not in terror, at least
in dread uncertainty. We will not insult our reader
by telling what Miriam was thinking about, as she
paced along. If heand more especially shecannot
divine it, let her remain in endless ignorance, and
never know what it is to be crossed in love. As she
proceeded thus unconsciously, she all at once
distinguished
footsteps behind her rapidly approaching, but,
supposing them those of some one of the slaves in the
neighborhood, felt neither alarm nor curiosity. There
was but one being she wished to see, and he was
absent. Presently the footsteps were close at her
side, and she heard a well-known voice of panting
earnestness close to her ear.
Forgive me, Miriam, for once more intruding on
you. But I have just returned, after a long absence
at least long to meand heard that you were going
away to-morrow to a distant land, where I shall never
see you again. You will forgive me for breaking my
word.
I have nothing to forgive, answered she, in a low
voice, nor is your presence an intrusion. I was
thinking of youI wished to see you.
Me!me, Miriam, after forbidding my presence so
peremptorily, almost sternly.
Langley, at that time I could not see you without
a breach of dutywithout disobeying my father. I
have now his permission to see you.
Is it possible, Miriam? What am I to understand
from this?
That we meet for the last time. Nay, do not
interrupt me, for our time is short, and I have much
to say. Once, and but once, thou saidst I was dear to
thee, and I believed it. But it is past now. I have
just heard, with satisfactionand the tear started
from her eyethatthat thou hast found one still
dearer than I ever was, or ever wish to be.
I, Miriam? Who told you so?
A little bird, said Miriam, with a melancholy
smile.
There is no truth in little birds, now that the
reign of the fairies is past. I have not foundI shall
never find one dearer to my heart than you. My
absence was an indispensable business for my father,
and I have just returned to hear you are going away
to-morrow. But you say you have permission from
your father to see me. Has he relented?
Alas! no. It was through my persuasion, and
that of my mother, that he consented to a parting
interview. He will never relent, for he believes
himself
right, and nothing can move him. This is our
last meeting, Langley.
Then, would to Heaven we had never met.
Say not so, Langley. To me, at least, it will be
a source of melancholy pleasure to think of thee, and
to know that we parted as friends. That here, as on
the brink of the grave, with a gulf like that which
separates time and eternity between us, we shook
hands across the abyss, and bade farewell, not to
forget
,
but to remember each other.
You, at least, will soon cease to remember me,
Miriam?
No; I am not one of those whose feelings are
suddenly awakened, and as suddenly subside, nor do I
forget what I cease to see. I know that thou wilt live
in my memory till I am dead. Though I may mourn
our separation, I can yet live upon my thoughts.
Thoughts, interrupted Langley, impatiently,
thoughts are shadows.
With me it is not so, Langley. My recollections
of the past shall take place of my anticipations of the
future. I may cease to hope, but I will not despair.
I will still think thou rememberest, long after thou
hast forgotten me, and this will be my consolation,
that I shall never know it. My ignorance will be my
happiness.
There was a sad simplicity, a deep, yet sober,
heartfelt seriousness in the look, tone, and manner of
the little Puritan, as she thus gave utterance to the
feelings of her pure heart that struck on that of
Langley
,
entered deeply, and choked, for a moment, the
utterance of his feelings, while she remained in that
outward calm that far more than fiery words, or
violent gestures, bespeaks the depth of the noiseless
current.
Ah! Miriam, at length he said, If I could but
feel as you doif I could wrap myself up in cold
submission
to the will of another, I should bear your
absence more patiently. But why should we part?
In family, in fortune, and in years we are suited to
each other. We have been thrown together almost
alone by ourselves in the wilderness, and our hearts
have become as one. Why then should we part?
My father wills it, and his will is mine. He may
be severe, he may be unjust in his commands, but
where is my warrant that I am right and he is wrong?
He is my father; he has reared me from infancy, and
I am still dependent on him for every comfort I enjoy.
It is, therefore, my duty to obey him, unless in so
doing I violate a higher duty.
A shade passed over Langley's brow. He did not
relish this view of the subject, and his old prejudice
against the Crop-ears roused up and began to growl.
But it was only for a moment, and it lay down and
and slept again.
Then you are content, Miriam, to give me up, and
if your father commands, give yourself to another.
No, replied she, firmly, while my heart belongs
to thee, Langley, it would not only be a gross
deception
,
but the breach of a holy vow, to promise
obedience
and love to another. My father has no right to
command that, and if he did, I neither could nor
would obey him. My duty goes no farther than not
to choose against his will. He cannot choose for me.
He cannot give away what I have already bestowed
on another.
MiriamMiriamyou reason onlyyou do not
love.
Thou wrongest me, Langley. I shall love thee
long after thou hast ceased to love me. We are going
at least such is my father's intentioninto a lonely
region of a distant country, where I shall have few
companions but my own thoughts, and little to divert
them from the past. There will be nothing but
silence and nature around me, and my associates will
be the creations of my fancy, or my memory. Ah!
if, as thou sayest, I reason coolly, it is not because I
VOL. II. 6
do not feel, but that true and lasting love is as much
the offspring of reason as of passion. You accuse us
Puritans of canting, but the worst cant is that which
excuses the crimes and excesses of love, by placing it
above the restraints of reason and virtue.
Did you wish then to see me once more, only that
you might lecture me into forgetting you? said
Langley, in dissatisfaction.
No, Langley. I wished to reconcile thee to our
parting. As little do I wish thee to forget me as I
wish to forget thee. Why cannot we continue to love
each other as well absent as present? Why cannot
we be contented with thinking of each other?
Thinking! it is only bread and water to the
starving heart. But I will urge you no more. I
love you too well to tempt you to disobedience, and
involve myself in the same offence. Nay, I know you
too well to believe I could be successful in attempting
it. I know, too, that you could never be happy, or
bestow happiness on me, by deserting your parents,
and inflicting on your own heart the sting of
ingratitude
.
I know that we must part, but I own I could
wish to see thee a little less resigned. Oh! only seem
to be miserable like me, and I will try to be content.
Langleydear Langley, have done with these
useless complaints. Do not think me devoid of
feeling
,
because both habit and example have taught me
restraint. Ah! if thou couldst see into my heart!
and thou shalt see it! exclaimed she, with a sudden
burst of feeling. Thou shalt know all my heart.
Why should I conceal a thought or feeling from thee,
when we are about to part forever? It is but trusting
the grave with our secretsit is but whispering in the
ear of death, for soon we shall be dead to each other.
To-morrow we shall be as shadows, every hour
becoming
more dim, and at length fading into nothing but a
phantom of memory. Oh! Langley, if thou knewest
how dear thou art to me! The first and last fruits of
my heart are yours, for I never loved before but with
filial affection. To be thine would fill the measure of
my happinessbut it cannot bethere is a gulf
between us that we must never pass. But I
consecrate
myself to thee while I live, and I give thee this
first and last kiss in token that my lips shall never
again be pressed by those of any man but my father.
Saying this, she clasped him around the neck, and
pressed her lips to his and wept on his bosom. He
murmured vows of lasting love; he pressed her to his
heart, and paid back the kiss with ample interest.
Recovering a portion of her wonted self-command, she
cut short his protestations.
Nay, dearest Langley, no vows, no oaths. Thou
art, thou must be free. I am but a woman, and can,
I trust, fulfil my humble duties in the little circle of
domestic life, while I continue to cherish thy memory
and devote myself to thee. But thou art a man, and
shouldst devote thyself to thy fellow men. Thy father
and thy mother, thy friends and thy country demand
thy cares and exertions. Thou art called upon to
perform all the duties of a man, which thou canst not
do while devoted to one object alone. All I ask of
thee is to remember me sometimes on an evening like
this, when taking a lonely walk along the path we
are now treading for the last time. I will be with
thee then.
Langley could not answer for his emotions, we
might say his temptations. He longed to tempt her,
by all the arts love teaches his votaries, to sacrifice all
to love; to forget herself, her duties, and her home.
But he was a man of principle, as well as feeling, and
at length, by a great effort conquered the enemy. He
felt it would be the most dastardly cruelty to attempt
to persuade her to a step which would at the same
time deprive her of one home without his being able to
offer her another. He knew the bitter religious and
political feelings of his father would exile them from
his home and his heart, and determined to submit to
his fate like a man. His reflections were interrupted
by Miriam, who said, in a low, tremulous voice
Now it is time to go home. It is growing dark,
and I must return.
Langley made no opposition, for he was quite broken
down. His reason yielded, but his heart rebelled; and
his mind was benumbed by conflicting emotions. They
proceeded in silence and gathering darkness, until they
arrived at the rustic gate opening into the lawn, when
Miriam softly said
Wilt thou not go in and bid my father farewell!
NoI am no favorite, and my presence will
scarcely be welcome. Tell him, if you will, that I
wish him all the happiness of which he has deprived
me.
They paused awhile, as if each had something to
say to the other. At length he whisperedI must
repay you the debt I owe, and taking her to his arms
impressed a long, lingering kiss on her cold lips. Only
one word was spokena mutual farewell. Miriam
broke from his arms, proceeded rapidly towards home,
and passing her father, merely saidI will tell thee
all to-morrow,ran to her chamber, and appeared no
more that night. Langley did not return home till
late in the night, having spent hours in wandering
along the river side, recalling the sweet yet bitter
banquet
of the preceding hour.
CHAPTER X.
A Deserted MansionCaptain SkeeringAn Extraordinary Voyage
without Tempest or ShipwreckArrival at NaumkeagState of
Affairs thereMildred Suspected of WitchcraftA Pilgrimage
through the WildernessScene on a RiverExcommunication of
the Demon of Water PowerEnd of the Pilgrimage.
Next
morning betimes the house of Harold Habingdon
was deserted, the doors and windows closed, and no
smoke curled from the chimney, as Langley looked
that way, and saw its inmates departing to return no
more. Then he turned away in all the apathy of chill
despair. The little party proceeded to the capital,
where, the vessel being ready, they speedily embarked,
and Harold was once more on the seas, seeking a
second
asylum in the solitudes of the New World. The
course of our story leads us to accompany him on his
voyage.
The vessel which carried Harold and his fortunes
was in all respects so unlike a Liverpool or Havre
packet of the present day, when far greater pains are
taken to make people more comfortable abroad than at
home, that to compare would only be to contrast them
with each other. She was sorely laden with a
miscellaneous
cargo of such inconceivable articles, that
though the insertion would save us at least a dozen
pages of wear and tear of thought or invention, we are
compelled to give it up in despair. It was a veritable
cargo of notions, and the bill of lading almost as
capacious
as Captain Skeering's flying jib. The cabin, the
lockers, and the rat holes, were all stowed choke full;
and Harold, on insinuating himself into his birth,
found his pillow stuffed with tobacco stems, which
every body knows are an excellent commodity for
snuff making. Now Captain Skeering well knew,
that though the good people of Naumkeag abhorred
smoking, yet did many of them quiet their consciences
by snuff taking.
Touching Captain Abiel Skeering, he was one of
those strange, unaccountable, nondescripts, that never
were, and never will be found anywhere, but in his
own country. He cultivated a little farm, cobbled
shoes in winter, and at intervals caught codfish, either
along shore, or on the coasts of Newfoundland and
Labrador. Between whiles he traded to the
Manhadoes
,
Virginia, and the West Indies, up Connecticut
River, and the Lord knows where. There was not a
hole or corner in which he did not poke his bowsprit
to smell out a bargain; and what is very remarkable,
he never went anywhere without finding one. He
once made a capital speculation by being cast away
on Cape Cod, not by defrauding the underwriters, but
by exchanging rusty nails for wampum. In short, he
was one of those wise men who never fail to convert a
misfortune into a benefit. He was unquestionably an
expert seaman, for he went where no one else ever
thought of going; and though he never saw, heard,
nor dreamed of a nautical almanac, managed to find
his way all the world over, by dint of a combination
of skill, luck, and sagacity. He was undoubtedly
amphibious, and for aught we know, his mother might
have been a mermaid, for his marine instincts seemed
equal to those of our Indians in the woods.
Though to use his own expression, he had followed
the sea ever since he was knee high to a grasshopper,
he never met with but one disaster, out of which, as
before stated, he made a capital speculation.
Captain
Skeering was, withal, an easy, quiet,
good-tempered
man, and reasonably honest; though when
it came to a bargain, it must be confessed, he
shaved rather close. Like all wise men, he preferred
asking questions to answering them. He, moreover,
smacked enormously of the Puritan, and he and
Harold got on exceedingly well together,
notwithstanding
the latter was sometimes a little put out,
by the captain putting in at rivers, creeks, bays,
and inlets, to see if there was anything stirring in
the way of a bargain, though to all appearance
there was scarcely room to stick a pin in his
vessel
.
He knew what people at ever so great a distance
wanted, quite as well, if not better, than they did
themselves; and if he could only be set going, you
might pump out of him more practical knowledge than
would set up an academy of science.
Under the auspicious destiny of this sagacious,
self-taught
mariner, the vessel proceeded on her way,
sometimes
becalmed on the wide watery waste, and at
others, somewhat rudely buffeted by the winds and
waves. Captain Skeering put in at the Manhadoes, or
New Amsterdam, then in its cradle, where he
astonished
the smoking burghers, by asking an infinite
number of questions, whereby he gathered sufficient
information to make a successful adventure to that
famous port, on his next voyage. From thence the
made a desperate push through the Helle-Gatte,
escaped the Pot, the Frying Pan, and the Hog's Back;
squinted at the little embryo settlement of New Haven;
passed into the mouth of the Connecticut river, traded
a day or two with the Indians of Montauk Point; had
a great notion of trying his luck in Narragansett Bay;
bartered a trifle at Nantucket and Martha's Vineyard,
and finally anchored triumphantly in Naumkeag Bay,
after a prosperous voyage of six weeks.
The Habingdons were received with a kind, brotherly
hospitality by the good people of the town, and Harold
at one time contemplated pitching his tent among
them. But it happened, unluckily, that certain pious,
well-meaning persons, who had been zealous advocates
for toleration in the mother country, had, by some
strange transition, become intolerant, and commenced
the old story of persecution, so often repeated in the
Christian world. The town was divided into parties,
and peace was no longer there.
Still, more than this, it was about this time that
6*
the extraordinary panic of witchcraft had found its
way, like the cholera, from the Old to the New World.
It was the characteristic superstition of the age, and
by no means peculiar to Naumkeag, though it is said
to have first broken out there in the colonies. Though
without any foundation in nature, science, philosophy,
or reason, this baleful superstition, which led to so
many atrocities wherever it existed, by degrees spread
throughout the little community, and was not only
cherished, but fomented by men of liberal education
and scientific attainments. A fast had been
proclaimed
by the clergy, with special reference to this
visitation, and this ill-advised measure in some degree
served to give the stamp of reality to the strange
absurdities and extravagances which now only excite
ridicule among the enlightened, and wonder among
the ignorant.
But however one age may plume itself on its
freedom
from superstitious delusions or impostures, there
never has occurred, and probably never will occur, a
period in which mankind has been, or will be, free
from the delusions of their own imagination, or the
designing impostures of others. Every age has its
peculiar follies; and philosophers and philanthropists,
who set about curing them, for the most part fare like
physicians who, in driving out one disease,
peradventure
lay the foundation of half-a-dozen others.
Credulity
is a monster of capacious maw, and, like the
fabled ogre, delights in human flesh. If the miracles
of mesmerism, which come abroad under the mantle
of science, are true, necromancy is no longer a fable;
if they are impostures, as doubtless most of them are,
then had we best be silent on the delirium of
witchcraft
.
Be this as it may, the community of Naumkeag was,
at this time, beginning to feel the throes of that ideal
convulsion which, after exhibiting certain premonitory
symptoms, gradually seemed to die away, only to be
felt with renewed violence a few years afterwards. It
was, as before stated, the prevailing epidemic of the
age; it raged in England as well as on the continent
of Europe; and an old writer records that, on
returning
from Canada to his native province of Bearn, after
an absence of some years, he found three-fourths of
the inhabitants believing or affecting to believe
themselves
under the dominion of witchcraft.
But while Harold was wavering as to his future
course, he was brought to a speedy decision by
receiving
private information from one of the unbelievers,
whom he had made his banker, that a little child, of
some six or eight years old, who had exhibited decided
symptoms of being bewitched, had, in one of its
paroxysms, declared she saw the waiting-maid of the
newly-arrived strangers sticking pins into her. This
demonstration upon poor Mildred was not to be slighted
at such a time; and it fortunately happening that,
just at that moment, a party, consisting of a few
families, was on the eve of setting out to form a
new settlement, on a platform, quite favorable to
Harold's creed, he lost no time in associating himself
with the adventurers. Hastily adjusting his pecuniary
affairs, and providing himself with the small outfit
which could be conveyed such a long distance through
the wild, he was on his way to the new Medina before
the evil spirit made a second demonstration against poor
old Mildred, who happily died in utter ignorance of
having come nigh passing for a witch.
The suddenness with which Harold changed his
destination from one place to another at a great
distance
,
may, perhaps, seem extraordinary, if not
unnatural
;
but he had pulled up his anchor in England,
and those who have severed the ties of their nativity
never take such deep root elsewhere. The emigrants
to America had a world before them, and we may
trace much not only of the past, but future destinies
of our country to that roaming and adventurous habit
which pricks them ever onward towards the region of
the setting sun. This propensity is one of the great
instruments of Providence in shaping the destinies of
a people such as the world never saw before.
The perils, hardships, and privations of such a
pilgrimage can never be properly realized even by the
present race of emigrants to the far West. At that
period, the savages environed them on every side, and
they had no protector but Providence, and their own
hands. The mother country paid little attention to
her distant children, and never afforded them
protection
till they were able to protect themselves; and
their own governments were little more than the
united energies of their citizens, spontaneously tendered
in time of danger. Those who went forth to establish
new settlements in the wilderness were not only their
own sword and shield, but their own legislators; and
such adventures required a degree of intelligence,
intrepidity, hardihood, and firmness which, if at this
time exhibited on the great stage of the civilized
world, would excite admiration. Their sufferings,
their patience, their courage, their fortitude, and their
faith have as yet scarcely awakened the poet, the
painter, or the historian to the dignity of the theme;
and, instead of being presented for the contemplation
of their posterity as objects of grateful veneration,
they are much oftener stigmatized as profligate
adventurers
,
or harsh enthusiasts, or canting hypocrites, for
having rescued a world from barbarism, made the
howling wilderness to blossom as the rose, and laid the
foundation of a glorious empire, greater by one-half
than that of Rome, when called mistress of the world.
The party of emigrants with which Harold had
associated his fortunes, consisted of the families of
men of respectable birth, education, and acquirements,
who had left England from conscientious motives,
rather than to better their fortunes. They were rigidly
pious, and having abandoned their native country for
the free exercise of their religious opinions, were
determined
to enjoy them to the fullest extent. Some
differences
among their preachers on points which at this
time appear frivolous, but which were then deemed of
great consequence, had divided the little community
into factions, only the more inveterate from the slight
partition that separated them. A small party from
the weaker sect had in consequence determined to seek
freedom of conscience, or perhaps, the right of
dictating
to others, in a distant portion of the wilderness, as
yet unoccupied by civilized men.
It was practicable to proceed to their destination by
water, and such had been their original design; but
rumors of hostility on the part of some of the Indian
tribes on Connecticut River, authenticated by the
murder
of the captain and crew of a coasting vessel,
deterred
the party from taking that route, and they pursued
their journey by land, by a path hitherto only trod by
the Indian moccasin. Each family had a covered
waggon
,
drawn by either horses or oxen, containing some
of the indispensable conveniences for housekeeping
and farming, together with a supply of provisions.
Attached to the band were a few laborers, or servants,
as they were then termed, and a guide, belonging to
the Praying Indians. Thus went they bravely forth
to conquer the wilderness and extend the empire of
Christianity, civilization, and liberty.
It is not within the purpose of our story to enter
into the particulars, or detail the daily progress of the
little band, groping its way slowly and wearily among
the giants of the primeval forests, so lonely, sad, and
silent, that but for a little solitary woodpecker, or a
chirping squirrel by day, and now and then a
melancholy
howl by night, it would have seemed a lifeless
world. Neither squirrel nor woodpecker showed any
symptoms of fear; sure sign they had never before
been visited by man, for he never makes the rural
train his friend. Morning and evening hymns were
sung by the pilgrim band; and now, for the first time,
the sacred chaunt ascended to Heaven from the depths
of that lonely forest. The toilsome day was not
followed
by quiet repose; for one half the men was
always on the watch by night, and even weariness
could not lull the apprehensions of the other to
refreshing
sleep. But not a heart sunk, or a spirit bowed,
under these rough trials; and they cut their way
through the woods, cheering each other on with
hopeful
anticipations. Miriam bore it like a heroine; but
her mother almost sunk under fatigue and exposure,
nor did she ever recover from their effects, which were
shortly exhibited in the progress of a malady that
finally brought her, after all her wanderings, to her
last long home.
At length they reached the banks of one of the
fairest
rivers of the New World, fed by a hundred
winding
streams, that like the veins of the human body
convey the life-giving fluid from one extremity of the
frame to the other. Coasting upwards along its level
alluvial banks, where no tangled forests impeded their
course, they at length arrived at the foot of a
beautiful
cascade, as yet unspoiled by the hand of that busy
meddler, man; who, in this age of progress, wickedly
sacrifices all the beauties of nature, and banishes all the
naiads and the nymphs from their wonted haunts, to
make way for that monstrous pagan demon, yclept the
water power. There is some satisfaction in knowing
that at least one half these sacrilegious caitiffs, who
thus outrage the divinity of nature, are punished for
their impiety even in this world. Sometimes
retribution
comes in the shape of a freshet, that sweeps away
all his improvements, as the rascal calls them, into
chaos and night. The insulted river-god rises in his
wrath, and in an hour avenges the atrocities of years.
Sometimes the task devolves on another element, and
the flames perform the work of destruction; and at
others political economy punishes this conspiracy
against the rights of nature, by letting loose her
mysterious
jargon of supply and demand, maximum and
minimum, specific and ad-valorum duties; and last of
all, the avenging spirit is let slip on them in the form
of a new tariff, without protecting duties. Thus
are the ringleaders of this crusade, the votaries of the
demon of water power, punished in their generation,
besides being compelled by the prickings of a guilty
conscience to join a temperance society and perish on
water.
Halting at this romantic spot, one smiling evening
of the merry month of June, within a day's journey of
the land of promise, where they were to pitch their
tents, they prepared for their simple repast. While
the kettle was boiling, Miriam strolled a few hundred
yards below, and from a projecting point, contemplated
the wild, beautiful scene spread out before her by the
bounteous prodigality of nature. The little caravan had
encamped on the verge of a vast meadow, extending as
far as the eye could reach, along either side of the
river below, under the wide-spread branches of a
primeval elm, whose stately trunk, and deep tenacious
roots, had for ages resisted the periodical floods, that
swept away all else beside, and spread out into a wide
expanse of waters, which diffused fertility wherever
they flowed. The cattle were feeding, or reposing in
the high luxuriant grass; the smoke of the
newly-lighted
fire curled upwards gracefully; the kettle
began to simmer, and Goody Mildred, no longer in
jeopardy from witchcraft, assisted by others, was as
busy as a bee, about the table, which it is said was
neither mahogany or rosewood.
All else was the silence and repose of nature in her
primitive nakedness, save nature's lulling musicthe
solemn plunge of the river, falling over a cliff of rocks
in all the forms of rich, fantastic grandeurwild,
savage, and majestic, yet still beautiful. Hurled
headlong by the impetus of its fall, it rushed over an
inclined plane, the impatient masses pushing forward
in a quick succession of circular waves, that struck by
the slanting rays of the setting sun, almost blinded
her eyes by the flashing effulgence of their splendors,
and the swiftness of their motion.
While gazing on this Paradise of the wilderness, her
mind was not there. Sometimes it wandered towards
the sunny South, and after lingering awhile, returned
to dwell upon the strange vicissitudes of her past life.
Here she stood, alone on a spot never before trod by
the footsteps of her race. She was in a new world;
her birth-place, her native land, were far awayso
far, that England seemed more remote than the stars
that now one by one began to twinkle sleepily, and at
far distances above her head. She could see them
though distant and unapproachable; but her country
was out of sight, and equally beyond her reach. She
felt she should never see it more, and nevermore is
akin to eternity. Yet was she not sorrowful. There
was a vastness and sublimity in this boundless
solitude
;
a grandeur in her loneliness, that though
awakening neither smiles or gladness, touched her
soul with the inspiration of poetic thought, within
whose magic sphere nothing is reality, and even
melancholy is happiness. Her eyes grew dim, she
knew not why; and such was the luxury of her
grateful
tears, that like the summer shower, they made
every object seem more fresh and glowing. She
returned to partake of the simple fare, to join in the
evening hymn, and to enjoy the sweet repose of an
unreproving conscience. The next day they reached
their destination, and prepared themselves, not to rest
from the cares of life, but to begin the world anew.
CHAPTER XI.
The New HomeStatistical View of a Young Lady's HeartA
Conversation
A
Loss Never to be RepairedTwo Griefs Better than
OneThe First Grave in the Church-Yard.
The
spot chosen by our Pilgrims to settle down upon,
like a flock of vagrant birds, had been previously
purchased of the Indians, for we don't know how many
fathoms of wampum, an aboriginal currency much
preferable to paper money, because it was the product
of labor and skill. It could not be made for nothing,
out of nothing. The surrounding scene was of rare,
surpassing beauty. A vast expanse of verdant
greensward
,
level as a floor, and smoothe as a shaven lawn,
extended up and down for many miles, entirely free
from forest or tree, save here and there a stately elm
dotted the landscape. No woodman's axe, the great
weapon of the sturdy pioneer, was here required to
prepare the ground for ploughing; for except that no
fence or hedge marked the division of property, the
fields looked as if they had been cultivated for
centuries
.
A noble river, which courses the country a thousand
miles, flowed in graceful curves and silent serenity
through the vast meadows, its course marked by two
rows of gigantic trees, some of whose roots were laid
bare by the ravages of the stream, which in the spring,
when the snows of the distant mountains melted,
spread a wide sea of waters over all the verdant plain.
Some three quarters of a mile from the river, arose a
natural terrace, corresponding to its windings, about
fifty or sixty feet high, smoothe as art could have made
it, and sloping gently down to meet the level below.
From the summit of this terrace commenced another
plain of lesser width, and not so smoothe or luxuriant
of grass, which extended to the base of a range of lofty
wooded hills, that bent round in a curve, and
terminated
towards the south, in a peaked mountain
towering
above the rest of the chain. To the north, the
view was similar, but far more extensive, and was
terminated
by the conical summit of the grand
Monadnoc
,
lifting its head aloft in the blue distance of the
skies. No where could be seen a trace of the footsteps
or the hand of man; and yet the landscape wanted
nothing but flocks, and herds, and piping shepherds,
to recall to mind those scenes of the golden age, over
which the youthful fancy loves to linger, and which
the wicked wise ones of these iron times call a fable
or a dream. All around was peace, repose and silence.
Yet there lurked in the recesses of the surrounding
wilderness an enemy more cunning, fierce, and
unrelenting
than the barbarians that sacked the mistress
of the world. Solitude was no refuge here; silence
was not peace; and the repose of the night was more
harrassing than the toils of the day. But the troubles
of the mind, like the exertions of the body, dispose to
rest; and they soon learned to sleep soundly in the
midst of unseen dangers.
With the exception of a small number of servants,
the head of each of these families had sufficient means
to purchase all the essentials of comfort and
convenience
required in this simple stage of society; but
the distance and difficulties of transportation for a
considerable
period confined them to what was
indispensable
.
Harold was the richest of them all, and had in
the hands of his agent at Naumkeag a sum that made
him wealthy, compared to his fellow adventurers. In
the course of that brief period which changes, as if by
magic, the face of all things in this New World, they
were comfortably settled, and becoming gradually
familiarized to the sense of home. The rich alluvial
meadows became animated with lowing herds, and the
verdant hills by flocks of sheep; the tolling bell was
heard for the first time from the humble spire of the
rustic church; the echoes of the hills repeated the song
of thanksgiving; and under the protecting branches of
a spreading elm stood a little log cabin, from which on
week days might be heard the sound of many voices,
repeating lessons in most harmonious discord. Though
the Puritans denounced the doctrine of good works,
there were at least two which they never failed to
perform
.
They laid a foundation for religion and
knowledge
,
by building churches and schoolhouses. They had
not adopted that pernicious dogma which makes
knowledge
the great if not the sole basis of morals; nor had
they lost sight of the melancholy truth which the
experience
of every day is verifying, that unless morals keep
pace with intelligence, the latter, so far from being the
handmaid of virtue, only makes the possessor more
dextrous in fraud, and increases his powers of mischief.
Ignorance is far preferable to error: the former is a
passive, the latter an active instrument of evil. One
is the player, the other the instrument played upon.
In ancient times, and in the Old World, when
adventurers went forth to plant new colonies, it was
under military leaders, and the sword was the great
instrument for clearing the wilderness. But our little
pilgrim band was led by a minister of peace, to whom
all looked up with respectful veneration, and his advice
was little less than law. And truly, the shepherd who
thus led his flock into the wilderness merited all their
affection and confidence. He was zealous without
bigotry; loved his own faith without hating that of
others; and set an example of all that his precepts
enforced. He preached the doctrine of love, not that
of fear; and preferred to lure his flock to the fold by
the hope of eternal bliss, rather than the fear of eternal
punishment. He was their law and their gospel.
To an Americanand for such alone we write
nothing can be more interesting than the growth of a
new settlement in the wilderness. It is a complete
exemplification of the progress of society, a theme that
hitherto has been more the theory of philosophical
abstractions than the result of actual experience. In
its first institution, a community is governed by public
opinion which, is powerful in proportion to the
smallness
of the circle in which it operates; and the
great inquest of society is the expounder, as well as
enforcer, of the law. Where all are intimately
associated
,
the good or ill opinion of every one is essential,
because its consequences are directly felt; and no
man, unless so debased as to have lost the sense of
shame, can exist amid the contempt of all around him.
The atmosphere being confined, is poisoned by a single
breath; and where all live together, and all partake
in one common interest, the object of general contempt
or abhorrence is under sentence of banishment, as
surely as was the ancient Roman when prohibited the
use of fire and water.
The swarms that from time to time issued from the
parent hives were also invariably subjected to
imminent
dangers from the savages, who, like the wild
beasts of the forest, lurked everywhere. Hence sprung
another substitute for lawsthe tie of common danger;
which, united with a common interest in the prosperity
of all, formed as strong a bond of union, and as
impressive
an obligation of restraint, as either laws or
constitutions could devise. Every man felt that his
own safety depended on those immediately around
him, and of consequence, that it was equally his
interest
as his duty to assist in defending them. There
was no necessity for laws or precepts to teach him his
obligations to society. The law of nature, the first
impulses of reason taught him this. When the Creator
of the universe gave to man the privilege of free will,
in the government of his own actions, he laid down
certain immutable principles, or laws of nature, by
which that free will is in some measure restrained;
and gave him the faculty of reason to comprehend
those laws so far as they are necessary to the conduct
of human actions: such among others are the obligations
that we should live honestly, hurt no one, and render
to all their due. No civil laws are, or ought to be
obligatory, that come in conflict with the law of nature,
implanted in the heart of every rational being by the
impulses of Infinite Wisdom. It is to this we trace that
otherwise inexplicable paradox, the voluntary
submission
of man to laws of his own making.
All this and more was exemplified in the little
community whose progress we are sketching. Far
out of the reach of the parent hive, they, like the new
swarm of bees, carried with them the instincts of
nature and the habits of social life. There was, for
years, no power on earth to coerce them from abroad;
and, though they appointed magistrates and adopted
laws, their submission was voluntary, since there was
no authority to enforce the decrees of one, or execute
the precepts of the others. There were few crimes
among them, and these were, for a time, only punished
by the community. If a man committed a wrong to
his neighbor, or defrauded him in any way, he was, to
use a phrase common in such cases, hunted out of
the community. Whenever he came into the
presence
of his companions, he was received with scorn,
and, if he dared to resent it, all united against him,
so that it never failed that the delinquent soon found
it necessary to seek a home where his offence was
unknown. Slander was kept in awe and punished,
by all uniting in proclaiming that the delinquent was
unworthy of belief, on any occasion whatever. Thus,
if they happened to speak the truth, no one would
believe them; and, though there were no courts for a
time to punish them, by awarding damages, they
underwent one of the severest of punishments
universal
avoidance and contempt. In short, it seldom
happened
that they were not hated out, and obliged to go
where they were not known. Thus it would seem
possible
for a well-disposed community to exist, at least
for a time, without being burdened by a multiplicity
of laws, at least one-half of which operate as peevish
restraints, without conducing either to the morals or
peace of society. But it is high time to
individualize
,
and return to the principal persons of our tale.
To be alone in the world, is not to be out of the
reach of its calamities. They track the footsteps of
man even through the illimitable wilds; they require
no blazing of the trees, no compass, or north star
to direct their chase after the invisible fugitive, but
scent him like bloodhounds, and run him down at last.
Happiness is everywhere, or nowhere; and to pursue
it from one place to another is to chase a shadow.
The fatigues and privations of a tedious voyage,
followed
by the exposures of a long journey through the
VOL. II. 7
wilderness, had made deep inroads on the constitution
of Susan Habingdon, which now began to exhibit
alarming symptoms of decay. Schooled in the painful
vicissitudes of life, she never complained, but bore her
increasing infirmities with quiet acquiescence, as the
invisible enemy worked his sure progress, and
undermined
the frail citadel of life. So almost imperceptible
was his approach, that those who lived under the same
roof, and saw her continually, were not aware of it,
though the neighbors had, long ago, predicted that her
days were numbered, and her pilgrimage near its end.
But Harold, as yet, saw it not; he was daily
becoming
more intensely devout; the sentiment of devotion
seemed gradually to absorb all others, and deaden the
feelings of nature in his heart. He became, in a great
measure, abstracted from worldly affairs; passed much
of his time alone, indulging in long fits of gloom,
during which he seemed more under the dominion of
imagination than reality, and his naturally poetical
temperament displayed itself in occasional flights of
lofty eloquence. Miriam, too, cherished a master
feeling, which, if it did not monopolize, was perpetually
intruding on her mind; and, though sometimes a
sudden pang would thrill through her bosom, as she
fancied her mother looked ill, she continued unheeding
of the fatal crisis now close at hand.
Such was the state of things, when, one day, as
Miriam was sitting at her spinning-wheel, not turning
it indeed at the moment, but thinking of one far away,
her mother, who was reclining languidly in an
easy-chair
,
of most homely fashion, now almost her only
resting-place during the day, addressed her in a
languid
voice, accompanied by a still more languid
smile
Who art thou thinking of, Miriam? said she.
Miriam started from her reverie, but promptly
replied
I was thinking of Langley, mother.
What wert thou thinking about him, my child?
Thou knowest it is all in vain.
I know it, mother; yet still it is a pleasure to
think of him. I wonder if he ever thinks of me? I
should like to know. But why should I doubt? He
promised me he would, and he never breaks his word.
Ah! my poor Miriam, years have passed since we
parted from him, and, in that time, many forget and
many are forgotten. Think of the changes of this
world, at every passing momenthow many come
into, how many go out of it, at every ticking of
the clock.
True, dear motherbut still we may think of
absent friends, and like the magicians of old, conjure
up their images, though far away.
Miriam! Miriam! You are wasting your heart
on ideal nothings. On that which has no existence.
Mother! dear mother! what dost thou, what
canst thou mean?
It must be known, said Susan, as if communing
with herself. And better it should come from the
lips of a mother than those of a stranger. Miriam
canst thou bear to hear what I can scarcely bear to
tell?
Telltelltell me mother quickly. Anything
is better than what I feel this moment. O tell me
has anything befallen Langley?
There is bad news for thee, Miriamat least thou
wilt think it so. Be calm, my love. There is news of
Langley Tyringhambad news.
Is he dead? gasped Miriam.
Listen, and be calm, as becomes one who
belongest
to a race whose appointed vocation is to endure
many losses, many sorrows. Our neighbor Westport
has returned from Boston and informed thy father,
that a vessel passing up the Sound picked up a dead
body, in whose pocket-book were found letters to the
Governor and other persons in Boston. These letters
were from the Governor of Virginia, and others of the
colony.
The namethe namemother. But I know it
well. It was Langley Tyringham, interrupted
Miriam, with almost phrenzied earnestness.
It was indeed, my daughter. Besides this, a hat
was picked up on the beach in which his name was
written at full length. Lean on me, Miriamthou
art fainting, and remember that to hope humbly, and
bear patiently, are among the brightest virtues of
woman.
But Miriam was not fainting though white as snow,
and almost as cold. Nor did she weep, or wring her
hands, but remained silent a few minutes. At length
she drew a deep shuddering sigh, and calmly said to
her mother
Well, be it so. He is no farther from me in
Heaven than he was on earth. I shall meet him
there, but I could never meet him here. But mother
dear motherhow ill thou lookest. Surely thou art
not wellI never saw thee thus before.
I have exerted myself too much, and felt too
much. But now we are talking of death, let me say
something of myself, for death and I will soon be one.
Mother! dear mother!
Yes, daughter, it is time thou wert prepared
alas! must I inflict another blow! To me the cares
and sorrows of this world appear as nothingmy
vision is of another. But I wish I could have been
spared this painful communication. I hoped either
Harold or thou wouldst have observed the change I
see and feel myself. But he is otherwise occupied,
and thoupoor Miriamthou hast had other thoughts
to occupy thee. But it must be delayed no longer. It
is time thou shouldst know that I am not long for
this world. Death has been a long time approaching
slowly, but the nearer he comes the quicker his pace.
A few weeks, a few daysnay, perhaps a few hours,
and thou wilt be without a mother.
This second blow, for a while banished the
remembrance
of the first. Miriam no longer thought of
Langley Tyringham. Another and a holier feeling
occupied her heart. She gazed intensely on the face
of her mother, and struck for the first time with that
indescribable expression, which indicates approaching
dissolution, cast herself on her knees before her,
exclaiming in the bitterness of self-reproach
ForgiveO! forgive me, dear mother! My own
selfish thoughts have made me blind to what I now see
too plainly.
I have nothing to forgive, Miriam, and rejoice that
thou hast been spared many hours of painful
anticipation
of what all thy cares could not avert. And now,
as this may be the last time I shall have breath to
commune with thee, let me here bear testimony to thy
dutiful and loving conduct during all thy past life.
Thou hast been to thy parents a never-failing source
of comfort; their solace in exile, and amid all the
strange vicissitudes of their weary pilgrimage; and
be this thy best consolation when I am gone, that
thou hast fulfilled all thy filial duties, and that the
dead cannot reproach thee. When thou recallest me,
as thou wilt do sometimes, I know it will not be with
a feeling of regret or remorse for remembered
wilfulness
,
or disobedience, but with a pleasing melancholy,
arising from the assurance I now give thee, that thou
hast never drawn a tear from my eyes, save of joy or
affection, nor a sigh from my heart, but of anxiety for
thy welfare. Go, now my child, and commune with
thine own soul awhile, for there is no comforter like
an approving conscience.
Miriam retired into solitude in obedience to her
mother, with a heart rent by conflicting emotions.
But two griefs are better than one, since by alternately
taking place of each other, they prevent the mind from
fastening on either, with that intense, unchangeable
tenacity, which, if long continued, causes a total wreck
of either body or mind. Such was the case with
Miriam, who, in the deep solicitude and overwhelming
apprehensions connected with the state of her mother,
found a temporary refuge from the bitterness of that
besetting sorrow with which the death of Langley was
destined to render her familiar hereafter. Susan
Habingdon died about ten days after this conversation,
as it may be supposed such a woman would die; not
shouting delirious hallelujahs of triumph, in frantic
enthusiasm, or shrinking with fearful forebodings from
the dread hereafter, but with the sweet, calm
resignation
of a pious soulhoping, yet hoping humbly. Hers
was the first grave in the little church-yard; and the
only monument erected to her memory was in the
hearts of her husband, her child, and her neighbors.
She lay alone for awhile, but in process of time, her
grave became surrounded by many little mounds, and
at this time their numbers almost equal those of the
descendants of the little band of Pilgrims, that live
and move around them.
CHAPTER XII.
A Sage ObservationChange in the Habits and Character of the
Roundhead
Harold
Questions his Daughter on a Very Delicate Subject
Arrival of a Welcome VisitorA Walk to the Summit of a
Mountain
And
What They Saw thereThe Judge of a King.
Calamity
never leaves us where it finds us. It
either softens or hardens the heart. With some, the
wounded spirit subsides into cold insensibility, and
every blow serves only to harden it into stern
resistance
,
accompanied by a disregard to the sufferings of
others; with some, it finds its best solace for the loss
of the dead in administering to the happiness of the
living. There are those who, smarting under the
recollection
of the loss of some beloved being, retire, as it
were, within themselves, and shrink from forming new
ties, lest they should be again severed by the angel of
death, who seems to shoot his arrows at random,
careless
whose heart he splits asunder; and there are
others, who only cling more closely to what is left,
from attachment to what is gone forever.
Harold Habingdon belonged to this latter class; and
from the period of Susan's death, seemed to
concentrate
his worldly thoughts and affections on his
daughter
.
No longer the stern, unbending father, sacrificing
everything to what he called his principles, he became
the tender, affectionate guardian, the confidential
friend. When, after months had passed away, he saw
little if any mitigation in the calm, settled melancholy
of Miriam, and sometimes observed traces of those
secret tears that always come from the heart; when
he marked her struggles to be cheerful only followed
by increasing paleness and dejection he became
convinced
there was a deeper cause at work than grief for
the death of her mother. He, too, had learned the
melancholy fate of Langley; and now that death had
placed the barrier of the grave between him and his
daughter, his heart softened towards him, and he
sometimes caught himself regretting that he had so
sternly opposed a union that might at the same time
have secured her happiness, and brought her a
protector
when her father was no more. He thought that,
perhaps, instead of becoming a convert to his faith,
Miriam might gradually have brought him to adopt
her own. But it was now too late, and the very
impossibility
of the marriage ever taking place increased
his regrets for his past opposition. Had Langley been
living, and at hand, it is probable his former dislike
might have continued, and increased; but being now
forever removed beyond the possibility of giving offence,
Harold sincerely desired an opportunity of making
atonement by sanctioning what he had so sternly
opposed. Mankind are never so anxious to make
amends for injury or unkindness, as when the time for
7*
doing so is past forever. They can forgive the dead,
but not the living. Influenced by these new-born
feelings
,
he one day questioned Miriam on the subject of
her continued depression
I do not wish, said he, to prevent your weeping
over the loss of what can never be restored either to
you or to mea faithful wife, and tender mother. But
sorrow, like joy, should have its limits; and if time
did not cure, or at least alleviate our griefs for the loss
of those we love, the world would be clothed in
perpetual
mourning and sadness. I do not wish to
prevent
your indulging your sorrow, since it is not for us
to expect to pass through this vale of tears, without
adding our tribute to the waters of bitterness.
Happiness
,
my daughter, soons becomes tired of the same
companion, and seeks new associates. We may have
happy days, but not happy lives. If thy mother is
permitted to look down upon us, she will grieve to see
thee unhappy so long.
Father, said Miriam, with her usual frank
simplicity
,
I have other cause of grief than the loss of
my dear mother. There is another grave for me to
weep over.
I understand thee, Miriam; and if it can be any
consolation to thee to know it, I declare that were
poor Langley Tyringham alive, I would now trust
your faith and your happiness to his keeping; for
Heaven only knows how long it may be before you
require a protector in this wild region.
Dear father! cried Miriam, with tears of
gratitude
,
you have taken a load from my heart. What
though I can never be his, that I shall see him no
more, it is a sweet consolation for me to know that
my father at last thinks of him with kindness, and
would accept him as a son. I shall be happier now,
for I can think of him without offending you.
As she said this her face brightened, her deep
pensive
eye sparkled as if with a flash of newly-awakened
hope, and a long absent stranger appeared in the
likeness
of a flush on her cheeks. From that time her
depression gradually subsided into something like
patient cheerfulness, and she went about her household
duties with new vivacity.
The stern winter of that northern region had now
passed away, and the joyous spring, which had only
awaited the melting of the snow, now leaped forth as
if full grown from under the shelter of her frozen
canopy. The sweet south wind, the most balmy
breath of nature, gently curled the surface of the glad
river, now released from its icy fetters, and
murmuring
as if enjoying its newly-acquired freedom; the
fresh meadows put forth their brightest verdure; and
now and then a chirping bird, just returned from its
southern tour, chaunted his joyous song among the
buds and expanding leaves, whose foliage seemed as
soft and fleecy as the reflection of the woods in the
bosom of some glassy lake.
Miriam, one afternoon, pointed out these
newly-arrived
strangers to her father, and proposed a walk to
the high-peaked mountain, heretofore noted, which
rose gently from the river until it suddenly changed
its aspect, and shot like a pyramid into the skies. It
was not difficult of ascent in one part, and was now
free from snow. Harold gladly assented, and the
mountain being nigh at hand, they reached the
summit
in time to see the setting sun in all his glory,
giving his evening farewell to a world which lay
beneath their view in all directions. It was a scene
of most enchanting beauty and sublimity. The river
gracefully winding, and turning, and lingering with
sweet delay among the broad meadows; the vast
expanse of waving woods, undulating hills, and
towering
mountains peering among the blue skies, as blue
as them, and almost as transparent; the sublime
distance
of the horizon, and the endless variety of objects
spread out before them, all formed a scene that
elevated
the soul to the loftiest conceptions of infinite
power and infinite wisdom. Both for a while paid it
the homage of silence. At length Miriam exclaimed
What a beautiful world! and what a pity it
cannot
last for ever.
True, answered the fatherall that we see
around; all that is, and all that shall ever be, is
destined
to perish, how soon no one knows, no prophet
can predict. But the time will surely come, when
this earth shall crumble into a heap of smoking ashes;
the sea exhale in scalding steam; and the sun
consume
in his own fires. Of all created things, animate
and inanimate, visible and invisible, in this vast
uncircumscribed
universe, there is nothing immortal but the
soul of man.
Thou sayest truly, Harold Habingdon, answered
a strange voice, as he ended this burst of pious
enthusiasm
;
and turning round, he beheld an aged man
with white hair and beard, leaning on his staff.
You seem to know me, my friend, said Harold,
but I cannot recollect ever seeing you before.
That I do not wonder at, answered the old man
for since you saw me, I have been hunted like
a wild beast from my lair in the Old World only
to be hunted in the New. I have lived in forests
and in caves; above ground, and under ground; and
for years past have not dared to enjoy the light of day,
save when I sometimes crawl forth like a fox from his
hole, to breathe the pure air of this mountain, and
contemplate a world that has forsaken me.
Miriam was awed by the looks and words of the
white-haired old man, and Harold now felt a strange
conviction that he had seen him before. Again he
asked who he was.
One of the judges of kings, answered he proudly.
Hah!I know you now, though it is long since
we met. You are
Hush! said the old manbreathe not my
name, even in the solitudes of nature, least the very
echoes should betray me. You know me, that is
enough.
Yesthough you are greatly changed since I last
saw you on Marston Moor.
Trueyears have done much, and hardships
more. I need not tell my story, for you have mixed
in the world, and know it all. If not, I will one day
tell you, that you may learn how surely it is the
destiny
of man to be a slave. If he does not carry the
yoke on his neck, he will wear the ring in his nose; if
not driven, he will be led; and if he casts off the chains
of one tyrant, it is only to put on those of another.
Wretched were they who toil and shed their blood, to
emancipate their fellow-creatures, had they not within
them an approving conscience, which is its own
reward. I sat in judgment on a king, who was
guilty of treason against his people; who conspired
against their rights; who made war on them in
support
of his unlawful pretensions, and caused England
to smoke with the blood of her children. In my inmost
soul, I believed him worthy of death; and I thought
that such a high example of justice might serve as a
warning to those who profanely call themselves the
vicegerents of Heaven, by showing them there was an
earthly tribunal to which they were amenablethat
the justice of man might overtake them even in this
world.
Yet he is called a martyr, said Harold.
Martyr to what? cried the old man vehemently.
Was he a martyr to his religion when leaguing with
the Irish Papists against the Church he had sworn to
protect? Was he a martyr to liberty when he raised
his standard against those who were striving to secure
it to the people? Or was he a martyr to his country
when he pointed his sword at her bosom and stabbed
her to the heart?
I
said not he was a martyr, my friend, resumed
Harold; for though he may not have suffered
according
to the forms of law, I think he suffered justly. I
am not one of those who hold that kings are the
vicegerents
of Heaven, and govern by divine right. Nor,
if they did, do I believe that God delegates any power
to kings, but that of doing good, since he does not
possess the power himself of doing evil, and therefore
cannot confer it on others.
Assuredly you are right, replied the old man;
and what if there be no legal tribunal established,
to punish the crimes of kings? Shall they, therefore,
be permitted to abuse their power and oppress the
people
without punishment; and must they wait patiently
till the hand of Heaven interposes, and puts a period to
their mortal existence, by course of nature? No,
Harold Habingdon, the just vengeance of an injured
people is as much an instrument of the Most High,
for His great purposes, as plague, pestilence, and
famine, the tempest and the earthquake. Such was
my creed. I may have been mistaken; if so, I have
paid the penalty, by being exiled from my country,
my home, and all I loved, to become a wanderer on
the face of the earth.
It is a hard fate, and I pity you.
Hard indeed, and almost more than I can bear;
for the perpetual struggle, to resist and endure what I
have encountered, has almost shaken my reason, and
made me sometimes a visionary, I fear. The pen of
history is now in the hands of the scribes of kings, and
those who dared to set a high example of justice, at
the expense of a head that wore a crown, will be
handed down to posterity as traitors and regicides.
Butand here the eyes of the old man brightened as
if with some new hopeBut there is still one
consolation
left me. I look to a new world, and a new
people, to do justice to my memory. From all that I
can see and judge, a new race will spring up in this
great region of the west. The people who are daily
flocking hither are destined to be free. They have
been fitted for entering on their rich inheritance in the
preparatory school of England, when great
teachers
were abroad. They have suffered too much in the
Old World by civil and religious oppression, ever
willfully
to inflict it on themselves. They find no
impregnable
bulwarks of oppression here; no greybeard
abuses, hallowed by time, whose roots and branches
are inseparably intertwined with the very vitals of the
social system; no massive castles or splendid palaces
to overawe, or shame the humble cottage; no titled
satraps, or regal pageants to dazzle the eye and
subjugate
the mind; no long-cherished consciousness of
inferiority, descending from generation to generation,
until it grows to be a second nature; no great
standing
armies of hirelings, that under pretense of
enforceing
the law or defending the state, for ever become the
chosen instruments of oppression; no bristling bayonets
pointed at the heart, to quell the throbbings of liberty.
This New World is destined to be free. It cannot be
otherwise. All those great universal causes that
constitute
the instruments of Providence in governing the
world, combine for the fulfilment of my prediction.
Here, at least, I and my fellow-sufferers will have
justice
one day done them by millions of freemen, who
will adopt the great maxim, that rebellion to tyrants
is obedience to God. This is the hope that lights my
way, and enables me to support the load of life, now,
thanks be to Heaven, rapidly drawing to an end.
The old man spoke with all the enthusiasm which
belongs to those animated by a spark of hope lighted
from the darkness of despair. The energy of his
language
and the vigor of his thoughts strangely
contrasted
with his ghostly appearance, which reminded
Miriam of one just risen from the dead. He might be
likened to one of those pale, sickly plants, which have
lost their natural wholesome color, by being shut up in
the dark, deprived of the cheerful air and bracing
sunshine
.
Harold had served with him in the civil wars,
and they conversed together, till the evening twilight
warned them that it was time to separate. The old
man told his story; and surely if the act of
condemning
a king, whose conduct none living now dare to
justify, originated in erroneous principles or culpable
notions, the penalty was sufficiently severe. From his
arrival in the New World, himself and his companions
in exile were hunted through the Colonies by the
agents of Charles the Second, with a perseverance that
rendered their escape little less than a miracle. After
living in forests and caves, where they were fed by
some neighboring colonists, who doubted the claim of
Charles to the dignity of a martyr, they at length
found a last refuge in the home of a worthy
clergyman
,
whose remote situation afforded them a prospect
of security. But even here they were obliged to
seclude
themselves within doors, and generally in the
cellar. For a series of years they were entirely lost to
the world. More than a century elapsed from the
period of their disappearance, before it became known
what had become of them; and the fate of the
survivor
,
after the death of his companions, is still shrouded
in oblivion. Whither he wandered, where he died, or
where he was buried, no one knows, or will probably
ever know. It cannot, however, be denied that they
were men of pith and nerve, for they set an example
that had no precedent in the history of the world, and
taught posterity that the offences of monarchs, like
those of their subjects, may be punished by the
sentence
of a court, instead of the sacrifice of the people
they govern. No act on record so shook the thrones
of despots, or so effectually stripped kings of their
divinity
.
Since that memorable example, the distance
between monarchs and their people has been gradually
diminishing; they are approaching each other, and the
time may not be far distant when they will change
places.
Harold pressed the old man to come and reside with
him. But he shook his white locks, and declined to
accept what might cost his friend his life.
It cannot be, said he, I am a bird of night, or
rather a beast of prey, who only ventures forth in the
dark, not to hunt his game, but to be himself hunted
if discovered. That I venture out at all is owing to
an irrepressible longing I sometimes feel to breathe
the free air and enjoy a short interval of liberty. I
go forth at night, and ramble through the mountains
all day, when I again return to my lair. I will not
tell you where that is, not that I doubt your honor or
discretion. But I expect secrecy from those I have
trusted, and who have trusted me, and must be secret
myself. I saw and knew you, and could not resist
the desire of meeting an old companion in arms in the
same cause. But it is time to part, and for this young
maiden to be at home. Farewell, and may you find
all you sought in the New World.
They separated each to go his way. On their
return towards home Miriam asked her father the
name of the old grey-headed man, but he shook his
head and only said
Thou knowest he is one of the Judges of Kings,
for such he has announced himself. Thou knowest,
too, that his life is in danger, and only depends upon
the secrecy of others. I know I could count securely
on you, but I have no right to call on you for the
exertion of a discretion which I could not myself
practice
.
Ask me then no more to tell his name.
Miriam was satisfied, and nothing was said on the
subject, at that or any future time.
CHAPTER XIII.
A Living Rival to a Dead ManSome Account of a Man with a Good
Character at Home, and an Indifferent One AbroadApproved
System
of Courtship which, however, Does not SucceedThe New
Suitor Thinks Miriam Is Looking in a Strange Place for a Husband.
For
some time past there had appeared increasing
symptoms that the memory of Langley Tyringham
was about to have a formidable rival in the person of
an exceedingly staid, sober, and somewhat canting
neighbor, whose visits to Harold became gradually
more and more frequent. This person had by
perseverance
in a long, rigid course of hypocrisy, meanness,
and successful trickery in a small way, accompanied by
no direct violation of the law, managed to acquire what
in these simple, economical times was considered an
adequate fortune, and that without forfeiting the
respect
of those with whom he never had any dealings
in the way of business at home. He always went to
a distance to make his bargains, and though his
reputation
was not a little out at the elbows abroad, at
home he was generally respected as a consummate
specimen of religious worldliness, being a strict
observer
of all the decorums of life, as well as all the
ordinances of the community. In short, he was one
of those not very uncommon characters, who squared
his conduct rather by the law than the gospel, and so
long as he had the former on his side, dispensed with
the latter. These are the most dangerous of all men
to deal with, and we advise our readers to have as
little
to do with them as possible. The greatest
scoundrel
we ever knew was one who squared his conduct
exactly by law, and considered everything right which
it did not prohibit. Though not actually a lawyer by
profession, he was well versed in the law, having
made it one of his principal studies, to learn precisely,
and to a hair, how far he could go without burning his
fingers, or entangling himself in its cobwebs.
It is quite certain, however, that Tobias Harpsfield
for so was he calledwith all his circumspection could
not disguise from his own heart that he was an arrant
rogue. So entirely engrossed was he by selfishness,
that in shaping his course he never thought of
anybody
but himself, nor did it ever occur to him that
there was any other person whose interest or
convenience
was to be consulted. If he ever on any
occasion
sacrificed to these, it was only in small matters,
and in the certain anticipation of some greater
advantage
to be derived from his self-denial. Still, with all
this, he was called a very decent man, and decency,
like charity, covers a multitude of sins.
Tobiaswho, it is as well to state, was not one of the
original band of Pilgrimshad for some time past
been calculating, as his phrase was, the great
advantages of a union with Miriam Habingdon. In a
speculative mission to Naumkeag, he ascertained that
Harold had a very considerable sum in the hands of
his agent there, and as Miriam was his only child,
she would be sole heiress as a matter of course. True,
thought he in the course of his calculation, Master
Habingdon is not an old man, and may marry again;
but I calculate the chances are ten to one against that,
and in my favor, for women are mighty scarce in these
parts; and in the second place, I don't think I ever
saw him speak to any woman but his wife and
daughter
,
except when obliged to do so. At all events, I
shall come in for a good slice, if I marry the girl, and
half a loaf is better than no bread. So Tobias
calculated
he would fall in love, and marry the pretty
heiress.
He followed up his conclusion by more frequent
visits, until at length both Miriam and her father
became so accustomed to see him, that they were
scarcely aware of his presence. Harold continued to
read or ruminate, after the usual salutations, and
Miriam pursued her domestic occupations just as if
they were alone. So much was she occupied by
thinking
of another, that it is extremely doubtful whether
she ever thought at all of Tobias, or asked herself the
meaning of some very original, outlandish
demonstrations
he achieved from time to time. We have
observed in the course of our experience, that your
cunning rogues who are ever on the watch for prey,
are perhaps of all men the most liable to be deceived.
They are so intent on overreaching others, that they
have no leisure to take care of themselves, and
exemplify
the fable of the Fowler and the Dove. In
attacking the quarters of the enemy, they forget to
defend their own; and hence it commonly happens
that a series of successful roguery, ends at last in
the deceiver becoming the dupe.
Not that our upright, gentle Miriam was a deceiver
for if she ever deceived any one, it was herself.
She treated Tobias civilly, because she cared so little
about him that she never divined his object, and
referred his visits entirely to her father. If she had
really known what it was, it is highly probable that
notwithstanding all her Christian forbearance, she
might peradventure have thrown the distaff at his
head; for with the quick intuitive sagacity of woman,
she had penetrated the dark recesses of his character,
and despised him heartily. Women are seldom
deceived
in men except by their own passions. Thus
Tobias thought himself sailing with wind and tide,
when he was in fact entirely becalmed; and having at
length calculated that if he broke the ice, he would
catch the fish, he opened his mind to Harold, who to
say the truth received his communication with more
surprise than disapprobation, for he was quite ignorant
of the inward man of Tobias. A few minutes'
reflection
brought to his mind the unprotected state of
Miriam in the event of his being called away by the
messenger that stops sooner or later at every man's
door; and in addition to this, the hope that new ties
and duties might in time heal the deep wound he
could well see still festered in the heart of Miriam,
rendered him, if not favorably inclined, at least not
averse to the proposal. What rendered it still more
palatable, was the idea that this union would not
separate
him from his daughter. These thoughts flitted
rapidly through his mind, and resulted in a permission
to make his proposal known to Miriam.
Tobias had hoped the affair might have been settled,
like a royal marriage, by proxy; but there being no
help for it, he proceeded to the little sitting room
peculiarly
appropriated to Miriam, conning a declaration by
the way, a great portion of which is for ever lost to
posterity. Before he had half finished, he met such a
look of mingled anguish, contempt and repugnance
from the young maiden, that he fairly lost his
utterance
,
though a man of great self-possession, that being
necessary to his vocation. The heart-stricken Miriam
rose, tottered towards the door, and said to him in a
voice agitated by deep emotion, as she turned to leave
the room
Go to my father, and tell him when I seek a
husband
it will be in the grave.
Tobias did as directed, and Harold assured him that
the answer was decisive. He would never, he said,
again exert his authority, or influence her decision in
a matter so dceply interesting to his daughter, having
seen and felt the consequence of such interference.
Tobias departed full of the gall of bitterness,
meditating
schemes of malice and revenge, but at the same
time could not help thinking the grave was rather a
strange place for a young lady to look for a husband.
When he was out of sight, Miriam put on her straw
bonnetthe work of her own handand walked forth
in the holy stillness of the modest twilight, along the
smooth grassy terrace which formed what is called the
second bank of the river. Her heart seemed to have
received a new wound from the proposal to substitute
another idol there, and she strictly scrutinized her past
deportment towards Tobias Harpsfield, to satisfy
herself
that she had never in word, deed, or look
encouraged
him to this sacrilegious rivalry of the dead. Her
memory entirely acquitted her of such offence; yet,
still her heart persisted in reproaching her for the
involuntary crime of attracting another suitor. Tobias,
from being an object of perfect indifference, became
gradually elevated to one of decided dislike, if not
antipathy. As she wandered on, her mind naturally
strayed into the regions of the past, and recalled, with
unfailing accuracy, every incident calculated to
revivify
those deep-rooted impressions of sorrow, that
happily for the stricken deer of this world, when
softened by time, and assuaged by resignation,
exercise
a sort of fascination, which, while it incites to
new indulgence, carries like the bee some honey with
its sting. She returned home in her usual quiet mood.
The waters had been indeed rudely ruffled, but were
now calm, not only on the surface, but in the depths
below. When she met her father, he kissed her
forehead
VOL. II. 8
tenderly. Neither spoke a word of what had
just passed, and the subject was not resumed until
events about to be related caused it to be once more
revived.
CHAPTER XIV.
Symptoms of TroubleThe Church in DangerAn Apparition
Appears
,
Disappears, and Is never Seen againA Fatal Accident
A Conversation and a DeathThe Pagan's OfferingOld Servants,
Old FriendsA Sonnet.
Hitherto
our pilgrims, though on the frontier of the
civilized world, and directly in the route from Canada
to the colonies of New England, had escaped the
ravages of Indian hostility. They had purchased the
lands they occupied from the original proprietors at a
price which, though it may now appear totally
inadequate
to their value, was at that time a fair equivalent.
It is the labor of man that gives value to the earth;
and to the roaming tenants of the uncultivated wilds,
whose claims could not be said to be founded on
possession
,
the relinquishment of a small portion was of
little consequence. The early settlers of this country
have been accused by philanthropists, whose zeal
outruns
their knowledge, of having robbed the Indians of
their lands. But such was not the case. The
condition
of all the early grants of public lands for
immediate
settlement was the purchase of the Indian rights;
and it must be obvious to all reflecting minds, that in
the first stages of colonization, the weakness of the
colonists was such as to preclude all acquisitions by
force. The friendship of the savages was indispensable
to every new settlement, and for a long period they
were made either by fair purchase, or by consent of the
Indians. When, in process of time, owing to causes
which seem inseparable from the contact of the
civilized
and savage man, wars ensued between the two
races, the right of conquest, recognized, if not by the
law of nature at least by the practice of all civilized
as well as savage nations, became applicable here as
well as elsewhere; and it was then that lands were
acquired at the price, not of money, but blood. The
remoteness and obscurity of the scenes and times
render
it difficult to decide which party was the first
aggressor; but it would be in opposition to all reason
and experience to presume that while the whiteman
continued the weaker party, he would wantonly
provoke
the hostility of the stronger, and thus ensure his
own destruction. The aborigines of this country are
notoriously a jealous, as well as a revengeful race; and
so soon as they began to comprehend the truth, that
the progress of the whitemen involved their own
certain
fate, from that moment they determined to repel
or exterminate the intruders.
It was at this period that the conviction seems to
have become general among the savages of New
England
,
who had formed a general confederacy to
annihilate
the race of the whiteman, and by a single blow
free themselves from all apprehension of the
consequences
which they foresaw awaited them;
accordingly
the plan was matured with a secrecy almost
miraculous, and the moment appointed for striking
the blow.
One Sabbath day, when the little congregation had
gathered together according to custom with their
weapons at handfor danger accompanied them in the
fields as well as in the house of prayerwhen the
auditors were about to offer up their grateful
acknowledgments
to the Giver of all good, and when the good
pastor was fervently inculcating the peaceful doctrines
of the Saviour of mankind, the shrill war-whoop
sounded the knell of death in their ears, and called
their thoughts from heaven to earth. The men seized
their arms and rushed forth only to encounter a band
of painted warriors, who set upon them with savage
fury. They were taken by surprize, and thrown into
confusion; their efforts were without concert, for the
military experience of Harold was inapplicable to
Indian warfare, and consequently ineffectual. The
savages gradually gained ground, and neared the
church, where the women and children were awaiting
their fate in trembling apprehension, the whitemen
were on the point of retreating to the sacred asylum,
there to make a last effort, and the fate of all, wives,
children, friends, everything dear hung on the moment,
when suddenly there appeared among them an aged
man, with long white beard, and head whitened with
the snows of many winters, who called on them in a
voice that seemed accustomed to obedience, and
arrested their retreat. His appearance awed the
savages, and for a brief space arrested their efforts.
Will the champions of the true faith, cried he in
a loud voice, flee before the children of Satan? Stop
turnand fight the good fight for your wives, your
children, and your God! Follow me! The old man
placed himself at the head of the wavering troop, and
ere the awe-struck savages recovered from their
dismay
,
arranged his little band with martial skill, and
led them on to victory. The affrighted barbarians soon
fled before what they believed a supernatural being;
and when the battle was gained, the old man
disappeared
as suddenly as he came. He was never seen
again, and none knew what became of him. It was
the last appearance of one who had sat in judgment
on a king.
Previous to the confusion which had been arrested
by the vision of the old man with the white beard,
Harold, who had stood foremost in the fight, was
knocked down and tomahawked, by a savage who
came behind him unawares. Miriam saw him fall,
and, in spite of all opposition, rushed out, and raising
his head from the ground, supported him in her arms,
while she endeavored to staunch the blood that flowed
from a deep wound in his back between the shoulders.
When the fight was over, he was borne to his home,
insensible from loss of blood, followed by his weeping
daughter. He was brought to himself by slow degrees,
but it was only to become sensible that his wound was
mortal. Yet he lived several days, supporting, with
manly resignation, those pains of body only equalled
by those of his mind. The thought of leaving his
lonely, friendless child in this remote, exposed region
without a protector, and among those who shared not
a drop of her kindred blood, smote sorely on his heart,
though his piety persuaded him he might safely leave
her to the protection of Heaven. When he beheld that
dutiful and loving child, who he knew was heavily
laden with sorrows of her own, forgetting herself as if
she had no being; hovering over him by day and by
night, like a ministering angel, anticipating his wants,
administering to his wound, and soothing him with
soft commiseration, his heart smote him deeply that
but for him she might now have one to protect and
cherish her when he was gone. In the midst of these
painful recollections and forebodings, he one day,
shortly before he died, recalled to mind the proposal of
Tobias Harpsfield, and determined to make one more
effort in his behalf, rather than leave his daughter
thus alone in the world.
Daughter, said he to Miriam, who was sitting in
the breathless calm of speechless anxiety, watching
him as these painful thoughts passed over his mind,
Daughter, thou knowest we are soon to part for ever
in this world, to meet, I trust, hereafter in a better.
Art thou prepared for the trial?
Father, replied she, I have been taught, and
hope I have learned, submission to the will of Heaven.
True, Miriam; thou hast answered like a
Christian
.
But I am about to leave thee here in this
wilderness
alone and unprotected, save by thy innocence
and piety; and though I have especial trust in these,
I own I should die more assured and happy if I could
leave thee under the protection of some worthy
husband
,
like Master Tobias Harpsfield.
Father! exclaimed Miriam, in dismay.
Nay, hear me, Miriam. I once before told thee I
regretted most deeply my stern, and, I will add,
bigotted opposition to the dearest wishes of thy heart.
When I recall the past, I can find no fault with
Langley
Tyringham. But he is now dead, and
But his memory did not die with him, dear father,
interrupted Miriam; I, at least, will never forget him.
But his memory will not protect thee when I am
gone.
Heaven will protect me, said she, casting her
eyes upwards; a better protector by far than an
unworthy, selfish husband. But, dear father, do not
let the few last hours we are permitted to pass together
be embittered by a subject on which we never can
agree. I have thus far kept my pledge never to wed
without thy consent, and humbly urge that filial duty
can justly require no greater test of obedience. Oh!
leave meI beseech thee, leave me to the fulfilment
of another vow I made to poor Langley at parting,
which I hold equally sacredthat of fidelity to the
memory of the only man that ever awakened me to
the conviction that there was another feeling stronger
and more enduring than even filial love.
Well, daughter, be it so. Thou hast made a great
sacrifice to meI will make a lesser one to thee. In
these last moments of my life, I hope I have recovered
what I too often lost, the peaceful empire over myself.
Let the subject be at rest. I will trust thy
innocence
to One who, if He does not always shield it
here, will assuredly reward it hereafter.
Remember
always, Miriam, that it is better to suffer than
to merit suffering; that there is no shield for
innocence
like innocence itself and no balm for sorrow
like patience and resignation. I will trust thee to
Heaven.
Miriam earnestly begged forgiveness for opposing
his wishes, adding
Even could I forget my vow to Langley, I could
never have consented to wed Tobias Harpsfield.
Believe
me, my father, he is equally unworthy of thee
and thine. I have indeed but little experience in the
world, but I have lived with those who taught me to
know the look and language of sincerity, and my heart
has communed with one who was the soul of honor
and the mirror of truth. I have seen into the secret
heart of this bad man, and believe me, father, he is a
hypocrite and a villain. I would rather suffer the
Indian tortures of scalp and fire than wed with that
man. But, dear father, let not my selfish sorrows
weary thee.
No, daughter; and, if thou did, a few hours more
or less of life are only a few sands of the hour-glass.
I have something else to say before I have done.
8*
He then briefly informed her that he had long ago
made his will; that, being now of age, she would
have the sole disposal of his property; and that the
good pastor had promised his kind offices whenever
she required protection or advice. He enjoined her to
look to him as a parent on all occasions, and giving
her a paternal kiss, desired to be left alone awhile, as
he felt exhausted and drowsy. He fell asleep, but
never waked more, and was found about an hour
afterwards dead, with his hands folded on his breast,
and his eyes cast upwards.
The good manfor such he was with all his
bigotrywas buried by the side of his faithful
helpmate
,
and accompanied to the grave by all his
neighbors
with sad decorum. Among the rest was an
Indian, who had become attached to Harold by many
acts of kindness, and who greatly scandalized the good
Puritans by casting his pipe and bow and arrows into
the grave. Let them remain, said the good pastor,
it is the offering of gratitude.
The grief of the bereaved daughter was a silent
grief, and her tears were shed in solitude. She became
more pale than ever, and her form lost much of that
graceful roundness which gives such harmony to the
human figure. There might be seen after this event
a slight expression of that stern determination, with
which the well-poised spirit braces itself to meet the
stormy wave of rough calamity. This, however,
gradually
disappeared, and her face once more assumed
that calm, resigned, and beautiful expression, which
forms the mirror of a soul innocent of remorse, yet not
exempt from sorrow.
The faithful Mildred, fast descending into the vale
of years, was now her only domestic companion, or
rather friend; for long and faithful services elevate
the character of a menial into that of a friend. So
thought rare Ben Jonson, when he addressed a sonnet
to an old servant, who became afterwards a
respectable
dramatic writer, as follows:To my faithful
servant, and (by his continued virtue) my loving friend,
Mr. Richard Broome.
CHAPTER XV.
Miriam Alone in the WorldThe Good Pastor Falls Asleep in His
PulpitOne of Job's ComfortersA Suitor Non-suited before
Commencing
His SuitNew Lords, New Laws, and New Emigrants
Consequences.
Miriam
was now alone in the wilderness; and like
Logan, there was not a drop of kindred blood flowing
in the veins of any human being breathing in the New
World. She was without any stay but the tempered
energies of her own mind, strengthened by a firm
reliance
on the protection of Heaven. The benevolent
shepherd of the little flock to whose care she had been
recommended by her dying parent, assisted her with
his advice, and consoled her with his sympathy. On
the settlement of her affairs, she found herself in a
situation not only to supply all her own wants, but to
administer to the necessities of others, when occasion
required. It was not often, indeed; for beggary was
not then in fashion, and it was thought much better
to labor for support, than to derive it from the labors
of others. There was but one pauper in the
community
,
and she was a stranger.
When the silent grief of a deeply-wounded spirit,
had begun to feel the balmy influence of the old
greybeard
comforter, Time, Miriam, though she might not
be called happy, was far from being miserable. Her
recollections of the past were unaccompanied by
remorse; her present situation was surrounded by the
simple comforts which money could command in that
remote region; and the future was brightened by a
hope beyond the grave. Her habits of industry were
now a never-failing resource; she never felt the
pressure
of unoccupied time, that deadly nightmare which
poisons the existence of those favored mortals, the
envy of their fellow-creatures, who undergo ten times
more labor in search of pleasure, than the poor man
does in search of bread; and find harder work in
killing
time than others do in employing it usefully. In
her hours of contemplation, she was never alone, for
her thoughts dwelt on objects, which though not
always present, yet ever and anon, returned in the
semblance of departed friends, who dead to the world,
seemed to live for her alone. She became at length so
familiarized to these contemplations, that instead of
paining, they soothed her heart, and she would not
have exchanged them for joy and gladness. Their
shadows ever appeared with approving smiles, not
frowning scowls, as if reproaching her with some past
offence; and when this is the case, the memory of the
past, though it may be peopled with lost friends, brings
with it a soothing, gentle pleasure, that may well
compare
with the delusive dreams of hope. Wretched,
indeed, are those who dare not look backwards, for the
future can afford them little consolation for the past.
Thus months passed away with little incident, and
less variety. But this calm was at length ruffled by
an event of passing interest to the Pilgrim band. The
faithful shepherd, who had led his flock into the lonely
wilderness, and watched and prayed for their welfare;
whose advice had directed, and whose example guided
them in all the vicissitudes of their course, was
suddenly
and without warning called away by the great
accountant, who sooner or later brings all mankind to
a reckoning. To some he gives a short credit of a few
hours, or months; to others he allows a longer period;
and to a few, some fourscore years, or upwards. But
they must pay at last; and when they think he has
forgotten, or rubbed out the score, appears on a sudden
like some pale officer, and lodges them in that narrow
cell, wherein no air can blow. One Sabbath morning,
just as the good man was giving his blessing to his
flock, he fell back in his pulpit, and word spake
nevermore. His last breath was spent in prayer, and
his last word was a benediction. His death threw a
gloom over all around, for he never discouraged
innocent
mirth, delighted in seeing smiling faces, and did
not believe it necessary to live in the perpetual gloom
of present night, in order to enjoy the brightness of
the future day.
Here was the last staff broken, and poor Miriam
had no earthly prop to lean upon, but an aged woman,
kind and affectionate indeed, from long habit; but
possessing a narrow mind, incapable of
sympathizing
with hers. It was at this period, too, that she
began to be again pestered with the visits of Tobias
Harpsfield, who, notwithstanding his former rebuff,
still continued to calculate that she would be an
excellent
speculation. He had taken great pains to
ascertain
precisely what she was worth, and watched with
the patience of a beast of prey to see how, one by one,
all those who would protect or defend his victim, were
called away from her. He had a high opinion of
perseverance
,
and was accustomed to say, that he who
held out to the last would always win. Accordingly,
having waited a decent time, as he expressed it
for decency was his moral creedhe recommenced his
devoirs, by calling on a visit of condolence, of all visits
the most irksome to the receiver, when paid by one
who feels no sympathy.
Ah, quoth Tobias, casting up his greygoose eyes,
ah! he was a good manan excellent mana
tender
husband, an affectionate parent, a kind neighbor,
and a pious believer. Such a loss can never be
repaired
;
it is worse than that of your excellent mother.
You will never get such another father. But though
left alone in the world without a friend or relation, you
should not despair, for there are thousands and tens of
thousands in this world a great deal worse off than
you, who have wherewithal to support yourself
handsomely
and ride in your own carriage, with two horses,
if you choose.
This was about the sum total of the consolations of
philosophy, according to the creed of Tobias, who was
one of that very numerous class who think money not
only a great blessing, but one equivalent to the absence
of all others. Miriam received and listened to him with
loathing. With the sure instinct of woman she saw
into his heart, the sole animating principle of which
was a grovelling selfishness, not merely confined to a
preference of his own gratification above that of all
others, but to the exclusion of the rest of the world.
Still, the alleged kindness, of his motive for this visit
forbade her treating him with downright incivility,
and Tobias departed quite satisfied that he had broken
the ice very successfully, though if he had read her
countenance he would have groaned in spirit, and
gnashed his teeth. But the truth is, he was so
completely
absorbed by his own selfish purposes, that he
forgot everything besides. He studied only in his own
book, and never looked into the pages of others.
Following
up this auspicious commencement, Tobias
repeated his visits, gradually shortening the intervals
between them, until his persecution became almost
intolerable. There was no getting rid of him; for in
these matter-of-fact days, the last thing thought of
would have been to instruct a servant in the art of
lying, by denying the master or mistress when
actually
at home. The upright, punctilious Mildred would
have scorned such a mission.
Nor was this all. Miriam could not take a walk,
morning, noon, or evening, without what Tobias
called a chance meeting; and if she staid at home,
he had ever some clumsy excuse for calling. He
watched her going to church, or waylaid her in
returning
;
accompanied her home; and in short, so managed
matters, that at length the neighbors began to
compliment
Miriam on her conquest in a sly way, and
ask her when it was to be. This tickled Tobias
mightily, for he thought there must be something in
it, as everybody seemed to be of the same opinion. He
was a cunning, but not a wise man. Perseverance
will carry the day at last, thought he, as he was
proceeding
on his daily visit with a full resolution to try
his fortune once more.
Now it so happened, that on that very morning
Miriam had been for the second time complimented
by a knowing old dame, a near neighbor, who took
particular cognizance of other people's affairson her
approaching wedding. Heavens! how her heart
swelled
with indignant sorrow at the idea of such a
suecessor
to Langley. It was not to be borne; and though
the discreet Tobias had as yet never repeated his
proposal
,
or given her a fair opportunity for discarding
him, she at once resolved to take it without it being
given, though it was rather an awkward business to
nonsuit one who had not actually commenced his suit.
She was in the height of her indignation, when
Tobias walked in without knockingfor he affected
to be very intimateand full of his purpose to try his
fortune a second time. He had wrought himself up
to the crisishe had cleared his throat by a vigorous
hem, and warmed his icy soul by a vision of her
dower, when Miriam anticipated his purpose, by
meeting
him considerably more than half way. She began
by referring to her peculiar situation, as a single
woman, without father or mother, and living almost
alone; to the delicate proprieties such a situation
imposed; to his frequent visits, and constant intrusion
everywhere; and finally, with a flushed cheek and
flashing eye, bespeaking mingled modesty and
loathing
,
she alluded to the reports which his conduct had
produced.
Tobias sat with open ears, eyes, and mouth,
anticipating
a prosecution for breach of promise, after the
fashion of New England spinsters, if he did not
forthwith
offer her his hand. What then was his
astonishment
and dismay, when he was saluted with a
peremptory
request, which sounded very much like a demand,
that he would at once, and forever, discontinue his
visits; forbear all further attentions, and consider
himself
a perfect stranger in future. The revulsion of his
feelings was terribly bitter. He was taken by
surprise
;
replied not a word; and departed without
taking leave, filled with anger, malice, and revenge.
While the disastrous courtship of Master Tobias
Harpsfield had been progressing backwards, various
changes highly important to the destinies of our little
community occurred. New accessions of settlers had
come; various improvements had been made or
suggested
by certain troublesome and mischievous
busybodies
,
called public-spirited citizens; and the body
politic, inflated with its self-importance, began to
aspire to the dignity of an incorporation. This notion
was fostered, if not originally engendered, by certain
leading men, who thought they had undoubted claim
to official distinction. The whole project was,
however
,
knocked on the head for the present by a shrewd
old deacon, who warned the good people that a charter
was only a cunning device to enable the corporation
to run in debt without paying, and plunder the
community under color of law. A new judge had
been appointed, who, coming direct from the oldest but
one town in the State, was looked up to with sinful
reverence; and to crown all, a new pastor had been
called from the midst of the witches, who began about
this time again to play their diabolical pranks at
Naumkeag, and elsewhere. He was accompanied by
a number of disciples, enamored of his doctrines and
preaching. These innovations and innovators brought
with them the seeds of much after disturbance, and
caused a deal of mischief, as well as misery.
The new arrivals, judge, pastor and flock, were,
without exception, devout believers in witchcraft,
coming as they did from the very focus of
witchendom
.
Such a delusion might seem strange, had it
not been cherished in every age and nation of the
world. It has been ridiculed as an error of
superstition
and ignorance; but to this day, so far as we
know, it has never been philosophically treated, nor
has any attempt been made to demonstrate its
incompatibility
with nature, reason, philosophy and science.
At this moment there exists among a large portion of
mankind, the latent seeds of that same delusion,
which, in the age of which we are speaking, produced
such deplorable examples of the weakness of reason,
the strength and ferocity of fear. Happily, though
tolerated by the pulpit, in compliment to the Witch
of Endor, it is repudiated by the law, and its
punishment
is now founded not in its reality, but its
nonexistence
.
The course of our story leads to a revival of these
times, and the reference is made with no view to
reflect
on a race of men whose integrity, piety, and
heroism were amply sufficient to atone for all their
faults and weaknesses. The records of past ages are
equally useful, as affording examples to imitate or
avoid; and it cannot be denied, that in the present
age, the credulity of science is quite equal to that of
ignorance in days of yore. The reign of superstition,
if we do not err, if it has ever gone by, is about to be
revived; and witchcraft and necromancy seem
destined
to assume the dignity of sciences. It is well for
the professors of mesmerism they did not practice their
impositions some two centuries ago, for they would
assuredly have been brought to the stake or the
gallows.
Though unhappily at that time recognized as
genuine
,
by men whose piety and learning were equal to
any of their cotemporaries, it was a species of witchcraft
of the most vulgar species, and had in it nothing of
the vague sublimity of the invisible world. It
consisted
entirely in physical inflictions, or practical jokes
carried to extremes, such as sticking pins,
throwing
stones, playing pranks with furniture, and other
petty annoyances, altogether beneath the dignity of
supernatural agency. It was in fact the sublime of
the ridiculous, and would have been the broadest of
farces, had it not ended in the deepest of tragedies.
The gambols of superstition are like the festivals of
the savages, where human victims are offered up to
flames and torture. Like the fabled Ogre, its
gigantic
deformity would excite only contempt and scorn,
did it not prey on human flesh, and banquet on human
blood.
It was not long after the arrival of the new
reinforcement
to the settlement, before it began to be
whispered that witchcraft was abroad among them.
Many strange things happened, or were said to happen,
which could not be accounted for in a natural way.
Invisible hands perpetrated invisible outrages, such as
pelting honest people with stones at night; setting the
frying pans to ringing profane and diabolical tunes;
upsetting milk pans; bewitching the tongs, so that it
opened when it ought to have shut, and shut when it
should have opened; together with various other
mischievous
devices, such as witches practice as it were
without any other object than the gratification of a
perverse, malignant spirit. In cases of this kind, there
can be little doubt, that the love of mischief incites
many persons to perpetrate various pranks, or that
others wreak their secret spite under the cover of the
prevailing delusion.
Tobias Harpsfield was among the early victims of
fiendish malignity. He now first began to luxuriate
in the conception of a plot which time will develope;
and it behooved him to spread the infection of
witchcraft
by every means in his power. Accordingly,
there was not a night passed that, if you would believe
him, he was not grievously assaulted or persecuted,
by one or more of these invisible demons. Sometimes
he would be aroused by a box on the ear; sometimes
while sitting at a window, it would come slamming
down on his head; at one time his hat was blown off,
though there was not a breath of air stirring; at
others he heard horrible bursts of laughter close to his
ear while saying his prayers; and more than once he
was waked up at night by the sticking of pins, though
as yet he could find none in his flesh, nor detect any
mark of the infliction. People began to stare and
wonder at Tobias; he had become a subject of
supernatural
agency, and partook in the awful and
mysterious
dignity of his persecutors. Thus he continued for
a time to feed the growing panic, until a few recent
examples of perverse action in this matter caused him
to apprehend that he might, by some strange process of
reasoning, be converted from a victim into an
accomplice
,
and from this time his persecutions miraculously
ceased.
CHAPTER XVI.
Progress of a PanicIngenious Device of Master Tobias Harpsfield
for Winning a WifeDescription of a First-Rate WitchMiriam
Accused of Witchcraft.
The
progress of a panic is like that of a pestilence.
It is conceived in obscurity; it walketh in darkness,
and is communicated from one to another by a process
equally rapid and inscrutable. No sooner had the
apprehension
of witchcraft fastened on the minds of the
people, than its existence became hourly demonstrated
by new and extraordinary appearances. The human
mind delights in the wonderful, and there is a period
in the progress of terror which affords a strange
gratification
.
Thus every day brought forth new evidence
of witchcraft. The weak, the superstitious, the
mischievous
and the designing, all united in contributions
to the common stock, until a mass of facts, sufficient
to overwhelm the most skeptical, was accumulated.
Reports without father or mother, and coming from
no one knew whither, followed at the heels of each
other. At one time there came a tale of a woman
living
at a sufficient distance to afford space for rumors to
expatiate in, who, in the phrase of the time, Belched
out nefarious blasphemies, without moving her tongue;
next came the rumor of a man being beaten almost to
death by an invisible fist; another was bruised black
and blue with corn cobs, and had his barn set on fire
by means he could not discover; another, in going into
his field, was saluted with a shower of stones that
knocked him down and bruised him sorely, though no
marks could be seen on his body; another had his
milk skimmed every night, and his cheese turned into
buttermilk. But this was not the worst; a select
man, famous for devotion, sanctity and gravity, was
murdered with an hideous witchcraft; and to cap the
climax of rumors, little children fell into fits that
carried with them something diabolical. In short,
there was no cessation to these reports of wonders,
that, even if true, might have been easily accounted
for without resorting to supernatural agency.
As yet, however, the public suspicion had not
concentrated
itself on any one particular object. But
fear is nearly allied to cruelty, and must have its
victims. We may perhaps trace much of the blood
shed by tyrants to their apprehensions of the people.
Old, ugly, and decrepid women, though at other times
neglected and forgotten, are sure to figure in the van
when witchcraft is rife in the land. The more poor,
helpless, and, above all, ugly and decrepid, the greater
the probability in the mind of a philosophical adept in
the science, that they have entered into a compact
with the arch enemy, not for the rational purpose of
improving their own condition, but merely to obtain
the power of tormenting little children, by way of
amusement.
Just at the base of the mountain heretofore spoken
of, and about a mile from the village, dwelt an aged
Dutch woman, who had, when quite young, been
captured by the Indians of the Manhadoes in one of
their incursions; and through a series of strange
vicissitudes
,
not altogether uncommon in those days of
veritable romance, found her way at length to the
little settlement, where she was permitted to build a
hut, on the skirts of a wood that clothed the base of
the mountain. She had resided here a twelvemonth
or more, with no companion but a cat, the color of
which it is impossible to state positively, at this
distance
of time. None knew how she lived, and the
reason was, none cared, except Miriam, who could
have explained the mystery had she chosen. This old
vrouw was eminently qualified for a witch, having not
the least pretensions to beauty. Homely in her youth,
the hardships and exposures endured in the progress of
her captivity among the savages, together with the
deep scar of a tomahawk across her cheek, had given
her face a savage expression, exceedingly harsh and
disagreeable. Besides this, she lived alone with her
cat, and apparently shunned all communication with
her fellow-creatures. The natural conclusion was,
that her principal associates were among the spirits of
darkness. In fine, she was old, ugly, and poor; her
dialect was a farrago of Dutch, Indian, and English;
VOL. II. 9
she walked with a stick, was almost bent double, and
had a cat. Could any one doubt her vocation?
One of the extraordinary features of witchcraft is
the agency of young children, at least such was the
case here. They were among the principal, and
sometimes
the only witnesses, on whose testimony more
than one person was condemned to death and executed,
at different places, during the prevalence of this moral
pestilence. Whether these children were themselves
the dupes of their own fears or fancy, or tutored by
others more artful than themselves; or whether they
were instigated by the vanity of making themselves
the objects of universal wonder, cannot be known at
this day. But strange as may be either of these
suppositions
,
they are not half so improbable as that they were
really under the influence of supernatural agency.
Be this as it may, about this time a pair of these little
imps, who were unquestionably under some evil
influence or other, became infected with the mania.
They fell into strange convulsions, uttered equally
strange exclamations, and indulged in divers inimitable
contortions, during the intervals of which they would
cry out, that the Old Catas the old woman, whose
name was Catalina, was generally calledwas either
scratching, or choking, or sticking pins into them.
Having repeated this execrable farce several times,
with additional extravagances, the magistrates being
made acquainted with the facts, assembled together,
and after grave deliberation, decided to have Old Cat
apprehended, and brought before them for
examination
.
Accordingly, the devoted old woman made her debut
in charge of three constables, two of whom had been
expressly installed for this purpose, as no single one of
them was hardy enough to venture alone into her
premises. After hearing the accusation, of which the
poor old creature scarcely comprehended one word, she
was strictly interrogated on the subject, and poured
forth an unintelligible jargon of Dutch, Indian,
and broken English, at which the worshipful bench
was utterly confounded. They understood no more of
her defence than she did of the accusation, and solved
the mystery by pronouncing it the language of the
devil, without a dissenting voice. She was then
confronted
with her supposed victims, who were seized
with still more violent paroxysms in her presence, and
this being deemed decisive, she was committed to
prison to await her trial at an early day.
It was at this crisis, that Master Tobias Harpsfield
thought he perceived a fair opportunity of either
revenging
himself for his double dismissal, or forcing
Miriam into his arms for protection. He had been
meditating his plan for some months, and gradually
familiarized himself to its mean, malignant atrocity;
for every time the idea of meditated guilt occurs to
the mind, it comes shorn of some of its most
revolting
features. His plan was to cause the poor,
unprotected
girl to be accused of witchcraft, which would
certainly result in one of two consequences. Either
she would become an object of universal fear and
abhorrence
,
or be committed to prison for trial. In either
case, by friendly attentions, by interfering in her
behalf
,
and procuring her release in the last extremity,
as he had no doubt he could, he might so work on her
gratitude, if not her affections, that she would be
ultimately
wrought upon to give him her hand, which
being well filled, he coveted most egregiously. Thus
the wily deceiver deceived himself; for little did he
anticipate the tenacity with which the fatal sisters,
Bigotry and Superstition, would cling to their victims.
But being a man of great weight and influence both
in Church and State, he flattered himself that his
interference
could at any time be successful, and his
first step was procuring an interview with Old Cat,
which he did without difficulty, though the jailer
looked at him with astonishment, and ever after
quoted him as a model of heroism, in thus venturing
alone into the presence of a veritable imp of Satan.
He found the desolate old crone smoking the stump
of a short black pipe, though this was in direct
contravention
of the regulations of the prison. But she
insisted, and the jailer was fain to comply, least she
should exercise some of her diabolical art on his person.
By her side sate the cat, which had followed to the
jail, and entered with her, in spite of the opposition of
the said jailer, which, however, was not very
energetic
,
as he was extremely shy of what he verily believed
was the Familiar Spirit. Tobias, having occasionally
visited New Amsterdam in his speculating excursions,
had picked up a smattering of Dutch, which aided by
his knowledge of some Indian dialects acquired while
a trader, enabled him to understand, and be understood
by the old womanoriginally without education, and
having nearly lost all perception of the distinction
between right and wrong, by years of miserable sojourn
among savages, who could teach her little but rapine
and murder, the poor creature was but a passive
instrument in the hands of the tempter.
He first worked on her fears, by assuring her she
would be burnt alive, with such tortures as she had
seen the savages inflict on their prisoners; and having
thus frightened her almost out of her wits, cautiously
insinuated that the only possible mode of escaping this
terrible fate was, to accuse some person of having
betwitched her, by which means she might cast the
guilt from her own head on that of another. It is
equally painful and disgusting to trace, step by step,
the arts of a cunning and malicious villain; and
without
proceeding any further in detail, or specifying by
what windings the serpent at length circumvented his
prey, it will be sufficient to say, that by practising
alternately on her fears of punishment and hope of
reward, he succeeded in bringing the poor stultified
being to his purposes. The plan was quite simple.
When brought to trial, she was to pretend to fall into
convulsions, howl like the savages, and ever and anon
screech forth the name of Miriam Habingdon, as the
instrument of all her sufferings. Alas! for human
nature! Miriam was her benefactress. In justice,
however, to Old Cat, she demurred stoutly to this last
act of the farce, until Tobias solemnly assured her he
would take especial care that no harm should happen
to the young lady.
Thus tutored, and having thoroughly learned and
practiced her lesson, Old Cat was in good time brought
forth for trial. In her progress from the jail to the
room in which the court was sitting, she performed all
sorts of violent antics; imitated the most extravagant
gestures of the savages in their dances, their shouts,
and their howlings; and after going through a series
of almost supernatural contortions, ever and anon
screeched forth the name of Miriam Habingdon, who,
she said, was thus tormenting her. The court was
brought to a stand; the spectators stood aghast at this
denunciation of one hitherto believed of so blameless a
life, so innocent of all offence against her
fellow-creatures
.
Hitherto the accusations of witchcraft had been
confined to persons of suspicious character and low
station, whose habits of life or obscurity of position
afforded at least some pretext for persecution. But now
it seemed that the great enemy of man was aiming at
higher conquests, and that none might expect to escape
his snares. The panic became more intense; and
that purity of life and character which ought to have
shielded Miriam from suspicion, only operated to raise
her into an object of increasing horror; for such was
the besotted state of the community, that had an angel
descended from Heaven, his divine mission would
scarcely have protected him from being mistaken for
the Spirit of Darkness in disguise. The old woman
was remanded to prison, rather as a witness than a
criminal; and though the judges were neither brutes
nor hypocrites, such was the delusion under which they
labored, that after mature deliberation, a warrant was
issued for the apprehension of Miriam Habingdon, on
a charge of witchcraft.
CHAPTER XVII.
Miriam Examined before the Magistrates and Committed to Prison on
the Evidence of Old CatVisit of Condolence by Tobias Harpsfield
and its ConsequencesTrial and Condemnation on the Testimony of
the Devil.
Our
heroine was more astonished than dismayed on
the receipt of a summons to attend the magistrates on
a charge of witchcraft, a crime the existence of which
she utterly disbelieved. Conscious of her innocence,
she suffered herself to be led an unresisting victim,
little aware that neither innocence would avail, or
humanity interpose to shield her from a whirlwind that
was sweeping down all the barriers of common sense,
and human feeling. She appeared before the
magistrates
,
with all the quiet self-possession of conscious
innocence; but such was the revolution in public
opinion which a few hours had produced, that a
majority
of the spectators pronounced her demeanor nothing
more than a hardened insensibility, indicating the last
hopeless stage of guilt.
Schooled by Tobias Harpsfield, Old Cat, after a
preliminary exhibition of writhings, screechings,
contortions
,
and convulsions, told the usual tale of
beating
,
pinching, strangling, and sticking pins, all which
she ascribed to Miriam, who, though at these times
invisible to others, she recognized as her tormentor.
When this deplorable farce was concluded, the
criminal
being asked what she had to say in her defence,
simply and solemnly protested her innocence, and
concluded by suggesting the propriety of establishing
the existence of witchcraft, before they punished the
witches. This insinuation operated greatly against
her, as it clearly indicated that both magistrates and
people were equally under the influence of a delusion.
This cut rather too deep. Already two victims had
been sacrificed on the altar of superstition, and every
mind revolted from the very possibility of their having
been unjustly punished. It was necessary to believe,
in order to quiet their consciences. In addition to
this, one of the magistrates, who had specially
distinguished
himself in the crusade against witchcraft, felt
himself personally insulted by this insinuation, which,
moreover, savored of downright heresy. The belief in
witchcraft had become in some measure a test of
orthodoxy, being not only sustained by the example of
the Witch of Endor, but by the precepts of the new
pastor, who had come from the very hot-bed of
witchcraft
.
Strange as it may seem, he was a liberal
scholar and a pious divine, though deeply infected with
bigotry, the besetting sin of that age. Without doubt
he had a thorough conviction of the existence of
witchcraft
;
but he deceived himself, and what is worse, he
deceived others. In truth, such was the miserable
infatuation that pervaded all classes, men, women,
9*
children, clergymen and magistrates, learned and
ignorant, that while the panic raged, to be accused of
witchcraft was the certain prelude to imprisonment or
death. This terrible delusion led into a labyrinth of
error and iniquity, which cannot be excused on any
plea of sincerity; and, however unpalatable may be a
reference to the subject, it should be for ever preserved
in our remembrance as a solemn warning against
superstition in all its forms, and under every disguise.
It is a hideous, bloody, remorseless fiend, and with its
twin-sister bigotry, richly merits an association with
war, pestilence, and famine.
The blamelessness of her past life, the solemn
assertion
of her innocence, the calm self-possession of her
manner, availed nothing against the absurd
declarations
and extravagant contortions of the old woman,
who really exhibited a pantomime that seemed to
savor of supernatural suppleness and activity. Miriam
was committed to prison, where she remained in
solitude
,
avoided by all. Even Mildred, a firm believer
in witchcraft, was afraid to come near her young
mistress
,
lest she herself should be infected; and though
she took good care to supply her with all she required,
never ventured inside of the prison door. She had
nursed Miriam from the cradle, loved her with all her
heart, and it is probable would have died for her; but
there was something in this diabolical communion so
horribly revolting, that the pious old soul recoiled in
disgust whenever she thought of her former nursling.
Thus was poor Miriam deserted by all the little world
around her, and left with no other stay than that of
conscious innocence.
It was now that the very devout Tobias Harpsfield,
who boasted that he had never laughed nor eaten a hot
dinner on Sabbath day; who never violated, or at least
was caught in violating the law; and who was approved
by all his more respectable neighbors, a good man and
a worthy citizenit was now that he brought his
machinery into play to win the last cast. He paid
Miriam a visit, and such was the desolation of her
soul, such the depression of the lonely and deserted
maiden, such the feeling of utter abandonment that
crushed her to the earth, that even his presence was
not unwelcome. To the solitary prisoner, condemned
to pass the livelong day in idleness, without a visitor,
and without a resource except in melancholy thoughts
of the past, or gloomy forebodings of what is to come,
the presence of anything breathing of life is grateful.
A spider weaving his web, or a mouse sporting in the
silence of the scene, is hailed as a companion, where
all around is one dread vacuity.
During the interim between the committal and trial
of Miriam, Tobias repeated his visits, confining
himself
to reflections on her situation, and suggestions of
the best means for relief, without the slightest allusion
to his ultimate object. Miriam began to believe he
was indeed a friend, and her heart smote her for her
former prejudices. At length being pressed for time,
as the trial was now approaching, he took occasion to
apprise her, with an air of peculiar satisfaction, that in
the course of his indefatigable inquiries in her behalf
he had, he believed, gained a clue, which, if properly
followed up, would either result in her immediate
release, or subsequent acquittal. Having thus
awakened
a hope, he indirectly and cautiously insinuated
her forlorn and desolate situation, without parent,
brother, or friend, other than himself; and concluded
by suggesting, that under the avowed and lawful
protection of a man of weight and influence in the
community, especially in the church, she would
undoubtedly be shielded from all further persecution.
He was proceeding with all the caution of an
experienced
hunter, circling around his game and gradually
approaching nearer and nearer; and had gone so far
as to intimate he thought it possible, nay, was almost
sure, he had sufficient influence over old Catalina to
induce her to retract her absurd accusation. But
Miriam, at once divining his purpose, suddenly
interrupted
him with deep emotion, exclaiming
Enoughenough, Master Harpsfield; I
comprehend
thee now! But I am already weddedI belong
to the dead. Spare me any more words on the subject.
Thou hast been kind to me when no others showed me
kindness, and I had become grateful. But I now see
thine object, and to arrest it for ever,know that I had
rather, ten times rather, meet the doom prepared for
those accused of witchcraft, than pledge my faith to
a man mean enough to take advantage of my wretched
condition for his own selfish purposes. Spare me, I
pray thee, and let me die in peace, if such is Heaven's
decree. Death will not sever me from
my
world, but
unite me to all I have loved here.
Tobias departed, but not in despair. The time,'
thought he, is not yet come. Even the weak and
wicked defy death at a distance, believing themselves
beyond reach of his dart. We shall see, when he stares
her full in the face. The next time she shall ask me
to marry her.
The court was now convened, and the day at length
came which was to decide the fate of the lonely orphan.
The place was crowded with awe-stricken spectators,
drawn thither by that strange fascination which terror
exercises over the human mind. The magistrates took
their seats on either hand of the presiding judge, and
to give additional solemnity to this mockery of justice,
the pastor of the flock, in his clerical robes, was
complimented
with a seat on the bench. The crime of
witchcraft was considered of a mixed nature, involving
an offence as well against the civil as the ecclesiastical
law, and more properly under the jurisdiction of the
spiritual courts. But nothing of this kind existed
here, and criminals of this class were left to the civil
authority.
Miriam appeared with all the calm confidence of
conscious innocence, though trembling with that
deadly
weakness, which is the result of a long harrassed
mind, sinking under its own resistance of calamity.
After the old woman had gone through another
rehearsal
of her lesson, and detailed all the stupendous
absurdities
of her story, in a language which added new
horrors to the tale, by its obscurity, Miriam was
permitted to cross-examine her. She calmly
questioned
her as to their previous intercourse, and her
own objects in visiting the hut. But here Old Cat
could neither understand or be understood. She
answered only by a mixed jargon of all the dialects of
which she had a smattering, and which was again
pronounced by the hearers to be the language of the
Evil Spirit himself. When called on for her defence,
the mind of Miriam rose with the occasion, and there
suddenly shone forth over her face an expression of
sublime innocence, visible to all, but which, in these
besotted times, was held to be only one of the cunning
expedients of the Great Tempter to impose on the
people
,
hoodwink the eyes of justice, and screen his
bondslaves from merited punishment. She spoke like
one inspired; she sketched the character of her
parents, their sufferings and their exile for their faith,
together with her own education and habits of life, and
concluded as follows
As for my occasional visits to that poor, mistaken,
or misled womanthough aware that errands of
benevolence
should be in secretI feel now called upon to
declare that they were visits of charity. The precepts
of my parents taught me there were occasions when
the right hand should not know the doings of the left;
but there are also occasions, I trust, when good deeds
may be brought forward to meet unjust accusations.
I sought this woman, not to exercise over her that
power which, I believe, was never yet delegated
to the wicked, here the pastor threw up his eyes
and handsbut to administer to her necessities by
such relief as they seemed to require. I do not know
whether she is herself deceived, or is deceiving others.
I do not know whether she is the instrument of her
own depraved heart, or of some one still more depraved.
There is but one person livingand here she cast her
eyes on Tobias Harpsfield, who was presentI at
least know of but one person living whom I have
offended. But I accuse no one, because I have
nothing but suspicion to support my accusation. If
innocent, God pardon my suspicionsif guilty, God
pardon him. Here Tobias twitched his eyebrows a
little, but stood his ground manfullyI would not
unjustly accuse him, but I cannot but see the hand of
some one more cunning than this wretched woman, in
this plot against my life and my good name.
Whoever
it may be, that hath thus selected from all the
rest of the world a desolate orphan, standing alone
among strangers, without a friend above ground, save
one who is above all, as the object of a loathsome
calumny, I do not envy him his feelings, though he
may succeed in bringing me to a disgraceful death, a
memory abhorred by all, and subject me, while living,
to imprisonment, derision, and disgrace. Here Tobias
was seized with a sudden bleeding at the nose, and
placing his handkerchief to his nostrils, departed in
haste. But, continued MiriamI feel that my
days of humiliation and sorrow are drawing to a close,
and that I am about to become one of the many
victims
of men bewildered by the strange revelations of a
fantastic madness, which, when it subsides, will cause
all those who have dipped their hands in blood at its
bidding, to shudder at the recollection. I can but
solemnly declare I am innocentI have no witnesses
to prove it, but Him who sees and knows all things,
even the deepest secrets of the heart. If acquitted, I
shall be grateful; if condemned, I shall hope hereafter
for that mercy denied me here.
As she concluded, the pastor, a weak, but
well-meaning
man, deeply infected with the mania of the
times, said to the magistrates in an under tone
Verily how artfully Satan can clothe his followers,
even so as to convert the blackness of guilt into the
whiteness of innocence. Of a truth, it is high time to
be stirring, when the spirits of darkness walk forth
among us in the disguise of spirits of light.
When such was the prevailing sentiment of all
present
,
it is needless to say, that the innocent girl was
pronounced guilty of witchcraft, and ordered for
execution
at the expiration of a brief period, lest she should
indulge a spirit of vengeance at the expense of the
community. Miriam was silent; she cast her eyes
towards Heaven, folded her arms across her bosom,
and bowed submissively, as she was led back to prison.
There being some difference of opinion in the Court, as
to the final disposal of Old Cat, she was, greatly to
her disgust and disappointment, also remanded to jail.
She had been assured by Tobias, that her discharge
would take place immediately on the condemnation
of Miriam, and, for his own sake, he had earnestly
exerted himself to make good his promise. But on
application to the magistrates he found to his equal
surprise and dismay, that though they had received
her testimony against the life of another, they still
believed her possessed, and consequently had
condemned
poor Miriam to death, on the evidence of the
Devil.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The Self-punishment of the GuiltyAn ApparitionExorcism of
Mildred who Joins in Accusing her Young Mistress of Witchcraft
The Ghost Vanishes suddenly, but shortly Appears again to Miriam
Particulars of the Interview.
Tobias Harpsfield
, when he found that he had
totally
failed in his matrimonial schemes, and forced
Miriam into the grave instead of the bridal bed, began
to feel the consequences which never fail to follow in
the track of guilt, even in this world. Though mean,
selfish and revengeful, his depravity had never
contemplated
reaching the life of his victim; and when, after
exerting all his influence in her behalf in vain, the
conviction came over him, that her fate could only be
averted by a miracle, his conscience, not yet
sufficiently
hardened to the guilt of blood, became his
accuser
and his torment. Though not actually intentional,
still the crime was the direct consequence of acts
that he had wilfully committed; and with all the
ingenuity
of his self-love, he could not disguise from
himself the bitter truth, that he was responsible for
all consequences. To these feelings of compunction
was added the apprehension of being betrayed by Old
Cat, who finding his promise of release was not
fulfilled
,
might, and probably would, in revenge for the
disappointment, make a full confession. Thus assailed
on one hand by the sting of guilt, on the other by the
fear of discovery, he found no rest by day or by night,
and suffered far more than his innocent victim.
He continued to use every effort in behalf of
Miriam, still cherishing a hope that if convinced she
owed her life to him, gratitude might bestow what love
had denied. But all his exertions failed to relax the
stern decree of bigotry, and those arts which had
hitherto enabled him to compass his evil designs, failed
to accomplish his good ones. The panic had now
reached its crisis; every day brought forth new
rumors, new cases, and new accusations; imposture
became more bold and reckless; dupes increased with
the number of victims; and in proportion to the
extravagance
of the charges was the credulity of
superstition
which swallowed every absurdity. A state of
feeling existed, which, had it not so often been exhibited
in the history of men, would be deemed incredible.
Many of the accused had confessed their guilt, in
the hope of pardon, or possibly in the full belief that
they were actually possessed; and it was considered
infallible proof of the truth of the accusations, that
they tallied exactly with the confessions. These were
taken down by reverend men, who, instead of exerting
their influence in allaying the ferment, prostituted it
to the purposes of superstition and cruelty. There is
reason to believe that in many cases these confessions
were greatly exaggerated by those who recorded them.
and who at the same time, sought to give these
stupendous
absurdities, the stamp of truth, by reciting
texts from holy writ to their purposes. They seized on
the panic as a favorable predisposing disposition of the
human mind towards religious impressions; as if the
dark and blood-stained avenues of superstition could
ever lead to the realms of light.
As the day appointed for the sacrifice of the
innocent
maiden at the shrine of a bloody and remorseless
delusion drew near, Tobias Harpsfield became every
hour more intensely beset by remorse and fear, those
twin scourges of crime that always hunt in couples.
At times, his better feelings prompted him to make a
full confession in private to the pastor, in order that he
might exert his commanding influence in behalf of
Miriam. But of the three great stages of reform
repentance
,
amendment, and atonementhe had only
partially attained the former; for it was quite certain
he was as much influenced by fear for himself as
compassion
for another. Pride, which often keeps men
from falling, and at other times prevents their rising
when they fall, became one of the great obstacles to
a confession. Having long forfeited his own good
opinion, he was the more anxious to preserve that of
his neighbors, not only as a homage to his pride, but a
spoke in the wheel of fortune. Thus laboring with
the wretched indecision of conscious guilt, half willing,
half opposed to making reparation, he secluded
himself
almost entirely at home, under pretence of
indisposition, and at length sought to escape from the
consciousness of guilt, or the fear of punishment, by
wandering away no one knew whither. But he could
not elude himself, and became every hour more and
more the victim of guilt, remorse and fear.
Let us leave the wretched man to his well-merited
punishment, and return to those more deserving of
our sympathy. Poor old Mildred, as before stated, was
a devout believer not only in witchcraft, but ghosts,
fairies, and hobgoblins. Though from sentiment and
habit, she loved Miriam, yet had she such a religious
horror, such a mortal antipathy to everything in any way
connected with the agency of the great enemy of man,
that she could not bring herself to hold
communication
with one not only accused, but convicted of having
entered into a compact with himself, or any of his imps
of darkness. She, therefore, though her heart yearned
towards her young mistress, avoided all contact; and
though she once or twice ventured to the door of the
prison, recoiled with horror from entering. She spent
much of her time in praying and chaunting hymns,
and though her voice was not the sweetest in
the world, yet if the heart be in tune it does not
signify
.
She was thus employed one evening, just about the
twilight hour, with her eyes shut according to custom,
and moving back and forth, in an old rocking-chair,
when she was roused by a knock, or rather gentle tap
at the the door, succeeded by the sound of footsteps in
the little passage that led to where she was sitting.
As the footsteps approached still nearer, she opened her
eyes, gazed for a moment at the intruder, uttered a
loud scream, and attempted to run out of the room.
But the figure arrested her with a strong grasp, which
made her shudder to the very marrow of her bones.
She stood trembling and panting for a few moments in
an agony of fear, and then screamed out
Let me go! let me go! You are dead, you are
buriedyour flesh is crumbled into dust. Your hat
was found floating on the sea, and your body on the
shore. You are dead and buried, I say, and you ought
to be ashamed of yourself to come out of your grave
to frighten a poor lone woman.
Mildred! Mildred! answered the ghost, still
holding
her fastdon't be alarmed. I am neither dead
nor buried. You will frighten your young mistress.
Where is she? Is sheis she livingis she married?
Is she at home? What has become of her, that I see
her not here? Tell metell me, where is Miriam.
She's bewitched! screamed Mildredshe's
turned witch herself, and bewitched Old Catshe's
sold herself to the Evil One, and is married to Satan.
She sticks pins in little childrenshe worries old
womenshe rides on a broomstick, and is to be burnt
or hanged next Friday! and the poor old soul burst into
a torrent of tears at the thought of the sad fate
awaiting
her young mistress. Then, as her fears returned,
she struggled, and repeatedLet me go! let me go!
Master Langley, if it is really you.
This information went like an icy dagger to the
heart of Langley Tyringham, for he it was. Unable
to support himself, he let go Mildred's hand, sank into
a chair, and covered his face. Not that he suspected
poor Miriam of any other witchcraft save that of
ladies' eyes, or believed in the existence of such
diabolical
compacts. But he had just come from an
infected district, and seen and heard enough to be
assured, that however absurd or monstrous a
superstition
might be, it was no laughing matter. He at
once comprehended the dangerous situation of Miriam,
and rousing himself, by degrees reassured Mildred,
from whom he drew a full account of what has already
been related. Having received this, he rushed towards
the prison, regardless or perhaps forgetful of the effect
of his sudden appearance before one, who doubtless,
like Mildred, believed him dead. His heart melted
into a feeling of inexpressible tenderness, the joint
issue of pity and love, as he called to mind her
lonely, desolate condition, for he had learned the death
of her parents on his way.
Arriving at the prison, it was with much difficulty he
procured admittance. But the jailer, though deeply
affected with the panic, and its attendant inhumanity,
was naturally of a kind disposition, and being told by
Langley that he was an old friend come from a far
distance, at length showed him into the gloomy
chamber
occupied by the orphan girl. He entered without
noise, and without being observed by Miriam, who was
sitting at a grated window, which looked towards the
west, as if contemplating the silent change from the
splendors of departing day, to the milder beauties of
the starry night. But neither her heart nor her eye
was fixed on the scene. Her thoughts were far away,
among the memories of the past, the anticipations of
the future. She was among the dead, not the living,
and more occupied with others than herself. So
profound
was her abstraction, that she had not noticed
either the opening or shutting of the door, for no hope
ever entered there. As Langley approached close to
her, she became conscious of the presence of some one,
and raising her eyes she distinguished a man in the
waning light. She passed her hand convulsively over
her brow, looked once more, and casting herself
forward
with a heart-piercing exclamation, would have
fallen on the floor had not Langley caught her in his
arms.
Worn down by her sufferings, both mind and body
gave way, and for awhile she lay without sense or
motion. Gradually the voice and caresses of Langley
recalled her; and opening her eyes, she said, in tones
that sank into the inmost depths of his heart
Art thou come from thy grave, Langley, to
accompany
me to mine?
No, my beloved Miriam, I am come to move
Heaven and earth to your rescue.
Ah! why didst thou come? I was content to die
when I thought I was going to thee; but now I shall
shrink from death, because it will bring about our
separation. Oh! that I could have died ignorant that
thou wert living!
You are sorry, then, that I am alive? said he, in
tones of deep mortification, while he withdrew his arm
from her support. I am not welcome, then? You
wish me dead?
No, no, no! thou art thrice welcome to my heart
to my arms, and she cast herself on his bosom;
I will borrow a few moments from the grave to be
happy with thee; and Heaven, I trust, will pardon me
that I mix one drop of sweetness in the bitter draught
I must soon drain to the dregs.
She leaned on his breast; she permitted him to
clasp her in his arms, and kiss away the tears that
now, the first for many days, trickled down her pale
cheeks, and relieved her oppressed heart. In the joy
of meeting again they forgot how soon they were to
part; and it was not until the jailer made his
appearance
,
and reminded Langley it was time to depart,
that they awoke to a full perception of the present
awful crisis.
VOL. II. 10
CHAPTER XIX.
In which the Author, after Vindicating Himself from a Serious Charge,
and Disclosing a Great Secret, Takes a Retrospect by Way of
Accounting for the Appearance of the Ghost.
During
the interview recorded in the preceding
chapter
,
it may well be presumed that Miriam, being a
woman, had expressed a curiosity to know how
Langley
Tyringham happened to be in the land of the
living, after having been drowned and his dead body
actually recognized. This drew from him a relation,
which will be given in our own words, inasmuch as
Master Langley, in the course of his detail, indulged
himself in divers digressions both of speech and action,
in which he was encouraged, if not abetted, by
Miriam, and which, to confess the truth, rendered his
story rather desultory to a dispassionate hearer.
Previous, however, to commencing our narrative,
we feel it incumbent on ourselves to repel a grievous
charge, which we foresee will be made against us by
that class of readers between which and the writers
of romance there is always a severe contest, the one
to discover as soon, the other to keep his secret as
long as possible. Such, however, is the sagacity and
experience of romance readers of the present day, that
the author, notwithstanding all his doublings, and
windings, and dodgings, is generally fairly run down
and unkenneled before he has got half through his
first volume. Hence it is, that experienced writers of
this class, who have written some two or three
hundred
volumes, have adopted the practice of writing
extemporaneously, and commencing a work without
having the remotest idea how it is to end, leaving the
catastrophe to be worked out by accident. By this
cunning device they hope to puzzle and confound the
reader, so that he will be left in doubt to the last
moment. Such, however, is the instinctive sagacity
of this class of students, that this plan seldom, if ever,
succeeds; and it is now a notorious fact, that most
readers anticipate the author in his voyage, and
discover
to what port he is bound, long before he knows
it himself.
But all readers are not so knowing. There is a
simplewe will not call them ignorantfor there are
no such monsters at presentthere is a simple class
of romance readers, who have adopted the belief, that
an author absolutely knows everything, past, present,
and to come. But we solemnly assure them this is
not the case. There are some few things of which we
are ignorant; and this must be our apology for having
cheated the reader out of so much valuable sympathy,
by making him believe that Langley Tyringham was
drowned, when in fact, no such accident had
happened
.
For this, our apology must be, that we were
ourselves
entirely ignorant that our hero was actually still
in the land of the living, until he suddenly made his
appearance, as related in the preceding chapter. The
truth is, that the scene of his supposed death, was so
remote from all civilized life, and accompanied by such
strange romantic circumstances, that we never could
come at the truth, till we had the young gentleman's
word for it, and, therefore, thought it most prudent to
say nothing on the subject, lest we might mislead the
simple reader, who pins his faith on the sleeve of an
author, and believes everything he sees in print. With
this explanation, which will, doubtless, be quite
satisfactory
,
we proceed to abridge the relation of Master
Langley, in our own way, seeing it is an awkward
business for a man to be the hero of his own story.
The departure of Harold Habingdon, and his family,
without taking leave, had given no small offence to the
old Cavalier, who was somewhat ceremonious, and
considered a breach of etiquette near akin to a breach
of the decalogue. It increased his distaste for the
Roundheads, and gave occasion for divers flings at
Crop-ears, Levellers, and Rebels. On Langley it had
a far different effect. Though in the course of our
story, we have dilated but briefly on the subject,
considering
love scenes much more agreeable to actors
than spectators, yet had there been both time and
opportunity, for the growth of an ardent, deep-seated,
and lasting attachment between these young people,
thus thrown together in a situation where the absence
of those various excitements of the busy world, which
fritter away the affections of the heart by piecemeal,
and as it were neutralize each other, gives force and
permanency to the master feeling, whatever that may
be. This attachment which in its earliest stage, had
been met by the positive prohibition of one parent and
the stern, inflexible opposition of the other, had not
been subdued or arrested, but strengthened by these
obstacles. The damming up of the stream only raised
the waters the higher, and threw them back with
greater weight and volume.
Langley became moody, careless, and abstracted
neglected himself, and was indifferent to others. He
took long rides, but could not tell on his return where
he had been; he displayed no interest whatever in his
former favorite amusements of hunting, and sailing
on the river; and seemed altogether wrapt up in a
sort of indolent, gloomy melancholy. The old Cavalier
frequently took him to task, and as usual, only made
matters worse. Like many fathers, he forgot his
son was no longer a child, and treated him as a boy,
when in fact, he had become a man. Langley had
always cherished a warm filial affection, as well as a
deep sense of duty towards his father; but his
passionate
overbearing reproaches, rather tended to
awaken a spirit of resistance, than to soften his
heart, or dispose him to yield his cherished feelings
at the arbitrary command even of a parent. He
thought that having submitted his actions to the will
of his father, he had a right to his thoughts, at least.
Finding his remonstrances and commands equally
vain in altering the deportment of his son, the old
Cavalier hit on a masterly expedient. He instigated
his wife to negotiate a visit from a famous belle at the
capital, who had figured at the court of Charles
the Second, and it is said nearly captivated that
monarch. She was, moreover, a young lady of great
beauty and accomplishments, and an heiress, to boot.
Lastly, she was niece to the Governor, who, besides
being the representative of majesty, was a veritable
knight of King James' creating. But Langleyas he
assured Miriampaid her not the least attention,
beyond what was due to his mother's guest; and half
the time was unconscious of her presence. The young
ladyas well she mightsoon became tired of the
devoirs of the old Cavalier, who endeavored to atone
for the deficiencies of his son, by a variety of gallant
expedients, and returned home, where she pronounced
Master Langley as stupid as an owlbores being not
yet in existence. The worthy gentleman began
seriously
to apprehend that his only son would die a
bachelor, and the ancient name of Tyringham become
extinct in the New World. As usual, in the last
resort, and when he had gone so far in the wrong
track, that he could not find his way back, he called
the sage Gregory Moth to a consultation, to whose
opinion he always paid great deference, when it
squared with his own.
Gregory, quoth he, What has got into that
blockhead, my son? I can't tell what to make of him,
not I. He is getting quite thin; he has lost all relish
for horse-racing, hunting and sailing; eats little
breakfast
,
forgets to come home to dinner, and what is worse
than all, drinks no wine.
That's a very bad symptom, said Gregory,
shaking
his head.
Very badI shouldn't be surprised if he had a
touch of the ague before longhey?
I am inclined to think, sir, that his complaint is
more likely to turn out a fever. But verily, sir master
of mine, did it never occur to you in your hours of
serious meditation, that you were as blind as a bat,
metaphorically speaking?
Why, you impudent varlet, what do you mean by
that, hey?
Why, sir, with due submission, I mean exactly
what I say, which is more than most people do. I
consider you as having been struck with a
preternatural
blindness, intended, doubtless, as a punishment for
having consulted me so often without taking my
advice
.
I may be mistaken, sir, but I have sometimes
doubted whether you can see the nose on your face.
I tell you what, Master Gregory Moth, quoth
the Cavalier, brandishing his cane, if you don't
speak to the purpose, and that speedily, I can see
clear enough to plant this stick directly on your nonce.
'Slife, sir, answer me without any of your infernal
circumlocutions
.
What do you think is come over my
son Langley?
Why, verily, sir, I opine that his very heart-strings
are tied up in a true lover's knot.
Heywhat? Nonsense, Gregorywhy, he has
seen but one young white womanexcept her that is
just gonesince he came to years of discretion, and I
positively prohibited him from visiting, talking to, or
thinking of her.
Ah, sir, that's the very thing. Seeing but one
young woman, he could make no comparisons to her
disadvantage. Any woman standing alone in the
wilderness
is an angel. Touching your prohibitionsas I
observed, with all due submission just nowyou must
be blind to all human experience not to know, that both
men and womenbeing descendants of Adam and
Evelove nothing so dearly as forbidden fruit. Ergo
speaking logically, my young master did doubtless
fall in love with the Crop-ear's daughter as soon as
possible after you forbade him, if he had not done so
before.
Hum, quoth the Cavalier, thoughtfully, very
likely; I think I recollect something of that kind when
I was young. But if the mischief is done, it is too late
to prevent it now, eh?
You never said a wiser thing in your life, sir, and
in respect to the discretion of your tongue, marvelously
resemble our most gracious sovereign, Charles the
Second. In my humble opinion, the best way to treat
an event after it hath actually happened is to let it
take its course till it runs itself fairly aground, instead
of getting our fingers crushed by attempting to stop
the stone while it is bounding full tilt down hill. The
truth is, we don't know whether it will turn out good
or bad, till we see the end of it; and as Seneca says
I don't recollect exactly what he says, but it is
something
very much to the purposeand certain it is that
our misfortunes frequently turn out greatly to our
benefit. The pursuit of happiness is like that of the
hunter, who must plunge into thickets, swamps and
puddles, to run down his game.
Gregory, said his master, if your wisdom
were not grievously adulterated by your folly, you
might in good time make a fourth among the wise
men of Gotham. If I understand you, which is no
easy matter, I had better let Master Langley alone, till
his love burns out of itself, like a fire in the
mountains
,
eh?
Assuredly, sir.
But if I find it won't burn out, what then?
Why then, sir, logically speaking, I would let
him seek out and marry the Crop-ear young lady,
and then it will entirely go out in the common course
of nature.
Well, I will let him alone awhile longer, and if I
find it don't turn out a case of ague and fever, and he
fails to recover his spirits, I may consent to let him
take a trip to that nest of Roundheads down East, in
search of that little damsel, who I should like
mightily, if she were not of that confounded Puritan
breed, which scorns to obey the king, much less a
husband
.
She may have married or turned witch, as I
10*
hear one half of the women have in that quarter, and
either specific will cure him. What say you, my
trusty counsellor?
I say amen, sir, and bow to your superior wisdom.
It would be a great pity my young master should fail
in transmitting your name and honors to posterity.
Aye, Gregory, and who knows what honors
besides
.
I have received letters from home, by which I
learn that his lordship, my elder brother, and first born
of Egypt, has only four sons at present living, and is
not in good health. Now suppose one should break
his neck in a fox chase, a second be killed in battle,
a third be drowned, and a fourth hang himself for
want of excitement; you know Langley would come
in for the estate and title. It is, therefore
indispensable
he should marry, in order to continue the line,
which, after all, will suffer no disgrace by a union with
the Roundhead's daughter, for he has a most infernal
musty pedigree, Langley says.
Thus ended the conference. But when, after the
expiration of several months, it was found that
Langley
so far from recovering his spirits, became still more
abstracted and melancholy; that though his disease
did not turn out to be ague and fever, his health
seemed gradually declining, the old Cavalier one day
took occasion to question him directly, as to the cause
of his change both in habits and manners, at the same
time requesting a frank reply. Langley made no
hesitation
in opening his heart to his father, and in
conclusion
addressed him as follows:
So far as regards your commands to cease all
intercourse
with Miriam Habingdon, I have obeyed you,
sir, and if we met it was by accident. As a father,
you had a right to forbid my bringing into your house
a daughter whose manners, habits, and religion were
not only disagreeable but offensive to you. I was, and
am still entirely dependent on your bounty, and so
long as I continue so, have no claim to do as I please.
But here, sir, I conceive your authority ceases. You
have no right, derived from divine or human laws, to
exact from me any farther sacrifice by commanding me
to wed another. I neither can or will obey you. We
are equally bound by an exchange of vows, as by the
unchangeable feelings of my heart, at least; and I
declare
to you solemnly and before God, that no other
woman shall ever stand with me before the altar, but
my own Miriam. It rests with you, sir, to say whether
I am to continue in an existence equally useless to
myself and others; a solitary being, without a purpose
in life; a burden to myself, and to those I would
willingly
rid of all burdens; or to give me a new existence,
new hopes, new objects, and new excitements, by
permitting
me to seek Miriam, wherever she may be
found. If I find she has forgotten me, and chosen
another, I am not such a silly weakling but that I can
leave and forget her. But if I find her, as I know I
shall, true to her vows, I will make every effort to
remove
those objections which, I fear, my dear father,
are far more difficult than yours to overcome. I entreat,
I conjure, sir, as you value my happiness in this world,
to let me go and try my fortune. Promise me, too, that
if I succeed you will receive Miriam and cherish her
as a daughter; for I swear to you she will deserve it.
For my motherI know I am sure of her.
Go, then, in God's name, and may success attend
you, said the old Cavalier, overcome by this manly
expostulation. There is a vessel to sail in a few
days. Get ready as soon as you can and return as
early as possible, for who knows what may happen in
your absence. From the savages there is now nothing
to fear, but there is another foe, or fiend, as may be,
who launches his arrows with more certainty than the
Indian warrior.
Believe me, sir, cried Langley, who seemed at
once awakened to new life, believe me, I will not
lose a moment, and I trust in Heaven I may bring
you one who will be the solace of your age for long
years to come.
Amen! said the old cavalier, and they parted.
CHAPTER XX.
Retrospect Continued.
The
matter being thus promptly settled, Master Hugh
Tyringham, from the mere force of habit, consulted
his better half on the subject, who, being a sensible
woman, and an excellent wife, withal, very judiciously
answered, you know best, my dear, and proceeded
quietly in a succession of painful endeavors to thread
her needle. She was, indeed, a pattern of a woman,
and merited a more particular introduction to the
reader than we have yet given. This must be our
apology for having said so little of her in the progress
of our tale. Any good-for-nothing woman may be
made to figure in romance: but it is no easy task to
make anything of a discreet, plain, good-tempered
dame, whose virtues are so nicely balanced and
harmoniously
blended that there is nothing monstrous or
disproportioned to excite wonder, admiration or disgust.
Hence, without doubt, it so often happens that writers
of fiction are obliged to resort for their heroine to
some strange, fantastic, incomprehensible being, as it
were half horse, half alligator, and a little of the
snapping trutle, whose high attainments, sublime
genius and trancendental transcendentalism, serve no
other purpose than to destroy her own happiness and
that of all within the sphere of her influence. The
gentle and judicious reader will pardon this, and all
other digressions, most especially when we assure him
that these seeming excrescences contain the very
cream of our work. Having been forced, by the taste
of the venerable public, to glean in the weather-beaten
path of fiction, we have sought to mingle with it as
much concealed morality as the spirit of the age will
bear.
The old Cavalier possessed many good qualities,
though, like big John Bull, he sometimes had a
disagreeable
way of showing them. But it is not intended
to hold him up as a model for husbands, for he was
sometimes a little testy, and occasionally somewhat
unreasonable. He neither liked his wife to agree with
him without some little discussion, nor to oppose him
without in the end coming round to his opinion. Tacit
acquiescence was as disagreeable to him as obstinate
resistance; and being on this particular occasion a
little dubious as to the wisdom of his course, he wished
to bolster himself up with the opinion of his wife. If
the affair turned out badly, he might then throw all
the responsibility upon her shoulders. When,
therefore
,
she quietly answered, you know best, my dear,
he felt somewhat nettled at her passive obedience.
'Slife, Mistress Tyringham, said he, I asked
your advice, not your acquiescence. I am pretty well
satisfied that I know best, yet, as two heads are better
than oneyou know the old proverbI should like
to know what you think of this journey of Langley,
eh?
Why, my dear, as I said before, I think you know
or ought to know best, andbless me! if I haven't
been stitching this petticoat wrong side outwards.
The devil take all stitching, patching and
hemming
.
What has that to do with the matter? I want
your opinion, madam.
Well, my dear, I agree with you perfectly.
Zounds! I tell you I don't wish you to agree with
me perfectly.
Well, then, my dear
Don't dear me, if you please. You are never so
affectionate as when doing all you can to provoke
me.
Well, then, myhem! I differ with you entirely,
said she, laughing at the same time so exuberantly
that she missed threading her needle three several
times.
Mistress Tyringham, roared the Cavalier, I
don't wish to say anything disagreeable or
disrespectful
,
but, by the Lord Harry, you are a great fool!
Ah! myMr. Tyringham, you should not say
that, at least in my presence. I may not be as wise
as you, but it is quite impossible for one to have lived
with you so long and be a fool. But, now, I recollect,
Gregory has brought home one of the finest wild
turkeys
I ever saw, and I want your opinion about
cooking it.
Hereupon the worthy gentleman rubbed his hands
with great glee, and the conference was ended in the
pantry.
It may be taken for granted that Langley
Tyringham
lost no time in making his arrangements for a
voyage to New England in search of a wife. On
inquiry
,
he learned that our old acquaintance, Captain
Skeering, having established a regular trade between
the two colonies, was now in port and on the eve of
sailing. Accordingly, being liberally supplied with the
one thing needful by his father, and letters of
introduction
to the Governor, as well as other gentlemen of
Massachusetts Bay, he took an affectionate leave of
his parents, not forgetting Gregory Moth; embarked
with Captain Skeering, and cleared the capes with a
prosperous breeze.
The first and second day, Langley, being the only
passenger, had the vessel to himself, but on the
morning
of the third, one of the sailors informed the
captain
that a tarnation droll cretur had just crept out
of the forecastle, though nobody knew how he came
there. The captain went forward, followed by
Langley
,
to investigate this strange interloper, who at the
first blush demonstrated himself to be a lost sheep from
the flock of gentlemen. His garments had evidently
once been rich and fashionable, but were now in the
last stage of dissolution and decay, and he bore about
him all the insignia of poverty, except humility; for
he encountered the unwelcome looks of all around,
with a hardy, insolent indifference. Though his face
was marred and blotched by intemperance, and his
tattered garments smeared with dirt, still there was
about him some of those evidences of better days, that
often survive the lowest stages of degradation, and
distinguish
the fallen angel from the mere animal man.
Captain Skeering was one who took everything coolly;
he never got outwardly angry, and his self-possession
was proof against a hurricane. He civilly inquired of
the mysterious stranger, how he got on board, whence
he came, and what his object in coming.
I hid myself in a locker, replied he, I came
from the capital, and my object was to escape the
constable.
You don't say so, replied the captain, in his
simple
way. What had you to do with a constable?
Why, I had the misfortune to run in debt to my
landlord, who was so unreasonable to expect payment
from a man without the means.
Then you have no money, I guess, said the
captain
.
Not a groat.
And how do you expect to pay your passage,
friend.
I don't expect to pay it, friend.
The deuce you don't. But maybe I do, though.
Look you, captain, said the gentleman vagabond,
I carry in my veins the blood of kings, and number
among my ancestors, princes, dukes and earls by
dozens.
Pooh, said the captain, What's the use of being
high born, if a man has no money?
Use? said the other, very great use, sir. One
of the greatest advantages of high birth is, that it
makes merit entirely unnecessary. But listenI have
been a courtier, a soldier, a gambler, a highwayman,
a bully, a cheat and a dupe. I have lived by my wits
but there are two things I never descended toI
never worked or beggedI was above that. I was
once within one degree of the top; I am now at the
bottom; and though I lack courage to drown myself,
I shouldn't much mind being drowned by another.
Here I am without a shilling. If you don't choose to
take me where you are going, fill my pockets with
lead and throw me overboard, that I may give the lie
to my good friends at home, who long since predicted
I was born to be hanged.
But how came you to be in this miserable
condition
,
if you have such great friends? asked the captain.
I was a younger brother, answered the other,
fiercelyI was disinherited at my birth. Another
came before me and reaped the harvest. Don't you
know, sir, that to be second best among us is to be
nothing. My elder brother started first in the race,
took the purse, and left me the lining. He played the
tyrant and I whipped him. They sent me to college,
and I was expelled. They purchased me a
commission
in a regiment disbanded at the conclusion of
peace. I sent to beg forgiveness of my father, but he
said I had disgraced him. I joined a party who
amused themselves occasionally on the king's highway,
made a great prize at the expense of the life of the
owner; was tried and condemned to the gallows. My
father, fearing I should further disgrace him by being
hanged, sent an agent to say he would procure my
pardon if I would take an oath to change my name,
leave England, and never return. I had a great mind
to be hanged on purpose to spite my family, and leave
behind me a famous dying speech and confession;
but, on the whole, concluded to accept the terms offered,
especially as they included a purse of money. Finally,
I sailed on the Virginia voyage, arrived safe, spent my
money, ran in debt, ran away, and here am I at your
service.
In the course of this brief, yet comprehensive detail,
the gentleman vagabond, as we shall dub him, he
having positively refused to disclose his name, seemed
not the least affected by the recollections of the past
or the prospects of the future; and it was evident that
he had not only outlived the feeling of compunction,
but the sense of shame. An outcast of Providence, he
had neither the capacity or inclination to reform; and
it seemed as if he was permitted to cumber the earth
for the purpose of exhibiting an example proving the
futility of high birth or noble blood in sustaining the
dignity of man, without the aid of integrity and
virtue.
There was no help for it, however. The captain
shrugged his shoulders and declined throwing him
overboard; and he was suffered to remain until an
opportunity offered of putting him on shore. It was
curious to see how this miserable outcast carried his
head above the common sailor, and with what silent
contempt he declined answering any of their questions.
He assumed an air of superiority over the captain,
and if at any time he addressed Langley Tyringham,
it was with an air of courtly condescension that would
have been rather provoking in any one but such a
ragamuffin
.
If asked to assist in any emergency, he
turned up his nose in scorn, and swore that rather
than debase himself by working, he would die in a
hospital or swing on a gallows. The sailors dubbed
him the gentleman vagabond; the captain
prohibited
his entering the cabin; and Langley
contemplated
him with a mixture of contempt and horror.
Meanwhile, the good vessel sailed steadily onwards
with a genial southerly breeze, and the worthy captain,
having no special business at any intervening port,
made no stop by the way. They had reached the
easternmost extremity of Long Island, and the captain,
having consigned the care of the schooner to his trusty
mate, had retired to his cabin, when, in an instant, and
without the least preparatory warning, a squall struck
her while lying almost becalmed, and before she could
recover way, threw her on her beam ends. The vessel
did not fill immediately; but such was the confusion
created by this accident, that no one thought of saving
anything, ere it was too late. It was supposed at first
that the gentleman vagabond had been washed
overboard
,
until he was seen creeping out of the cabin,
like a drowned rat. All were too much occupied to
take any note of this circumstance, and none
remembered
it afterwards
The squall was succeeded by a fierce gale, which
continued nearly four and twenty hours, during which
the vessel floated at random, until at length she was
cast ashore on a small island, inhabited by Indians,
and soon went to pieces. It is believed that this was
what is now called Block Island, but as it is not
material, we shall not insist upon it. The situation
of the island and the sterility of the soil having hitherto
protected it from the inroads of the whites, the savages
had no injuries to revenge, and contented themselves
with stripping their involuntary victims of their
outward
garments and setting them to work in various
ways. Langley, being better dressed than the rest,
his clothes were claimed by the principal chief, who
reserved them for extraordinary occasions, and
deposited
them among the treasures of his wigwam. The
gentleman vagabond also fell to the lot of the same
high dignitary, who, after examining his costume with
great contempt, suffered him to retain his ragged
remnants
as unworthy of his adoption.
Here they remained in melancholy exile, the
bondmen
of barbarians, performing the work of slaves
without the rewards of slavery, and without the hope
of relief. Captain Skeering, who had once before been
in a similar situation, set himself to making the best
of a bad bargain. He labored as if for his own benefit,
and preserved a perfect equanimity of temper on all
occasions, only that he obstinately refused to work on
Sundays. This, at first, brought him into difficulty,
until he compounded matters by doing double duty on
Saturdays. But of all persons in the world, your
gentleman is in the most doleful predicament when
obliged to resort to his physical energies in any useful
employment; and Langley greatly excited the
contempt
of the squaws by his total ignorance of the art
of raising squashes. He knew something of fishing
and shooting, but the Indians would not trust him
with weapons, or permit his going out in a canoe. He
suffered many hardships and privations, which,
however
,
had this advantage, that their close pressure often
drew him from the most painful of all his
contemplations
,
that of being probably forever divorced from
Miriam and his home. As for the gentleman
vagabond
,
the savages could make nothing of him. He
swore he would not degrade himself and his ancestors
by raising pumpkins and squashes; resisted all
attempts
at coercion, and finally entered into a treaty,
by virtue of which he maintained his dignity on
condition
of furnishing the little papooses with plenty of
whistles.
Thus passed the time in hopeless captivity, until the
Indians engaged in a great hunting expedition, in
conjunction
with a friendly tribe on the opposite shore of
Long Island. As is usual on such occasions, all the
men except the aged and decrepid, went forth, carrying
with them their canoes, with the exception of a single
one, reserved in case it became necessary to
communicate
with the hunting party. The prisoners were
left behind, the distance of the island from all other
points of land precluding their escape by swimming,
and the single boata bark canoenot affording them
the means of conveyance. The next morning, but
one, after the departure of the savages, not only the
gentleman vagabond was missing, but likewise the
canoe, as well as the garments of Langley Tyringham,
that had been allotted to the great chief of the little
island. In their place was found the dead body of an
aged Indian, who had been left in charge of the royal
wigwam, and who had evidently died by violence.
It has been previously stated that this fellow, who
had reached the last stage of human depravity, was
observed emerging from the cabin of the schooner as
she lay on her beam ends, immediately after being
struck by the squall. In the confusion that followed,
he had taken the opportunity to rifle Langley's trunk,
in which the key had been carelessly left, of a
well-filled
purse, and a pocket-book containing his letters of
introduction, together with the formal consent of the
old Cavalier to his marriage with Miriam Habingdon.
These he concealed among his rags, and had been
enabled to retain in consequence of his dress being as
before stated, so filthy and worthless as not to excite
the cupidity of the savages. Having noticed the
position
of the only canoe left behind by the hunting
party, he conceived the design of using it to effect his
escape from the island, and reaching the opposite
shore of the continent, where he imagined he should
find the abodes of civilized men, and might avail
himself
of the money and papers he had purloined. As
exclusively appertaining to the principal chief, he
lodged in his wigwam with his aged father, a decrepid
Indian warrior; and accordingly in the middle of the
night when the old man was fast asleep, he took the
opportunity to despatch him with a stone hatchet he
had found in the wigwam. This done, he leisurely
threw off his rags, and dressed himself in the hat and
clothes that formerly belonged to Langley Tyringham;
after which he made all speed to the canoe, which he
launched from the beach, and jumping in, paddled off as
fast as possible. The wind blowing off the island, the
waters were quite smooth, and he proceeded toward the
mainland without danger or difficulty, until he got
out of the shelter of the island, and came within the
influence of the waves of the Atlantic, when his
situation
became very precarious. Having little experience
in the management of boats of any kind, he was
tossed about at random; became bewildered and
frightened
,
and finally, long before reaching the mainland,
his canoe filled, capsized, and he was drowned. The
finding his body and hat; the inference drawn from the
letters, partially preserved in the leather pocket-book, and
the attendant circumstances, are already known to the
reader. The body had remained too long in the water
to be recognized or described, and in due time the
parents of Langley Tyringham received information
that clothed them in sorrow and mourning.
CHAPTER XXI.
Retrospect Continued.
The
escape of the gentleman vagabond and the
murder
of the father of the chief placed Langley and his
fellow captives, as they were well aware, in a most
critical situation. There was no doubt that on the
return
of the hunting party, one at least of their
number
would be selected as a victim to the manes of the
murdered Indian, and of course they cast about for
the means of escaping. But none presented
themselves
.
The boats of the schooner had been swept from
the deck, and floated none knew whither; the only
canoe left on the island had disappeared; and
swimming
to the mainland, or Long Island, was
impracticable
.
Thus they remained, helpless and hopeless, until the
arrival of the hunters. The rage of the chief on
learning
the murder of his father was terrible, and those
aware of the savage law of retaliation need scarcely to
be told, that it was determined that the innocent
within their power should be sacrificed to atone for
the crime of the guilty who had escaped. A council
VOL. II. 11
was held, and well was it for the captives that the
lazy savages could not bear the idea of depriving
themselves of so many laborers, or they had all been
condemned to the stake. It was unanimously decreed
that one of the white men should be sacrificed, to
appease
the wandering spirit of the slaughtered Indian.
The desire of vengeance yielded something to the love
of ease; and the choice of a victim fell on Langley,
whose labors were not so valuable as those of his
sturdy companions.
The execution of savage vengeance is as prompt as
terrible, and the first notice our hero received of his
doom was the entrance of a trio of savages, who
forthwith painted him black, from head to foot. His
experience of Indian manners and customs had but
too well taught him the meaning of this ceremony,
and a horrible conviction came over him that he was
doomed to suffer a lingering death, aggravated by all
the refinements of savage cruelty. He was a man of
courage and firmness; but still this conviction almost
unmanned him, and for a brief period he suffered the
most acute anguish. He had hitherto lived in hope,
but here ended all his hopes. He should never more
see Miriam; the home of his father would become
desolate, and he himself perish in agonies unutterable.
The first shock over, however, he summoned up the
spirit within him, and prepared to meet his fate like a
man.
He remained strictly guarded until the next day,
when all things being in readiness, the whole tribe,
men, women and children, assembled in a little valley
that opened out on the sea, to witness this great act
of justice, for such it doubtless appeared to them. As
is usual on such occasions, the passions of all,
especially
the women and children, had been wrought to
the highest pitch of savage fury; and when the
prisoner
was led forth, and tied to the stake by a rope of
sufficient length to permit him to move around in a
circle within reach of the flames, he was received with
yells of triumph that seemed the rejoicings of fiends.
Every species of insult, exultation and malice, was
resorted to by the women and children in order to
irritate him into anger or complaint. But Langley
had, during the preceding night, prepared himself to
meet the horrors of his doom. He resolved to give
these barbarians no cause of triumph over the white
man, and he was capable of keeping his resolution.
Capt. Skeering, who had done his best in his behalf,
now, when the pile was about to be lighted, came to
him, and with tears running down his weather-beaten
face, said, Master Tyringham, I will pray to God
for you, it is all I can do, and, dropping on his knees,
fulfilled his promise with pious fervor.
The fire was now set to the pile, the smoke began
to ascend slowly, and the victim, his hands tied behind
him, stood still as death, with his eyes cast upwards,
when the loud report of a cannon echoed far and near,
and the next moment a vessel was seen to furl her
sails and drop anchor immediately opposite the cove,
about half a mile distant. At this sight the savages
were thrown into great commotion, and paying no
attention to the pile, the fire not being thoroughly
lighted, went out of itself. Presently a boat was
hoisted out from the vessel; a number of men
descended
the side, and she was rowed swiftly towards
the shore, with a white flag flying at her stern.
This signal, everywhere understood by civilized and
savage men, brought the chief with all his people down
to the beach to meet the strangers, who proved to be
Dutchmen from the good town of the Manhadoes,
engaged
in a trading voyage according to the custom of
those days. A communication was speedily opened,
and a brisk exchange commenced, in which the instinct
of nature proved a pretty good match for the
refinements
of civilization. The spirit of trade, indeed, seems
a natural gift all the world over. Hearing, in the
course of this contest of nature and art, that there
were five or six Christian captives on the island, the
captain, an honest, good-natured tobacco-smoking
skipper
,
entered into a negociation for their redemption,
in which he found no great difficulty except as to our
hero. They were loth to lose the pleasure of
banqueting
on his tortures; but a case of genuine Scheidam
removed all scruples, and it is earnestly hoped the
worthy skipper will be acquitted even by the most
sturdy tetotaler on the score of his benevolent purpose.
Langley was accordingly unbound, and probably never
man was so near the fire without scorching. There
can be little doubt that he was grateful to Heaven for
this timely interposition; but as he offered his thanks
in secret, it is not thought proper to parade them
before the public, as is too much the fashion in all
ages.
When the trading voyage was finished, the redeemed
captives were carried to the Manhadoes, where they
were well received and hospitably entertained, not
excepting Captain Skeering and his seamen, though
the Dutch were then in hot contention with the
Yankees about boundaries, land being very scarce at
that time. Captain Skeering and his crew soon found
a passage home, and it should be recorded to his credit,
that from this time, so long as the Dutch skipper
lived, he never failed to send him a yearly present of
a jolly quintal of that excellent fish ycleped dumb.
Nor, to make an end of this special matter, was
Langley at all behindhand in demonstrations of
gratitude
,
for he kept his benefactor plentifully supplied
with excellent James River tobacco, till death broke
his pipe and extinguished its smoke for ever. Mynheer
Tienhovenfor that was his nameused to affirm
that he never puffed the fragrant weed with so much
satisfaction, for it always reminded him of a Christian
act, which, being spiced, as he said, with the delight
of smoking, was exceedingly toothsome to the nose.
Arrived at the Manhadoes, Langley underwent a
severe struggle as to the course he should pursue.
His heart yearned towards the east, where dwelt his
morning star; but, in addition to a strong feeling of
duty which prompted him towards the south, in order
to learn the fate of his parents, who, he supposed.
must have long believed him dead, he was under
durance to the great law of necessity, which carries
all before it. The gentleman vagabond had relieved
him of all his money, with the exception of some small
coins which he carried in his pocket, which were
appropriated by the savages, who bored holes in them
and hung them in their noses by way of ornament.
He finally decided to turn his face towards the south;
ascertain the state of things at home, replenish his
purse, and commence Clebs again, guided by the
information he had received from Captain Skeering.
Having thus settled the matter, he waited impatiently
for an opportunity to return home, which he could
only accomplish by sea. Luckily such an one soon
offered, and he proceeded on his voyage.
CHAPTER XXII.
Retrospect Concluded.
It
was a pleasant evening of the early southern spring,
and the old Cavalier sat in his arm-chair, on the piazza
fronting towards the broad river, breathing, but not
enjoying the balmy breeze that gently curled the lazy
waters. But those who remembered him as he once
was would scarcely have known him now. Disease
and sorrow make sad work with age. He had heard
of the death of his son, and soon after was seized with
a severe fit of the gout, which, in its vagrant
ramblings
,
had threatened the vital parts. Though
partially
recovered, he was weak in body and sorrowful
in heart. Remorse, too, added its sting of scorpions,
for he could not help reproaching himself with having
been at least accessory to the death of his only son by
his causeless antipathy to the Puritan's daughter.
Gregory Moth, who now sympathised too deeply with
his old master ever to play upon his foiblesif grief
had left him anywas standing near him, when,
after a long pause of deep thought, the old Cavalier
thus said to his ancient dependent, in a feeble,
trembling
voice:
Gregory, do you know what day this is?
The tenth of May, sir, answered Gregory.
Yes, I know thatbut do you know who was
born this day?
Master Langley, sir, said Gregory, hesitatingly.
Yes, you are right, Gregory. We used to keep
this day merrily. It was once a day of joy, but now
a day of sorrow. It is now only the birth-day of the
dead, and should be kept not by merry ringings of
bells, but doleful tollings, telling of the departure of
some one to his long home. He paused awhile, and
then suddenly resumed. But perhaps he is not
dead. It is not certain that he is dead. Perhaps he
may yet live, for as yet we know nothing but by
report
,
and I cannot help sometimes thinking I may yet
see and bless him before I die.
Gregory cherished no such hope; but he could not
find it in his heart to aid in extinguishing the last
spark in the bosom of his master.
There is nothing certain in this life, sir, but
death, and nothing more uncertain than rumor. The
report we have heard came from no one knows who,
and from no one knows where. The vessel was lost,
that's certain; but it is not certain all on board were
lost with her. He was a good swimmer, and may
have got ashore only to be captured by the savages
along the coast. If so, it is no wonder you never
heard from him. He may be yet alive and return.
This suggestion seemed to reanimate the old
Cavalier
,
and he exclaimed, eagerly, True, Gregory,
true. Why have I not thought of this before? I will
send in pursuit of him. I will hire a vessel and go
myself. I will scour the country far and near. I
I and here he sank back exhausted in his chair,
panting for breath.
At this moment Gregory descried a boat crossing
the river, paddled by two negroes, with a third person
sitting at the stern. The boat approached the shore
opposite to the house; as she struck the land, the man
in the stern leapt out, and sped towards the house in
all haste. It was still bright twilight, and Gregory at
once recognised the person approaching. He began to
mutter almost unintelligibly, Master! Master! he is
cominghehe is here. MMMaster Langley
is
Who did you say? asked the Cavalier, feebly.
Who is comedid you not say something of
Langley? Speak, varlet, who is coming or who is
come?
It is I, father, cried Langley, grasping his
trembling hand. It is your son come back to receive
your blessing.
The old Cavalier recognised the voice of his son,
and opened his arms to receive him. He could not
bless him, for his voice was gone. But he pressed
him in his arms, and old as he was, shed tears of joy.
The meeting with his mother need not be described.
It was like that of a mother of the old patriarchs,
welcoming
the son of her affections, who was dead but is
alive again.
11*
Now all was life and joy under the roof of the old
Cavalier, who became once more splenetic, and
Gregory
logical. In short they were at least four times
as happy as they would have been had they never
been miscrable. Among the dregs of the cup of
calamity
are found the grains of gold dust, that enrich
us ever afterwards, if we make a right use of them.
But we cannot dwell on this picture, which indeed
soon faded; for we are impatient to return to our
heroine, who was left in such imminent jeopardy.
Suffice it to say that grief treads on the heels of joy,
even as joy does on those of sorrow. The bucket that
goes down the well empty comes up full, and that
which comes up full goes down empty. So rolls this
changing world, and so let it roll, since all is for the
best, as wise ones say.
The light that flashed from the old Cavalier on the
return of his lost child was as the last ray of the sun
when it sinks behind the hills. His old enemy, the
gout, roused up by the agitation of the enfeebled mind
and wasted body, made a second inroad, and took
possession
of the citadel of life. He struck the victim on
the head and the blow was mortal. The old Cavalier
had reached the great Inn, where all the travellers of
the earth sooner or later take up their last night's
lodging. Let him rest in peace and no one disturb
his ashes.
After all due sacrifices to filial duty, Langley took
occasion to intimate to his mother his intention of
making another attempt to see Miriam Habingdon.
That excellent woman, who had a strange habit of
forgetting that important being, self, at once
acquiesced
;
and leaving Gregory, who, on this occasion,
grievously anathematized the Crop-ears, to manage
affairs out of doors, he set forth on his pilgrimage,
as usual, by sea. Arriving safely at Boston, he lost no
time in proceeding on his journey, which he
accomplished
without accident, just in time to see Miriam
in a similar predicament with that from which he
was rescued by the philanthropy of Skipper Tienhoven.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Poor Miriam Habingdon!All Human Means of no AvailA Last
Interview.
Scarcely
had Langley Tyringham finished the story
which we have thus abridged in our own words,
when the jailer came in and apprised him it was time
to depart. He took leave of the forlorn girl with
feelings
of pity, love and anguish, that almost sundered
his heart, and cleft his brain asunder. Sleepless and
miserable he occupied the livelong night in devising
means of rescuing her who he had found at last only
to lose again forever, by means he shuddered to
realize
.
At length it occurred to him to seek an
interview
with Old Cat, in the hope of obtaining some clue
that might guide him in one more effort to avert the
fate of Miriam. Waiting impatiently for the morning
he proceeded to the prison, and was admitted without
hesitation by the keeper, who had no orders to the
contrary, and who, in truth, began to feel no small
sympathy in the fate of Miriam, whose sweetness of
disposition and quiet resignation had touched his
heart. He showed Langley into the room occupied
by the old woman, and left them together.
Langley found her in a state of great discontent
and impatience. Instead of being released, as Tobias
assured her she would be by casting the burden of her
supposed guilt on another, she had not only been
remanded to prison but was assured by the jailer that
her confession had only rendered her punishment more
certain. She was muttering to herself a strange
jargon
,
of which Langley could comprehend little but the
name of Tobias Harpsfield, with whom she seemed
greatly dissatisfied. By perseverance and coaxing he
drew out of her sufficient to enable him to
comprehend
that the poor old creature had in some way or
other been employed and deceived by Tobias. With
unwearied patience he questioned and listened, until
step by step he came to a full understanding of the
foul conspiracy against Miriam. Feeling perfectly
justified in a case like this, he affected great sympathy
for her, and more sincere indignation against Tobias,
for not interposing in her behalf as he had promised.
Finally, he urged her, as the best means of escaping
the fate which certainly awaited her, to make a full
confession before the magistrate. To this she finally
consented, and Langley, with a heavy burden removed
from his heart, immediately proceeded to the court
room, where the magistrates were now almost
constantly
in session, listening to new tales of witchcraft,
which had so increased in number and extravagance,
that they began to be alarmed at the new and terrible
responsibilities continually cast upon them. It seemed
as if the entire community was about to be involved
in the crime of witchcraft.
On the representation of Langley, they consented
that Old Cat should be brought before them for
examination
,
and when she arrived, listened to her
confession
with great gravity. A short consultation ensued,
in which the pastor, who constantly attended these
meetings as a sort of spiritual counsellor, being still
led captive by the demon of superstition, which equally
hoodwinks the mind and hardens the heart, took the
lead. He stated as his decided opinion that this
confession
of Old Cat was nothing more than one of the
cunning devices of the devil to screen a favored
disciple
from merited punishment. He observed there was
no end to the arts of the great enemy of man; and
that most especially in these times, when doubtless
for the punishment of the transgressions of the people,
who had permitted divers heresies and schisms to
grow up among them, the whole host of evil spirits
had, as it were, been let loose upon the land, he would
resort to every device of diabolical ingenuity in behalf
of those he seduced into his toils. This reasoning, so
suited to the times and the hearers, prevailed. The
testimony which had been thought sufficient to
convict
,
was declared insufficient to acquit poor Miriam,
and the Old Cat was once more remanded to prison,
muttering maledictions against the whole world, most
especially Tobias Harpsfield. Langley Tyringham,
who, until now, had not been fully aware of the state
to which the minds of these pious, well-meaning men
had been wrought by this terrible delusion, was
stricken with disgust and horror at this perversion of
justice and humanity. He now, for the first time,
became fully sensible of the desperate situation of
Miriam, and felt the leaden hand of numb despair
oppressing the vigor of his body, as well as the
energies
of his mind. Alas! thought he, what
possible
chance is there that light should penetrate the
deep gloom in which both reason and humanity seem
alike buried forever. There is no hope for innocence
when both religion and law combine for its
destruction
.
No hopeno refugeha! A sudden thought
seemed to strike him, and rushing out of the court he
bent his way to the place where he had taken
lodgings
.
Here he loaded his pistols carefully, and
concealing
them about his person, proceeded rapidly to
the abode of Tobias Harpsfield, at the door of which
he knocked impetuously. A female answered the
summons, from whom he learned Tobias was not at
home. He had been absent several days, and left no
word where he was going, or when he would return.
The last staff is brokenbe it sowe will die
together! murmured Langley, as he staggered
towards
home. Convinced of the guilt of Tobias, and
equally certain that none but a base coward could
have hatched such a conspiracy against a lonely
orphan girl, he had determined to force him to
confession
through his dastard fears, in the expectation that
it would have more weight than that of the old
woman. But he was gone, and now nothing less than
a miracle could save her who had twined herself about
his heart a thousand times more closely than ever by
the double tie of love and pity.
The day had been spent in these unavailing efforts,
and it was evening ere he could visit Miriam, the last
they were to pass together. She had not wondered at
his absence, feeling assured that he labored in her
behalf. As he approached, she gently yielded herself
to his outstretched arms, and looking in his face, softly
said, To-morrow another bridegroom will come, and
I must go with him. Till then, Langley, I am wholly
thine.
Miriam, said he, as he held her closely to his
heart, think you that death shall ever part us?
But for a season, I trustnot forever.
Not for a momentwe part no more.
I understand thee, Langley, said Miriam, quietly
withdrawing from his arms. Sit down by me and
let us talk together. Thou hast a mother still living
hast thou not?
Langley answered in the affirmative, and she
proceeded
:
I know full well, thou hast enough of what men
call courage, or thou wouldst never have been the
chosen of my heart. Thou hast the courage to die;
but I exact of thee the courage to live. Could thy
death preserve my life, there might be some motive for
offering up the sacrifice. But to die with me, or
follow
after, would be to sacrifice thyself on the altar of
cowardice. If thou indeed lovest me, thou must obey
me and live.
For what should I live? asked he gloomily.
Live for the performance of those high and noble
duties for which man was sent into this world, gifted
with qualities which enable him to administer to the
welfare of his fellow creatures. Live for thy country,
which demands thy services, and merits thy devotion.
Live for thy widowed mother, who, now in the vale of
tears, will by thy death be robbed of her only stay
and staff in this world. Live for me, Langley; for
when thou art dead, there will be none to
remember
that I ever existed. Thou wilt be as a tomb to
my memory; for while thou livest, I know I shall not
be forgotten. But thy parent, thine only parent,
think of her. The ties which bind the mother and
the child are more holy than those of love. Live,
then, and prove thyself worthy of mine.
I am glad you do not wish me to forget you, said
Langley, a little reproachingly.
Nonononever! I wish thee to remember me
for ever in this life, and if possible in the life to come
as one who loved thee with all the depth and purity
of woman's first and only love; as one who, when
time shall have smoothed the rough furrows of grief,
thou canst call to mind without reproach and without
remorse. Let it be your consolation, that you never
sought to lure me from the path of dutynever
suffered
thy selfish wishes to interfere with my painful
self-denial, nor ever wilfully inflicted a pang on my
heart. Thus, there will assuredly come a time when
thou wilt remember poor Miriam; it may be with
sorrow
,
but it will be a sweet and gentle sorrow,
softening
not corroding thy heart, and free from all the
bitterness of self-reproach. O! if it be permitted me
to look down and see thee thus, it will add to my joys
in the regions above.
Miriam, Miriam! cried Langley, is this the
way you would reconcile me to losing you? Do you
think I can see you dying a death of infamyfor so it
will be in the eyes of all spectators but minedo you
think I can see you suffer an innocent victim to a
blind and bloody superstition? It cannot beit is not
in man to bear it. I should go mad, and run a muck
against all mankind. Having tried every means to
avert your doom, I will die with you.
Thou art then a coward, Langley. I would not
have believed it. Thou wilt deny my last request,
and yet pretendest to love me. Thou wouldst add to
the pains of death the last and bitterest pang. Cruel
Langley, I did not expect this of thee; and now for
the first time she wept, and sobbed aloud. Langley
could not stand this, and replied
Be satisfied, dearest love. I promise to bear my
burden till it crushes me.
She thanked him gratefully, and for a brief period
they both remained silent, absorbed in deep reflection.
At length Langley suddenly rose, and closely
scrutinized
the window, together with every part of the
room. It is impossible, at any rate it is too late
now, said he, and resumed his seat again.
I was thinking, said Miriam, almost cheerfully,
how little space I occupy in this world, and how few
will miss me when I am gone. I was plucked up by
the roots from my native soil, and have taken no root
here. I am the last of a race that, if I may believe
our family chronicle, had existed on the same spot
eight hundred years. I shall perish here in this lonely
corner of the earth, without being missed by any but
youfor poor old Mildred has forsaken me since I
became
a witchand the false and foolish stigma on my
fame will soon be buried in forgetfulness. Why then
should I fear to die? Death would perhaps be a
hardship
were it not the common lot of all the living. We
all follow in the same track, and soon overtake each
other. But I had forgotten. I have a request to
make thee, Langley. It is, that when thou goest
home, thou wilt entreat thy mother to call me her
daughter Miriam. Wilt thou?
I will replied he, in a voice choking with agony.
The jailer now summoned Langley to depart. It
was as the knell of death, and both stood silent and
immovable. At length Miriam saidas to herself
It must be, and it must be borne. Then once more
voluntarily yielding to his arms, she spoke her last
farewell.
Not for ever, faltered he, I will be with you in
your last momentsI will see you dieperhaps your
example may give me courage to live.
Thou canst not bear it, dearest Langley.
Perhaps my heart will burst. So much the better.
But do not attempt to dissuade me, for so help me
Heaven I will be with you.
The jailer repeated the summons; Langley tore
himself
away to spend the rest of the night in wandering
about like some guilty spectre, and Miriam to sink
into that profound sleep which is the blessed refuge of
mind and body, when exhausted by conflicting
struggles
.
you one who will be the solace of your age for long
years to come.
Amen! said the old cavalier, and they parted.
CHAPTER XXIV.
The Last Scenes in the Drama.
The
sun rose clear and bright that morning, and the
balmy airs of summer, as they gently fanned the
flowers, the meadows, and the whispering woods, were
as pure as the blameless spirit now about to take
flight to the region of kindred spirits. A shower of
rain which occurred during the night had left the
atmosphere
so transparently clear, that every object
presented
itself distinctly, while all together formed
one beautiful and perfect harmony. The distant
mountains seemed to have come more near, and every
thing in nature glowed in its morning loveliness. It
was one of those days so gracefully sketched by an
old poet,
Sweet day, so calm, so clear, so bright,
The bridal of the earth and sky,
Soft dews shall weep thy fall to-night,
For thou must die.
The river, gilded by the rays of the morning sun,
coursed its graceful, lazy, winding way, through the
wide-spreading meadows sprinkled with many-colored
flowers; the merry minstrels of the morning caroled
a welcome to the blushing visitor; and every sight,
and every sound, mingled together in all the wondrous
harmony of cunning nature. All was repose, sleeping
in infant smiles, save the ever restless passions of that
reasoning worm called man, whose bosom, like the
unbridled
ocean, now foams in wrathful tempests, now
settles in a still, delusive calm, meditating a wider
devastation
.
Langley, after passing the night without rest or
shelter, appeared before Miriam that morning looking
the picture of desolation. His garments, saturated
with the rain, clung to his body, and both his person
and face exhibited the ravages of despair. He found
her clothed, as she said, in her wedding garment of
spotless white, calmly awaiting the bridegroom death.
The hour was too solemn for the endearments of love;
and little was said as they sat with their hands locked
in each other, awaiting the appointed hour. Miriam
had begged him to go and change his wet garments,
but he turned away impatiently, as if indignant that
she should think of such trifles at such a moment. A
tear, which her own approaching fate could not draw,
was wrung from her heart by pity for another.
The signal was now given. They rose, embraced,
kissed, and once more, and, for the last time, bade
farewell. A procession was formed, headed by the
magistrates and the pastor, and in the midst walked
Langley and Miriam, hand in hand, to the spot where
the victim was to be offered up to the dark demon of
superstition. A crowd had gathered together, drawn
by that strange feeling of mingled terror and curiosity
which hurries so many thousands to witness scenes
that scare their nightly pillow long after with spectres
of fearful identity. Various were the impressions and
whispered comments of the spectators on the
appearance
of Miriam in her snowy gown, with a face almost
as white, and a still, calm air of resignation that some
said looked like innocence. Others maintained it was
more like hardened guilt; some beheld her with pity,
others with shuddering antipathy, and a majority with
holy horror. Of the stranger holding her hand and
expressing in every lineament of his face feelings they
could not define, it seemed the prevailing opinion he
was nothing less than her familiar spirit in the disguise
of a handsome youth.
Things remained in this state for some time, for
there seemed an unwillingness to proceed to the last
act. At length the pastor approached her and proposed
that they should join in prayer together. Miriam
replied, Thou hast not been my friend, but I will
pray with thee and for thee; and their prayers
ascended together. As he heard her pronounce with
deep devotion that name, which, according to universal
conviction, could not be uttered by the unhallowed
lips of the possessed of the devil, the well-meaning
but misguided man looked in her face intently, and
saw there such an expression of mingled piety,
innocence
and resignation, as shook his settled conviction
of her depravity. Painful doubts flitted across his
mind for a moment, but it was only an eddy of the
tide, and the current again resumed its wonted
direction
.
Miriam was now to be placed on the cart, where no
coffin appeared according to custom, for these abhorred
reprobates were buried without coffins, in highways,
least they should contaminate the church-yards. It
was necessary the hands of Miriam and Langley should
be unclasped, and when this was done, it was as if the
last tie was severed. Her last words, as she drew her
hand from his, were, Langley, take care of poor old
Mildred. She has indeed deserted me, but it was
from fear, not for want of affection to me. Take her
with thee when thou goest home. Langley did not
answer; he remained fixed like a statue in numb
despair; his feelings were so intense that he had
become
almost unconscious of feeling. His eye glared
around like one walking in sleep, and it was evident
that he had no distinct perception of what was passing
around him. The heart of Miriam bled when she
divined his sad case, but she thought, It is best it
should be sobest for both of us.
The moment was come. The sheriff, with
trembling
hands, tied the fatal knot, and then stood
waiting
the signal from the magistrates. The crowd
remained in breathless silence, oppressed by a growing
conviction of her innocence; the magistrates hesitated
to give the signal, and the pastor heard the still, small
voice whisper that he must hold himself accountable
for his share of that day's work. At this moment,
when the fate of Miriam hung by a single hair, Tobias
Harpsfield, who, driven by the lash of the fiends, had
returned that morning and mingled in the crowd,
attracted the attention of those around him by the
agitation he displayed. Struggling in the bonds of
guilt and fear, and goaded on one hand by conscience,
on the other by shame; shaking with agony at thus
beholding the end of his machinations, he stood in a
state of horrible irresolution, panting and perspiring
now suddenly pushing the crowd before him, and then
as suddenly retreating. At length, with a desperate
effort he rushed forward, shouting aloudStop!
stop! she is innocenthalter mehang me, for I
alone am guilty. She is no witch. It was I that
bribed the old woman to accuse this innocent maiden,
whose murderer I shall be if she perishes. Give me
the book and let me testify to the truth of what I say,
and then give me a halter, for I have lately suffered
ten times worse than death.
A few words will explain the appearance and conduct
of Tobias Harpsfield. As stated in a preceding chapter,
he had, after finding all his efforts to rescue Miriam,
from the web he himself had woven, vain, left the
settlement in a state of mind that might have awakened
pity for any other than such a base, unmanly villain.
Lashed by guilt and fear, the twin executioners, who
inflict justice on secret crimes, he roamed about, bearing
a load of misery becoming every hour more difficult
to carry. As the time drew near and nearer that was
VOL. II. 12
to consummate his villany by the sacrifice of his
victim, his struggles became more bitter. That
selfishness
which had been his ruling principle through
life impelled him on to undo what he had done, not so
much to make all the atonement in his power, but
that he might rid himself of the sting of remorse,
which he felt would follow the death of Miriam. He
returned home irresolute; he attended at the
execution
,
still irresolute, and he remained irresolute to the
last, when remorse finally conquered shame, and he
rushed forward at the critical moment, as just related.
The timely repentance of Tobias arrested the
execution
.
The magistrates, after receiving his confession
in legal form, and consulting their oracle, the pastor,
decided it was sufficient for the acquittal of Miriam,
being in all respects corroborated by that of the old
woman. Besides, Tobias labored under no suspicion
of witchcraft, and his testimony was therefore
considered
orthodox. But there was something yet behind
all this. The truth is, some occurrences had taken
place within a few hours past that had a powerful
influence in bringing about this decision. The mania
of witchcraft was spreading like a pestilence;
accusations
poured in from all quarters, the product of
hatred, envy, malice, revenge, or superstition; and
the very evening before the events just related, the
wives of the pastor and of one of the magistrates had
been denounced as dealing in certain mystical
demonstrations
,
by one of their neighbors, either from malice
or possibly with a view of arresting the persecution
by bringing it home to the persecutors. However this
may be, the question was now brought to their own
firesides and presented itself in a new aspect. They
now began to apprehend they might themselves become
victims to the panic they had thus fostered, and had,
each one unknown to the other, tacitly resolved to set
their faces against it in future. The pastor, too, had,
as before stated, been for a moment shaken in his
conviction of the guilt of our heroine, by the apparent
sincerity of her devotion, and the magistrates, to do
them justice, had recoiled from this last practical
demonstration of the fatal consequences of this
senseless
,
cruel superstition.
They therefore hailed with pleasure so fair an
opportunity
of arresting a delusion which had now involved
their own families, and accordingly promptly and
unanimously decreed the release of Miriam. She had
heard the declaration of Tobias, and during the
dreadful
pause of suspense had suffered more than when
utterly hopeless of relief. Langley, too, had been
roused by the same voice from his deadly stupor, and
his first impulse was to rush towards Tobias and tear
him to pieces. But he was forcibly restrained by the
attending peace officers; and when her acquittal was
announced, ran to the cart, untied the knot, received
her in his arms, and almost carried her home. Here
the first moments were consecrated to love, the next
to pious gratitude; and the hours that succeeded
almost made amends for those that went before this
timely reprieve from a death of infamy.
The present abode of Miriam was associated with
too many painful recollections to render her desirous of
remaining, and she readily consented to accompany
Langley to the sunny South, there to be united in the
presence of a new mother. Accompanied by Mildred,
who continued for a long time rather shy of her
mistress
,
after a parting visit to the graves of her parents,
she set out on her third and last pilgrimage. The few
years that had elapsed since she passed through the
wilderness with her parents, had produced some of
those wonders which the industry and enterprise of
men achieve in this our New World, which still
continues
to advance like the giant with his seven-league
boots, while the Old remains the cotemporary of past
ages, and may be said to live in its ancient renown.
Towns had been founded, forests cleared, and roads
made, so that their journey to Boston was neither
fatiguing or tedious. From thence they voyaged by
sea to the capital of Virginia, and reached home
without
accident. Here Miriam was received by Mistress
Tyringham with the welcome of an affectionate
mother
,
and in due time pledged her vows to him who
had so long possessed her heart.
Those feelings of religious and political antipathy
which had alienated their fathers, and caused so much
suffering to their children, did not take root in the soil
of mutual love. It would seem that civil and religious
liberty are twin sisters, and cannot be divorced from
each other. Hence Americawe mean the United
States, the legitimate representative of the New World
is not the soil or genial clime for bigotry and
persecution
;
and it is earnestly to be hoped it will be long,
very long, before the blood-stained fiend of persecution
and intolerance, which has perpetrated more revolting
cruelties than ambition, avarice, or revenge, rears its
Gorgon head over the ruins of liberty of conscience.
Both Miriam and Langley were stricken deer. They
had equally felt the barbed arrow tipt with poison,
and shrunk from the hand by which it was launched.
Miriam was actually married by a minister of the
Established Churchthere being at that time no other
mode of wedding in Virginiaand thought the vows
she pledged and received as binding as if they had
been offered at a different shrine. Nay, when
afterwards
asked by her husband if she wished to
accompany
him to the only church in the neighborhood,
which was Episcopal, she modestly replied, I have
no scruple in worshipping with Christians in any
Christian church. Those who confound bigotry with
piety, and mistake the venom of sectarianism for the
healing balm of religion, will doubtless accuse our
heroine of backsliding; but that which makes woman,
or man either, more mild and tolerant towards others
of a different sect, or more ready to exchange the
offices of kind benevolence with them, cannot be
wrong, by whatever name it may be called. And this
is the moral of our tale.
The new and endearing ties of wife and mother
gradually moulded Miriam into something less solemn
and abstracted. Though she never became a gay
woman, she did not lack a cheerful spriteliness, that
shed a pleasant light around the fireside; and though
not less pious, she was more tolerant of the piety of
others, though exhibited in a different guise. Her
early instilled prejudices against other sects were
gradually
absorbed by the mild, forgiving spirit of
Christianity
,
whose basis is the universal brotherhood of
mankind. Without being gay herself, she enjoyed
the innocent gaiety of others; never railed at
youthful
sports or recreations because she did not choose to
partake in them; nor did she ever turn with sour
ingratitude from the bounties spread out before her by
a beneficent Creator. Her most common and natural
mood was a quiet gentleness; and no one ignorant of
her story ever suspected the latent enthusiasm; the
energetic purpose; the obstinate, unyielding sense of
right; that lay dormant under the yielding softness,
the mild benignity, the smiling acquiescence, of the
Puritan's daughter.
Honest Gregory Moth was still alive and flourishing
on the return of his master, and survived years
afterwards
.
He sometimes indulged his vein, by singing
his favorite song of Barnaby, Barnaby, thou'st been
drinking, and often frightened Goody Mildred by
affirming, with his usual gravity, that, logically
speaking
,
her young mistress had certainly bewitched him,
for he would do anything but run into danger for her.
Langley, too, in their hours of chaste endearment,
which actually outlived a month, often accused her of
being an arrant witch, for she made him do just as she
pleased. We cannot find that he ever succeeded to
the title of his uncle, by outliving his four cousins,
but certain it is that both he and Miriam lived long
and happily, and their posterity still flourish in the
Ancient Dominion
.
FINIS.